Massachusetts, session 194th, S3064.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. To provide for a program of climate change adaptation, resiliency and the 
2 preservation and improvement of environmental and recreation assets of the commonwealth, 
3 sections 2 to 2G inclusive, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this 
4 act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds. 
5 These sums shall be in addition to any amounts previously authorized and made available for the 
6 purposes of those items. The sums set forth in sections 2 to 2G, inclusive, shall be made 
7 available until June 30, 2032.  
8  SECTION 2. 

2 of 166 9  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS 
10  Department of Conservation and Recreation  
11  2800-1123  For the acquisition of land and interests in land by the department of 
12 conservation and recreation and for associated costs including planning, study, due diligence, 
13 title and appraisal services, site restoration and stewardship including, but not limited to, coastal 
14 land acquisition and securing access to protected coastal lands and lands to provide for the inland 
15 movement of coastal habitats; provided, that funds may be used for capital investments related to 
16 the stewardship of the land; and provided further, that funds may be used for the restoration and 
17 reclamation of acquired land, including demolition of structures, removal of debris, eradication 
18 of non-native species and other services essential to these reclamation efforts……...$40,000,000 
19  2800-7024 For a forestry and tree planting program for projects throughout the 
20 commonwealth including, but not limited to, the evaluation and planning of forestry and tree 
21 planting projects, tree stock, planting and associated costs; provided, that the secretary of energy 
22 and environmental affairs shall grant priority to the planting of trees that are in areas: (i) 
23 experiencing heat island effects; (ii) underserved with tree cover; (iii) with disadvantaged 
24 populations; (iv) affected by severe weather events or insect infestation; (v) where aquifers, 
25 recharge areas, wells, reservoirs and other water bodies are located that will improve and protect 
26 water quality as part of a natural ecosystem; and (vi) that will further climate change mitigation, 
27 adaptation and resiliency strategies; provided further, that the program shall prioritize the use and 
28 growth of native tree species; provided further, that the secretary may provide guidance for 
29 coordination between municipal and utility stakeholders on incorporating utility gas leaks data 
30 into planning for street tree planting projects and for testing street tree pits for methane before 

3 of 166 31 planting; and provided further, that funds from this item may be expended to provide grants, 
32 technical assistance or other support to landowners to undertake capital projects including, but 
33 not limited to, sustainable forest management and long-term conservation practices, to protect 
34 the ecological integrity of the commonwealth’s forestlands under the Forests as Climate 
35 Solutions plan…………………………………………………...$20,000,000 
36  2800-7026 For the: (i) design, construction, maintenance, repair, removal and 
37 improvements of state-owned or abandoned dams identified by the office of dam safety, 
38 including improvements to the aquatic habitat, inland flood control projects and projects for 
39 related facilities and equipment; (ii) design, construction, maintenance, repair or improvement of 
40 the department’s coastal and marine infrastructure and coastal ecological resources including, but 
41 not limited to, shore protection, docks, piers, culverts, beaches, dunes and salt marshes; and (iii) 
42 navigational and ecological performance of the commonwealth’s tidal and nontidal waterways; 
43 provided, that the department of conservation and recreation shall give priority to dams and flood 
44 control projects that pose the greatest risk to public health, public safety or the environment; 
45 provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for 
46 planning, prioritizing, selecting and implementing projects in furtherance of the goals of the state 
47 hazard mitigation and climate change adaptation plan; and provided further, that not less than 
48 $120,000,000 shall be expended for long-term coastal flood resilience improvements to the 
49 Amelia Earhart dam and its embankments in the cities of Somerville and Everett….$428,100,000 
50  2840-7028 For the study, planning, permitting, design, construction, reconstruction, 
51 repair, removal, demolition, improvement, furnishing, equipping or rehabilitating of department 
52 of conservation and recreation properties including, but not limited to, reservations, facilities 
53 infrastructure, forests, parks, campgrounds, comfort stations, harbor islands, skating rinks, skate 

4 of 166 54 parks, swimming and wading pools, spray parks, golf courses, tennis courts, basketball courts, 
55 ball fields, playgrounds, exercise and fitness paths, tracks, other recreational facilities, historic 
56 sites, beaches and storage buildings, office buildings, visitor centers, fire towers, maintenance 
57 facilities and other park buildings structures, equipment, including upgrades to information 
58 technology equipment to be considered in consultation with the secretary of technology services 
59 and security and for the planning, design, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, 
60 removal, improvement or rehabilitation of bike paths, greenways, accessible trails, recreational 
61 trails and equipment; provided, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may 
62 provide guidance for planning, prioritizing, selecting and implementing capital projects in 
63 furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation consistent with the state 
64 hazard mitigation and climate change adaptation plan and in support of disadvantaged 
65 populations; provided further, that funds may be expended to support municipal equipment needs 
66 for combating wildland and forest fires; provided further, that the department of conservation 
67 and recreation may expend funds for technical assistance and grants to public and nonpublic 
68 entities in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the department to implement this 
69 item; provided further, that in expending funds from this item, the commissioner shall prioritize 
70 public health, public safety and capital to maintain public assets; and provided further, that not 
71 less than $25,000,000 shall be expended for the establishment of a water treatment system for 
72 King's beach in the city of Lynn; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be 
73 expended for the renovation, installation and ongoing maintenance of composting toilet facilities 
74 on properties owned and managed by the department of conservation and recreation; provided 
75 further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended for work at Squantum point park in the 
76 city of Quincy for costs for work including, but not limited to, planning, design and engineering 

5 of 166 77 and the construction of ferry service; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be 
78 expended for maintenance and investment in the Old Harbor Reservation in the city of Boston, 
79 including, but not limited to, Dahill Rest infrastructure, Kelly’s Landing, Castle Island, the 
80 World War II Memorial, the Admiral David Farragut statue, a satellite horse barn on Castle 
81 Island for the state police mounted unit, Columbia road and Moakley park; provided further, that 
82 not less than $1,000,000 shall be extended for maintenance of the Southwest Corridor park in the 
83 city of Boston including, but not limited to, street resurfacing of Claremont street between 
84 Wellington street and Greenwich park, street resurfacing of Carleton street between Braddock 
85 park and Yarmouth street, improved signage and greenspace investments in Mary Longley 
86 garden at Northampton Green; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended 
87 for the construction of an ADA-accessible boardwalk in the Blue Hills Reservation in 
88 partnership with Friends of the Blue Hills Charitable Trust; provided further, that not less than 
89 $500,000 shall be expended for repairs and improvements to the Brook Farm print shop in the 
90 West Roxbury section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall 
91 be expended for the implementation of an integrated approach for public access, trails and 
92 recreation opportunities to enhance visitor experiences at Havey beach located on the Charles 
93 river in the West Roxbury section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than 
94 $1,000,000 shall be expended for maintenance and improvements at the Stony Brook reservation 
95 in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the 
96 Horseneck Beach State Reservation for capital upgrades, including, but not limited to, 
97 purchasing heavy duty equipment, beach nourishment and stone and cobble removal in the town 
98 of Westport…………………………………………………………..…...$623,875,000 

6 of 166 99  2890-7036 For the study, planning, permitting, design, engineering, construction, 
100 reconstruction, repair, improvement or rehabilitation of department of conservation and 
101 recreation roadway, bridge and path of travel related infrastructure including, but not limited to, 
102 parkways, boulevards, multi-use trails, roads within state parks, transportation infrastructure, 
103 recreational trails, pedestrian bridges and related appurtenances and equipment; provided, that 
104 funds may be expended for pedestrian and bicycle safety, traffic calming, landscape 
105 improvements, street lighting, safety equipment and accessibility; provided further, that all work 
106 funded by this item shall be carried out according to standards developed by the department 
107 pursuant to historic parkways preservation treatment guidelines to protect the scenic and historic 
108 integrity of the bridges and parkways under its control; and provided further, that the secretary of 
109 energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, selection 
110 and implementation of projects in furtherance of the state hazard mitigation and climate change 
111 adaptation plan and in support of disadvantaged populations……………………….$176,670,000  
112  SECTION 2A. 
113  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS 
114  Department of Environmental Protection 
115  2200-7026  For the assessment, containment, monitoring, cleanup, control, public 
116 participation, removal of or response actions concerning oil or hazardous materials or for any 
117 other action necessary to implement chapter 21E of the General Laws and the Massachusetts 
118 Contingency Plan established pursuant to said chapter 21E…………………….$42,000,000 
119  2200-7027 For capital investments in air, water and land resource protection, climate 
120 adaptation and decarbonization and ensuring access to clean water and air including, but not 

7 of 166 121 limited to, energy, climate and environmental projects and programs that optimize and preserve 
122 environmental quality and public health and that provide for appropriate protection, restoration, 
123 management and best use of air, water and land resources, assets and infrastructure including, 
124 but not limited to, upgrades to laboratory equipment, projects related to nonpoint and point 
125 sources of water pollution and the wetlands circuit rider program; provided, that funds may be 
126 used to provide grants to public and nonpublic entities including, but not limited to, cities, towns, 
127 counties and districts, or any authority, commission, board or instrumentality thereof, and tribal 
128 governments for the protection and restoration of the commonwealth’s environmental resources 
129 to invest in efficient and effective mitigation projects and initiatives to restore and preserve the 
130 commonwealth’s air, climate, energy, water and land resources, assets and infrastructure; and 
131 provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for 
132 planning, prioritization, selection and implementation of projects in furtherance of the goals of 
133 climate change mitigation, resiliency and adaptation; provided further, that not less than 
134 $5,000,000 shall be expended for a pilot program to be administered by the department, in 
135 consultation with the department of public health, to identify and monitor indoor air pollution 
136 and indoor mold contamination in areas which shall include, but not be limited to, schools, 
137 municipal buildings, correctional facilities, state-owned or managed health care facilities, 
138 childcare centers and public housing …………………………..$32,800,000 
139  2200-7028  For the assessment, containment, monitoring, cleanup and closure of 
140 existing or closed solid waste facilities causing or threatening to cause pollution pursuant to 
141 section 4 of chapter 21H of the General Laws and for capital expenditures associated with 
142 composting, recycling and waste reduction programs consistent with the comprehensive 

8 of 166 143 statewide master plan for solid waste disposal established pursuant to section 21 of chapter 16 of 
144 the General Laws………………………………………………………………..$28,100,000 
145  2200-7029  For investments in clean water and drinking water infrastructure by the 
146 department of environmental protection to address per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance 
147 contamination of public water supplies, private wells or imminent hazard conditions pursuant to 
148 section 3A of chapter 21E of the General Laws including, but not limited to, planning, 
149 construction, replacement, repair or modernization of infrastructure that enhances ground and 
150 surface water resources, ensures the safety of drinking water or protects public health; provided, 
151 that funds in this item may be used for response actions that create a capital asset or result in 
152 improvements to capital assets including, but not limited to, installing filters or other treatment 
153 systems, excavation, covering and fencing contaminated soil and associated planning and design; 
154 provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended for research, technical 
155 assistance and grants to advance safer alternatives to per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances in 
156 products and manufacturing and projects that prevent the future release of per- and 
157 polyfluoroalkyl substances in air, water and soil; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 
158 shall be expended to the city known as the town of Weymouth for costs associated with joining 
159 the Massachusetts Water Resource Authority; provided further, that not less than $5,00,000 shall 
160 be expanded for infrastructure improvements in the Arlington Neighborhood in the city of 
161 Methuen, including, but not limited to, drainage and sewage, road pavement, engineering costs 
162 and business outreach ……………………………………………………...$125,000,000 
163  2200-7030 For a grant program to be administered by the department of 
164 environmental protection, in consultation with the executive office of education, to support 
165 access to clean drinking water in commonwealth public schools including, but not limited to, 

9 of 166 166 regional vocational or county agricultural school districts, independent vocational schools and 
167 collaboratives and child care centers as defined in section 1A of chapter 15D of the General 
168 Laws; provided, that funds may be used for improvements to the drinking water infrastructure in 
169 schools and child care centers to remediate the presence of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, 
170 lead and other contaminants, including, but not limited to, the removal of existing drinking water 
171 outlets from operation and the acquisition, installation and maintenance of filtered water stations 
172 and filtered faucets for drinking water outlets; provided further, that filtered water station sand 
173 faucets shall be certified to meet National Sanitation Foundation and American National 
174 Standards Institute filtration systems standard 42 for particulate removal and 1standard 53 for 
175 lead at all water outlets intended for human consumption at a rate of at least 1 per 100 occupants; 
176 and provided further, that the department may prioritize awarding funds to school districts or 
177 child care centers in low income or environmental justice 
178 communities…………………………..$15,000,000 
179  SECTION 2B. 
180  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS  
181  Department of Fish and Game 
182  2300-0422  For the acquisition of land and interests in land by the department of fish 
183 and game and for associated costs including, but not limited to, planning, studies, due diligence, 
184 title and appraisal services, site restoration and stewardship; provided, that such lands may be 
185 purchased after approval by the commissioner of fish and game; provided further, that funds may 
186 be expended on the development and implementation of a capital stewardship program on lands 
187 under the care and control of the department of fish and game and its divisions; provided further, 

10 of 166 188 that funds may be used for restoration, repair and reclamation of acquired land including, but not 
189 limited to, demolition of structures, removal of debris, eradication of nonnative species and other 
190 capital investments essential to the reclamation efforts; and provided further, that projects may 
191 be carried out with other public and nonpublic entities including, but not limited to, federal and 
192 state agencies, cities, towns, counties and districts, or any authority, commission, board or 
193 instrumentality thereof, nonprofit and conservation organizations, public and private land owners 
194 and tribal governments………………………………………………………….$53,500,000 
195  2300-7029 For planning, design, engineering, construction, reconstruction, 
196 renovation, repair, demolition, acquisition, enhancements, improvements, removal and 
197 replacement of the infrastructure, facilities and equipment under the care and control of the 
198 department of fish and game and its divisions including, but not limited to, buildings and other 
199 structures, education centers, district headquarters, hatchery facilities, offices, storage buildings, 
200 shooting ranges, archery facilities, dams, laboratories, equipment, vehicles, vessels and site 
201 clearance; provided, that funds may be used to: (i) incorporate energy efficiency and renewable 
202 technologies; (ii) decrease energy use and greenhouse gas emissions; (iii) increase climate 
203 resiliency; or (iv) enhance accessibility; and provided further, that funds may be used for 
204 implementation of projects in furtherance of the statewide hazard mitigation and climate 
205 adaptation plan………………………………………………………………….$15,000,000 
206  2300-7030 For the rehabilitation, reconstruction, modernization and decarbonization 
207 of the department of fish and game’s division of fisheries and wildlife Charles L. McLaughlin 
208 Fish Hatchery in the town of Belchertown including, but not limited to, new construction, repair 
209 and rehabilitation of buildings and rounds……………………………………..$20,000,000 

11 of 166 210  2300-7031 For ecological restoration capital programs and projects at the department 
211 of fish and game’s division of ecological restoration; provided, that funds from this item may be 
212 used for river, wetland and watershed restoration and protection including, but not limited to: (i) 
213 dam and barrier removal; (ii) streamflow and water quality restoration; (iii) road-stream crossing 
214 upgrades; (iv) improving public access, including enhancements to accessibility; (v) restored 
215 rivers and wetlands; (vi) and other capital activities that restore biodiversity and support nature-
216 based approaches for adapting to climate change; provided, that the commissioner of fish and 
217 game or the commissioner’s designee may enter into cooperative agreements with state and 
218 federal agencies, cities, towns, counties and districts, or any authority, commission, board or 
219 instrumentality thereof, nongovernmental organizations, regional planning agencies, tribal 
220 governments and others; provided further, that funds in this item may be used for the purchase of 
221 equipment; provided further, that the commissioner of fish and game may award grants to public 
222 and nonpublic entities including, but not limited to, cities, towns, counties and districts, or any 
223 authority, commission, board or instrumentality thereof and tribal governments, to carry out this 
224 item; provided further, that not less than $60,000,000 shall be expended for flood mitigation and 
225 resiliency projects in the Connecticut River Valley including, but not limited to, initiatives or 
226 projects recommended by the special commission established in section 71; and provided further, 
227 that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended to the Southeastern Regional Planning and 
228 Economic Development District for capital improvement projects including, but not limited to, 
229 the removal of sediment, the repair of dams and culverts and the implementation of water flow 
230 management improvements, to mitigate flooding issues and promote ecological sustainability in 
231 the Assawompset pond complex and the contributing and interconnected watersheds within the 
232 towns of Freetown, Lakeville, Middleborough and Rochester and the cities of New Bedford and 

12 of 166 233 Taunton; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the division of 
234 ecological restoration for purposes including, but not limited to, design and construction of salt 
235 marsh restoration and enhancement projects that support coastal flood risk reduction, climate 
236 resilience or wildlife habitat improvement in the Neponset river estuary ………...$105,500,000 
237  2300-7032 For the planning, engineering, design, construction, acquisition, 
238 development and reconstruction of existing and new coastal and inland access sites identified by 
239 the department of fish and game’s office of fishing and boating access including, but not limited 
240 to, boat launching facilities, fishermen boat access facilities, car-top boat launching facilities, 
241 canoe and kayak access facilities, sport fishing piers and shore fishing areas including, but not 
242 limited to, ramps, docks, floats and appurtenant facilities throughout the commonwealth; 
243 provided, that funds may be used on enhancements to accessibility, construction of signage and 
244 informational kiosks and the implementation of coastal projects developed jointly with the 
245 Marine Recreational Fisheries Development Fund established in section 35NN of chapter 10 of 
246 the General Laws…………………………………………………………….….$10,000,000  
247  2300-7033 For marine fisheries resource conservation and restoration and capital 
248 support of local commercial and recreational fisheries which may include, but shall not be 
249 limited to, fish and habitat restoration, marine habitat creation, hard bottom habitat enhancement, 
250 vessels, vehicles and equipment; provided, that projects may be carried out in cooperation with 
251 public and nonpublic entities, tribal governments and other management agencies; and provided 
252 further, that the department may award grants to public and nonpublic entities and tribal 
253 governments to carry out this item……………………………………………$10,000,000 

13 of 166 254  2300-7034  For the planning and implementation of capital projects and programs at 
255 the department of fish and game and its divisions in furtherance of Executive Order no. 618 
256 entitled “Biodiversity Conservation in Massachusetts” which shall include, but not be limited to, 
257 a local biodiversity capital grant program to support community-led biodiversity efforts; 
258 provided, that the projects and programs may be carried out in cooperation with public and 
259 nonpublic entities, tribal governments and other management agencies including, but not limited 
260 to, other state agencies, cities, towns, counties and districts, or any authority, commission, board 
261 or instrumentality thereof, regional planning agencies and nonprofit organizations; and provided 
262 further, that the department and its divisions may award grants to public and nonpublic entities, 
263 tribal governments and other management agencies including, but not limited to, cities, towns, 
264 counties and districts, or any authority, commission, board or instrumentality thereof, regional 
265 planning agencies and nonprofit organizations, to carry out this item………..…..$20,000,000 
266  SECTION 2C. 
267  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS  
268  Office of the Secretary 
269  2000-7067 For improvements and replacements to the infrastructure and holdings of 
270 the executive office of energy and environmental affairs and its departments and divisions and 
271 for capital assets and improvements to infrastructure and holdings that support the mission of the 
272 executive office of energy and environmental affairs; provided, that this may include, but shall 
273 not be limited to, buildings, equipment and vehicles; provided further, that investments may 
274 support the development and implementation of capital projects that support the Massachusetts 
275 Hazard Mitigation and Climate Adaptation Plan; provided further, that the secretary of energy 

14 of 166 276 and environmental affairs may grant priority to critical actions and strategies identified in the 
277 plan; provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide 
278 guidance for the planning, prioritization, selection and implementation of projects in furtherance 
279 of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation and consistent with the Massachusetts 
280 Hazard Mitigation and Climate Adaptation Plan; provided further, that funds may support 
281 development of outdoor recreation sites and facilities and infrastructure; provided further, that 
282 funds may be awarded to public and nonpublic entities including, but not limited to, tribal 
283 governments, cities, towns, counties and districts, or any authority, commission, board or 
284 instrumentality thereof, regional planning agencies and nonprofit organizations, or expended 
285 directly by the executive office of energy and environmental affairs and its departments and 
286 divisions; provided further, that grant funds may be used for planning, engineering, design, 
287 acquisition, permitting, construction, repair and renovation; and provided further, that grants 
288 shall be awarded in a manner that promotes accessibility, supports geographic equity and 
289 supports disadvantaged populations…………………………………………….$73,000,000 
290  2000-7068 For a tree planting greening program for projects on publicly-owned land 
291 or on private lands with the consent of the owner and subject to appropriate covenants that shall 
292 assure the continued presence and effectiveness of the commonwealth’s investment including, 
293 but not limited to, the evaluation and planning of tree greening projects, tree stock and planting 
294 and capital maintenance of urban trees; provided, that the program shall prioritize the use of 
295 native tree species; provided further, that the secretary shall give priority to the planting of trees 
296 in cities and towns with a completed tree management plan; provided further, that funds may be 
297 expended to assist cities and towns in the development of a tree management plan; and provided 

15 of 166 298 further, that funds may be used to provide grants, technical assistance or other support to public 
299 and nonpublic entities and tribal governments to fulfill the purposes of this item...….$10,000,000 
300  2000-7076 For capital grants or other financial assistance to be administered by the 
301 executive office of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the department of 
302 agricultural resources and division of marine fisheries, to promote and support the growth and 
303 economic competitiveness of the commonwealth's agricultural, commercial fishing and 
304 cranberry-growing sectors; provided, that the executive office shall prioritize applicants for 
305 grants or other financial assistance that focus on innovative approaches to enhance 
306 environmental benefits, promote climate resiliency and encourage increased economic activity in 
307 its respective sector including, but not limited to: (i) capital infrastructure improvements that 
308 promote energy efficiency; (ii) the purchase or expanded use of clean and renewable energy 
309 technologies; (iii) tools to address barriers to economic growth, including the purchase of energy 
310 efficient equipment and technology; (iv) tools and technologies to support practices that promote 
311 resilience against the impacts of climate change; (v) tools and technologies to facilitate 
312 sustainability and new product development; (vi) acquisition and purchase of innovative 
313 commercial fishing gear designed to protect stocks and species of concern; and (vii) capital 
314 infrastructure improvements related to developing and strengthening workforce development and 
315 training programs; provided further, that grants or other financial assistance shall be distributed 
316 on a competitive basis and awarded in a manner that promotes geographic equity; and provided 
317 further, that grants or other financial assistance awarded in this item shall be distributed equally 
318 among the agriculture, commercial fishing and cranberry-growing sectors; provided further, that 
319 not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended for capital grants or other financial assistance to be 
320 administered by the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with 

16 of 166 321 the department of agricultural resources, to support municipalities and small businesses 
322 transitioning from gas-powered nursery and landscape machinery and maintenance equipment to 
323 low-noise, low-emissions electric equipment …………………………...$22,000,000 
324  2000-7078 For the MassTrails program and other capital improvements to the 
325 commonwealth’s trails; provided, that funds may be used for the planning, engineering, design, 
326 permitting, construction, repair, technical assistance and improvement of trails and the 
327 acquisition of property interests for trail purposes; provided further, that not less than 
328 $10,000,000 shall be expended for the design and construction of accessible trails for people 
329 with disabilities including, but not limited, to upgrades in accordance with guidelines from the 
330 United States Forest Service and the United States Access Board’s accessibility standards for 
331 federal outdoor developed areas; provided further, that funds may be granted at the discretion of 
332 the secretary of energy and environmental affairs to public and nonpublic entities, including 
333 municipalities, regional planning agencies and nonprofit organizations, or expended directly by 
334 the executive office of energy and environmental affairs and its departments and divisions; 
335 provided further, that trails are to be broadly defined to include water, recreational, multi-use, 
336 motorized use by recreational and snow vehicles, trails designed to enhance accessibility and 
337 may be paved, improved, natural surface or on-road for limited distances when necessary to 
338 make key connections; provided further, that any project funded from this item shall be open to 
339 the public; provided further, that wherever practicable, property interests acquired shall be 
340 permanently conserved such that the trail thereon is permanently accessible to the public but may 
341 be subject to long-term leases where necessary to advance trail projects; and provided further, 
342 that a match from the funding recipient, which may include in-kind match, may be required at 
343 the discretion of the secretary of energy and environmental affairs………….$50,000,000 

17 of 166 344  2000-7082 For grant programs related to and investments in: (i) land, soil, water and 
345 natural resource conservation, open space preservation and other capital expenditures that 
346 conserve land and natural resources that provide ecosystem services, including clean air and 
347 water, including watershed remediation, water conservation and other capital investments related 
348 to water resource protection and flood prevention; (ii) coastal resource protection including, but 
349 not limited to, securing access to protected coastal lands and lands to provide for the inland 
350 migration of coastal habitats; (iii) recreation, including the acquisition, development, 
351 construction, rehabilitation and improvement of parks and all related facilities in neighborhoods 
352 underserved with parks, including assessment and remediation of brownfield sites intended for 
353 park use; (iv) environmental equity and wildlife and endangered species protection including, but 
354 not limited to, the: (a) local acquisition for natural diversity grant program; (b) parkland 
355 acquisition and renovation for communities grant program; (c) tribal land acquisition grant 
356 program; (d) healthy soils grant program; (e) woodlands partnership grant program; (f) 
357 conservation partnership grant programs including, but not limited to, programs to support 
358 landscape-scale land conservation projects, the drinking water supply protection grant program, 
359 grant programs to assist and provide funding to conservation districts, grants to support projects 
360 and initiatives that promote carbon sequestration and climate change resiliency through 
361 sustainable forestry and salt marsh restoration; (v) capital grants and technical assistance to 
362 facilitate the conservation of land by municipalities, tribal governments, land trusts and other 
363 conservation organizations; (vi) MassTrails grants and other capital investments to advance trails 
364 of all kinds; and (vii) grants and other expenditures to support local, regional and state land use 
365 planning and management capabilities to advance smart growth efforts, which shall be pursuant 
366 to rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs to 

18 of 166 367 effectuate this item; provided, that funds may be used to provide grants to public and nonpublic 
368 entities and tribal governments to carry out this item; provided further, that not less than 
369 $5,500,000 shall be expended for the healthy soils program and the implementation of the 
370 Healthy Soils Action Plan; provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental 
371 affairs may provide guidance and expend funds for planning, prioritization, selection and 
372 implementation of projects in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and 
373 adaptation consistent with the Massachusetts Hazard Mitigation and Climate Adaptation Plan 
374 and in support of disadvantaged populations; and provided further, that all projects shall provide 
375 appropriate public access as determined by the secretary…………………..….$125,500,000 
376  2000-7083 For the design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 
377 retrofitting, repair or removal of coastal infrastructure, wave energy attenuation devices and 
378 resilience measures including, but not limited to, seawalls, jetties, revetments, retaining walls, 
379 port infrastructure, beach nourishment, living shorelines, nature-based research and 
380 demonstration projects, coastal lands and other nature-based solutions, which shall mean 
381 strategies that conserve, restore and employ the natural resources of the commonwealth to 
382 enhance climate adaptation, build resilience and support mitigation; provided, that costs payable 
383 from this item may include, but shall not be limited to, the costs of engineering and other 
384 technical assistance and planning services essential to these projects rendered by the office of 
385 coastal zone management in the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, the office 
386 of waterways in the department of conservation and recreation and other commonwealth 
387 employees or consultants; provided further, that grants and loans may be made to local 
388 government units to carry out this item; provided further, that grants may also be awarded to 
389 nonpublic entities for approved projects funded herein; provided further, that funds may be used 

19 of 166 390 on lands held by municipal, county, state or federal agencies or other governmental bodies on 
391 lands held by nonprofit conservation organizations or on private lands with the consent of the 
392 owner and subject to covenants that assure the continued presence and effectiveness of such 
393 projects for the expected life of the projects; provided further, that the use of such funds by 
394 county and municipal governmental bodies on lands held by nonprofit conservation 
395 organizations or on private lands, shall require, in a county, a vote of the county commissioners, 
396 in a city having a Plan D or Plan E charter, by a majority vote of all the members of the city 
397 council, in a city not having such a charter, by a majority vote of the city council, subject to the 
398 charter of that city, and in a town, by a majority vote of the selectboard; provided further, that the 
399 secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, 
400 selection and implementation of projects in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation 
401 and adaptation and consistent with the Massachusetts State Hazard Mitigation and Climate 
402 Change Adaptation; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended as grants 
403 to municipalities, institutions of higher education and other public and nonpublic entities to 
404 develop, identify, research, advance, secure permits and authorizations and deploy innovative 
405 means, methods, technologies and approaches for protecting and strengthening the resilience of 
406 the commonwealth's coastal shoreline, including beaches, marshes, dunes and public and private 
407 property and infrastructure; provided further, that grants may prioritize projects and proposals 
408 that include means, methods, technologies and approaches for protecting coastal resources that 
409 advance natural approaches including, but not limited to, thin-layer marsh deposition, living 
410 shorelines, vegetation, eradication of invasive plant and shellfish and any other relevant 
411 methodology; provided further, that funds may be used to assist municipalities, institutions of 
412 higher education and other public and nonpublic entities in securing any local, state or federal 

20 of 166 413 permits necessary to implement eligible coastal resilience projects; provided further, that funds 
414 from this item shall be in addition to any gifts, grants or appropriations obtained for the coastal 
415 resilience projects; provided further, that not less than $1,250,000 shall be expended to the New 
416 England Aquarium for coastal resiliency planning and development; provided further, that not 
417 less than $500,000 shall be expended for the establishment of an ocean acidification monitoring 
418 system which shall include, but not be limited to, providing monitoring hardware and technical 
419 training in the use of such monitoring hardware ..............................………….$231,750,000 
420  2000-7086 For the design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, retrofitting, 
421 repair or removal of municipally-owned dams, publicly-owned dams and other dams for which 
422 emergency action or hazard mitigation is required and for inland flood control projects and 
423 projects for related facilities and equipment including, but not limited to, seawalls, jetties, 
424 revetments, retaining walls, beach nourishment and other nature-based solutions on publicly-
425 owned land or related to state or municipal climate change adaptation and preparedness or for 
426 which emergency action or hazard mitigation is required; provided, that the secretary of energy 
427 and environmental affairs shall give priority to dams and flood control projects that pose the 
428 greatest risk to public health, public safety or the environment; provided further, that funds shall 
429 be made available for a program of planning, permitting and construction of fish ways and other 
430 aquatic habitat improvements. including the removal or breaching of selected dams and 
431 impoundments on commonwealth-owned land and waterways; provided further, that funds may 
432 be used for dam safety technical assistance; provided further, that funds may be used to provide 
433 grants to public and nonpublic entities to carry out this item; and provided further, that the 
434 secretary may provide guidance for planning, prioritization, selection and implementation of 

21 of 166 435 projects in furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation and consistent 
436 with the Massachusetts State Hazard Mitigation and Climate Change Adaptation…..$93,500,000 
437  2000-7087 For the acquisition of land and interests in land by the executive office of 
438 energy and environmental affairs and for associated costs including, but not limited to, planning, 
439 study, due diligence, title and appraisal services, site restoration, monitoring and stewardship 
440 including, but not limited to, acquisitions for open space, recreation, conservation, wildlife and 
441 endangered species protection and forest land protection and for related costs and activities in 
442 support of conservation goals; provided, that not more than $25,000,000 may be used to 
443 capitalize the Transfer of Development Rights Revolving Fund established in section 35HHH of 
444 chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided further, that funds from this item may be used to 
445 develop and implement a capital stewardship program on lands under the care and control of the 
446 executive office or its departments and divisions or subject to conservation restrictions or other 
447 related interests in land purchased through this item; provided further, that funds may be used for 
448 restoration, repair and reclamation of acquired land, including demolition of structures, removal 
449 of debris, eradication of nonnative species and other services essential to such reclamation 
450 efforts; and provided further, that the secretary of energy and environmental affairs may provide 
451 guidance and expend funds for preservation and acquisition of land and interests in land in 
452 furtherance of the goals of climate change mitigation and adaptation, consistent with the 
453 Massachusetts State Hazard Mitigation and Climate Adaptation Plan and in support of 
454 disadvantaged populations………………………………………………………….$85,000,000 
455  2000-7088 For the municipal vulnerability preparedness grant program to support and 
456 provide technical assistance for the political subdivisions of the commonwealth including, but 
457 not limited to, cities, towns, counties and districts, tribal governments, regional planning 

22 of 166 458 agencies, nonprofit organizations, or any authority, commission, board or instrumentality 
459 thereof, to complete climate-related vulnerability assessments, develop equitable, action-oriented 
460 resiliency plans and complete integrated climate change adaptation plans and local hazard 
461 mitigation plans and to implement local and regional adaptation solutions identified through such 
462 plans; provided, that such funds may be used on lands held by municipal, state or federal 
463 agencies, tribal governments or other governmental bodies, nonprofit organizations or on private 
464 lands with the consent of the owner and subject to covenants that shall assure the continued 
465 presence and effectiveness of such projects for the expected life of the projects; provided further, 
466 that the use of such funds by municipal governmental bodies on lands held by nonprofit 
467 organizations or on private lands shall require the vote of a majority of the grantee’s legislative 
468 body or board of directors or the equivalent thereof; provided further, that funds may be used to 
469 develop wastewater facility adaptation plans; provided further, that such funds may be used for 
470 the political subdivisions of the commonwealth including, but not limited to, cities, towns, 
471 counties and districts, tribal governments, regional planning agencies, nonprofit organization, or 
472 any authority, commission, board or instrumentality thereof, to appoint and retain coordinators to 
473 advance sustainability, resiliency and climate adaptation; provided further, that the program may 
474 prioritize low income and environmental justice communities; and provided further, that grants 
475 from this item shall only be awarded to eligible entities or projects in cities and towns that have 
476 been deemed in compliance or interim compliance with the multi-family zoning requirement in 
477 section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws; provided further, that not less than $10,000,000 
478 shall be expended to the city of Chelsea in coordination with the city of Everett for construction 
479 of the Island End River Flood Resilience Project to protect this critical industrial district from 
480 catastrophic flooding …………………………………………………………..$510,000,000 

23 of 166 481  2030-1011 For the replacement and purchase of environmental law enforcement 
482 vehicles and maritime law enforcement patrol vessels and accompanying equipment; provided, 
483 that funds may be expended for equipment purchased in conjunction with the operation of the 
484 environmental law enforcement vehicle and vessel fleet including, but not limited to, mobile data 
485 terminals, installation of mounts and multi-band radios, search and rescue equipment, boat 
486 trailers, engines, lower units, remotely-operated vehicles, portable side scan sonar, navigation 
487 systems and communication radios………………………………………………$9,000,000 
488  2000-7089 For local environmental, recreational, resiliency and preservation projects, 
489 provided, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the town of Groveland for site 
490 remediation and monitoring at the property formerly occupied by the former Valley 
491 Manufacturing Products Company; provided further, that not less than $1,250,000 shall be 
492 expended to the metropolitan area planning council, in coordination with the North Shore water 
493 resilience task force for costs associated with planning, feasibility analyses, environmental 
494 review, engineering, design, permitting and construction of water supply and distribution 
495 infrastructure improvements in the Ipswich river basin to increase the reliability of public water 
496 supplies and the environmental health of the Ipswich river; provided further, that not less than  
497 $5,000,000 shall be provided for the Springfield water and sewer commission to support the 
498 remediation and construction of the new West Parish water treatment plant in the city of 
499 Westfield; provided further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall be expended for repairs and 
500 improvements to the Lake avenue pumping station in the city of Worcester; provided further, 
501 that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the Upper Blackstone Clean Water District for 
502 infrastructure improvements; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended 
503 for improvements to culverts and floodplains in the Aberjona river watershed in the towns of 

24 of 166 504 Burlington, Lexington, Reading, Stoneham, Woburn and Winchester; provided further, that not 
505 less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the village of Gilbertville water district in the town of 
506 Hardwick for upgrades to the water system and infrastructure; provided further, that not less than 
507 $1,500,000 shall be expended to the Spencer water department for upgrades to the water system 
508 and infrastructure; provided further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be expended to the East 
509 Brookfield water department for upgrades to the water system and infrastructure; provided 
510 further, that not less than $2,000,000 shall be expended to the Regional Environmental Council, 
511 Inc. for the development of their center for urban agriculture and food security; provided further, 
512 that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the town of Berlin for the Berlin rail trail; 
513 provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the town of Bolton for 
514 improvements at the Bower Springs conservation area; provided further, that not less than 
515 $500,000 shall be expended to the town of Boylston for improvements at Manor Park; provided 
516 further, that not less than $200,000 shall be expended to the town of Northborough for 
517 infrastructure improvements around the Cold Harbor brook; provided further, that not less than 
518 $500,000 shall be expended to the town of West Boylston for improvements at Woodland park; 
519 provided further, that not less than $1,200,000 shall be expended to the city of Worcester for 
520 water main improvements; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended to 
521 the city of Fitchburg for dam upgrades; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be 
522 expended for water and sewer infrastructure improvements in the city of Greenfield; provided 
523 further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for cleanup, assessment, remediation or 
524 redevelopment of the former Lunt Silversmiths site on Federal street in the city of Greenfield; 
525 provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended for the design, repair, 
526 rehabilitation, reinforcement and fortification of the levee and other infrastructure or nature-

25 of 166 527 based solutions in the town of Hadley to mitigate flood risk from the Connecticut river; provided 
528 further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for design, engineering or improvements 
529 to flood control infrastructure in the city of Northampton; provided further, that not less than 
530 $500,000 shall be expended for the study, design and development of and improvements to trails 
531 and shared-use paths in the town of Sunderland and neighboring towns; provided further, that not 
532 less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the city of Gloucester for wastewater treatment plant 
533 improvements to improve effluent discharge quality; provided further, that not less than 
534 $250,000 shall be expended to the town of Ipswich for elevation work and improvements to 
535 Jeffrey’s Neck road in the town of Ipswich to improve its resilience and sustainability; provided 
536 further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be expended to the South Essex sewerage district for 
537 ongoing capital upgrade projects; provided further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be 
538 expended to the Salem and Beverly Water Supply Board for ongoing capital upgrade projects; 
539 provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the city of Lowell for 
540 permanent soil remediation, nature‑based stormwater solutions and new public amenities to 
541 improve environmental quality, public health and community resilience at Lowell Riverview 
542 park alongside the Merrimack river in the city; provided further, that not less than $2,250,000 
543 shall be expended to the city of Woburn for the rehabilitation of the North Woburn trunk sewer; 
544 provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the town of Billerica for 
545 roadway sustainability and resiliency improvements; provided further, that not less than 
546 $1,000,000 shall be expended to the town of Arlington for the reconstruction and improvements 
547 to the playing field and playground at Poet’s corner; provided further, that not less than $750,000 
548 shall be expended to the town of Arlington for improvements to mitigate flooding and bank 
549 erosion along upper Mill Brook; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be 

26 of 166 550 expended to the town of Dracut for environmental cleanup projects in the town; provided further, 
551 that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the town of Dunstable for a water main 
552 extension to provide a reliable public water supply to the Groton-Dunstable regional high school 
553 and surrounding properties impacted by PFAS contamination; provided further, that not less than 
554 $1,000,000 shall be expended to the town of Pepperell for remediation of ground soil 
555 contamination on town property in the town provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall 
556 be expended to the town of Tyngsborough for the replacement of the Dunstable road culvert in 
557 the town; provided further, that not less than $1,700,000 shall be expended to the town of 
558 Wellesley for the installation of solar panels at John D. Hardy elementary school; provided 
559 further, that not less than $3,300,000 shall be expended to the city of Newton for the Bullough’s 
560 pond dam project; provided further, that not less than $600,000 shall be expended for 
561 replacement efforts at the Clark's Island Wellfield pump station in the town of Milford; provided 
562 further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for well improvements in the town of 
563 Wrentham; provided further, that not less than $400,000 shall be expended to implement the 
564 farm pond watershed-based plan recommendations in the town of Sherborn; provided further, 
565 that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for a new water well in the town of Plainville; 
566 provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for a sewer connection to the 
567 department of correction septic system serving MCI-Norfolk in the town of Norfolk; provided, 
568 that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to purchase electric vehicles for the department of 
569 public works in the town of Needham; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be 
570 expended for the design of the PFAS improvement project for well #2 in the town of Medfield; 
571 provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the construction of the 
572 SNETT Trail extension in the city known as the town of Franklin; provided further, that not less 

27 of 166 573 than $500,000 shall be expended for the design, permitting and documentation for slope 
574 stabilization improvements along the Charles river in the town of Dover; provided further, that 
575 not less than $500,000 shall be expended to replace well #3 in the town of Bellingham; provided 
576 further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended to support projects in the city of Lynn 
577 related to the South harbor implementation plan, including, but not limited to, expanding access 
578 to the city’s waterfront and open spaces; provided further, that not less than $715,000 shall be 
579 expended to the town of Rockland for Cushing Brook culvert replacement including, but not 
580 limited to, design, permitting and construction; provided further, that not less than $712,500 shall 
581 be expended to the department of conservation and recreation for improvements to the Ames 
582 Nowell state park in the town of Abington including, but not limited to, the development of a 
583 master plan or the planning, design and engineering costs associated with the implementation of 
584 such plan; provided further, that not less than $712,500 shall be expended to the town of 
585 Holbrook for purposes including, but not limited to, design, engineering, construction, repair and 
586 maintenance of sewer and water infrastructure; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall 
587 be expended to North and South Rivers Watershed Association, Inc. for purposes including, but 
588 not limited to, a regional river center promoting access to the North river, water quality sampling 
589 analysis and recreational opportunities; provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be 
590 expended to the South Boston Community Health Center, Inc. for the acquisition of electric 
591 vehicle vans and the installation of associated charging infrastructure; provided further, that not 
592 less than $110,000 shall be expended to North and South Rivers Watershed Association, Inc. for 
593 purposes, including, but not limited to, community engagement during the Superfund process 
594 and permit-level designs for Indian Head river dam removals; provided further, that not less than 
595 $2,500,000 shall be expended to the Boston Water and Sewer Commission for projects in the 

28 of 166 596 South Boston and Dorchester sections of the city of Boston and for the reserve channel storm 
597 surge barrier in the South Boston section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less 
598 than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the Boston Children’s Museum for climate resiliency and 
599 preservation projects, including, but not limited to, renovations, improvements and construction 
600 and the modernization of facilities, infrastructure and equipment to address climate impacts 
601 along the Fort Point channel in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 
602 shall be expended for nature-based research and demonstration projects on the waterfront and 
603 Boston Harbor islands and for the expansion of the real-time monitoring project led by the Stone 
604 living lab, associated with the University of Massachusetts at Boston and in consultation with 
605 Boston Harbor Now, Inc., on coastal sites statewide; provided further, that not less than 
606 $500,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston for its office of climate resilience to conduct an 
607 independent environmental study of the area within a 1-mile radius of the solid waste transfer 
608 station located at 66 Norfolk avenue, which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) soil testing for 
609 contaminants, including heavy metals, volatile organic compounds, semi-volatile organic 
610 compounds, per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances and other contaminants associated with solid 
611 waste handling operations; (ii) groundwater and surface water testing, where applicable, to assess 
612 potential migration of contaminants and air deposition and particulate sampling to determine 
613 whether emissions from the facility are contributing to contamination in surrounding residential 
614 areas; and (iii) a review of historical site use, prior environmental violations and cumulative 
615 environmental impacts on the surrounding community, including environmental justice 
616 populations; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Piers Park Sailing 
617 Center, Inc. for the purpose of purchasing new sonar keelboats to continue to provide free and 
618 low-cost access to sailing and marine science education; provided further, that not less than 

29 of 166 619 $1,000,000 shall be expended to the Boston Housing Authority for climate mitigation and 
620 adaptation investments, including energy efficiency, insulation, electrical upgrades, heating, 
621 ventilation and air conditioning systems modernization, window air-source heat pumps, flood 
622 prevention and other energy efficiency updates to public properties in the city of Boston; 
623 provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere to 
624 implement the Shirley avenue tree planting master plan; provided further, that not less than 
625 $1,000,000 shall be expended to the city of Boston to implement and expand the triple decker 
626 retrofit pilot program or any successor programs to support energy efficiency, electrification and 
627 decarbonization improvements in triple decker residential properties located within 
628 environmental justice populations in the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than 
629 $500,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere to install and purchase solar panels at Revere 
630 high school; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the city of Revere 
631 for soil remediation at Gibson park boathouse; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 
632 shall be expended for the city of Pittsfield for repairs, equipment and upgrades to its secondary 
633 digester; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Revere public schools 
634 for HVAC upgrades for the redevelopment of the McKinley school; provided further, that not 
635 less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the office of climate resilience in the city of Boston, in 
636 consultation with the Boston public health commission and local community-based 
637 organizations, for the implementation of a Blue Hill avenue climate resilience and environmental 
638 justice corridor initiative which may include, but shall not be limited to, street tree planting and 
639 maintenance, green infrastructure, cool pavement and cool roof pilot programs, the expansion of 
640 shaded public spaces, air quality monitoring and pollution mitigation strategies along high-traffic 
641 areas; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to Berkshire 

30 of 166 642 Environmental Action Team, Inc. in the city of Pittsfield for the next phase of its capital 
643 renovations project; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to complete 
644 an adaptive recreation multiuse trail at Houghton’s pond recreation area located within the Blue 
645 Hills Reservation; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the 
646 Massachusetts office of Housatonic Valley Association, Inc. for capital investments in the share 
647 the road project to address vehicle collisions with large animals along the United States highway 
648 route 7 corridor in the county of Berkshire; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be 
649 expended to the town of Great Barrington, in consultation with Housatonic Water Works 
650 Company, for filtration and interconnection projects between the Great Barrington fire district 
651 water department and Housatonic Water Works Company; provided further, that not less than 
652 $1,000,000 shall be expended to the office of climate resilience in the city of Boston, in 
653 coordination with the Boston transportation department, the Boston public works department and 
654 the Boston public health commission, to implement climate resilience and environmental justice 
655 improvements along Cummins highway, including, but not limited to: (i) tree planting and long-
656 term canopy maintenance, green infrastructure, permeable pavement and stormwater 
657 management systems to mitigate flooding and extreme heat; (ii) installation of shaded pedestrian 
658 infrastructure, cooling elements and climate-resilient sidewalk and streetscape design to reduce 
659 urban heat island impacts and improve pedestrian safety and comfort; and (iii) air quality 
660 monitoring and pollution mitigation strategies, including the installation of real-time air quality 
661 sensors along the corridor to assess and address vehicular emissions exposure; provided further, 
662 that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for Roots Rising, Inc. for capital improvements at 
663 its farm and education center to support youth empowerment and food equity in the city of 
664 Pittsfield; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 will be expended to the town of 

31 of 166 665 Winthrop for the design, permit and construction of a new concrete seawall at Pico avenue to 
666 minimize flooding and protect the residential homes in the area; provided further, that not less 
667 than $1,000,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts Museum of Contemporary Art in the 
668 city of North Adams for the comprehensive redesign and renovation of the 24‑acre exterior 
669 campus to replace existing post‑industrial asphalt with an amenity‑rich, environmentally 
670 sustainable landscape that incorporates new and green technologies to enhance long‑term 
671 sustainability and resilience; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended to 
672 support energy efficiency, heating system upgrades, heat resiliency, stormwater management and 
673 related updates to the Doris Bunte apartments in the Roxbury section of the city of Boston; 
674 provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended to the town of Belchertown for the 
675 development of a river walk on the Swift river; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall 
676 be expended to the city of North Adams for environmental remediation and brownfield 
677 redevelopment at the former Windsor mill and North Adams redevelopment authority sites; 
678 provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the town of Williamstown for 
679 river bank stabilization projects along the Hoosic river; provided further, that not less than 
680 $250,000 shall be expended to Berkshire Agricultural Ventures, Inc. for capital improvements to 
681 a centralized agricultural hub to address regional processing and scale food distribution in the 
682 county of Berkshire; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the tree 
683 committee in the city known as the town of Winthrop for planting trees to reduce heat island 
684 effects and combat climate change and soil erosion; provided further, that not less than 
685 $3,250,000 shall be expended to the town of South Hadley for wastewater treatment plant and 
686 pump station rebuilds and refurbishment; provided further, that not less than $1,600,000 shall be 
687 expended to the town of Palmer for repairs and replacement of the West Ware road culvert and 

32 of 166 688 Bacon road culvert; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the 
689 Berkshire Natural Resources Council, Inc. in the town of Lenox for capital investments that 
690 support the development of universally accessible trails within the county of Berkshire; provided 
691 further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts Municipal Wholesale 
692 Electric Company for a feasibility and design study on the rehabilitation or replacement of its 
693 headquarters in the town of Ludlow; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be 
694 expended in equal amounts to the city of Newburyport and the towns of Salisbury and Newbury 
695 to address coastal erosion; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the 
696 town of West Bridgewater to construct and install a herring fish ladder at the War Memorial 
697 park; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended to the town of 
698 Bridgewater for water and sewer improvements; provided further, that not less than $2,000,000 
699 shall be expended to the town of Easton for the design and construction of the Easton industrial 
700 park sewer project and related water infrastructure; provided further, that not less than 
701 $1,000,000 shall be expended for the long term maintenance of the dam located at Weld pond in 
702 the town of Dedham; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the city 
703 of Boston for the repair, maintenance and improvement of historic boathouse located at Jamaica 
704 pond; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts 
705 Water Resources Authority and the cities of Cambridge and Somerville to design, permit and 
706 construct climate-resilient sewer separation, storage and conveyance improvements to reduce 
707 untreated combined sewer overflows at Alewife brook in the cities of Cambridge and 
708 Somerville; provided further, that not less than $750,000 shall be expended to the town of 
709 Bedford for the maintenance and development of culverts and drainage improvements at Fern's 
710 way and Old Billerica road; provided further, that not less than $600,000 shall be expended to 

33 of 166 711 the town of Carlisle for the replacement of roof-top HVAC units with all electric air-source heat 
712 pumps at the public school complex and town hall; provided further, that not less than $75,000 
713 shall be expended to the town of Chelmsford for the assessment of flooding in watershed area 
714 #5, development of a drainage area model and removal of overgrowth, sediment and debris; 
715 provided further, that not less than $90,000 shall be expended to the town of Chelmsford for the 
716 assessment of flooding in watershed area #6, development of a drainage area model and 
717 documentation of the condition of the storm drain along Lantern lane; provided further, that not 
718 less than $75,000 shall be expended to the town of Chelmsford for a comprehensive lake 
719 management study of Heart pond; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended 
720 to the town of Chelmsford for planting 50 trees within the town’s open space areas; provided 
721 further, that not less than $750,000 shall be expended to the town of Concord for the design and 
722 construction of a culvert replacement at Barrett’s Mill road along Spencer brook; provided 
723 further, that not less than $510,000 shall be expended to The Walden Woods Project for the 
724 purchase of a conservation restriction from the town of Concord for a 35 acre municipal site 
725 bordering the Walden pond state reservation; provided further, that not less than $750,000 shall 
726 be expended to the town of Lexington for the development of a solar canopy at the composting 
727 facility on Hartwell avenue; provided further, that not less than $600,000 shall be expended to 
728 the city of Waltham for the rehabilitation and partial replacement of the Sibley brook drainage 
729 culvert in the Fiske avenue, Cabot street and Boynton street neighborhood; provided further, that 
730 not less than $750,000 shall be expended to the town of Weston for culvert replacements along 
731 Cherry brook from Warren avenue to Conant road; provided further, that not less than 
732 $1,800,000 shall be expended to Three Bays Preservation, Inc., d/b/a/ the Barnstable Clean 
733 Water Coalition, for a cranberry bog restoration project in the town of Barnstable to restore 

34 of 166 734 natural wetlands to mitigate nitrogen pollution; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000  
735 shall be expended to the town of Kingston for costs associated with the construction of a new 
736 well for drinking water and fire protection in the high zone of the town; provided further, that not 
737 less than $1,200,000 shall be expended to the town of Eastham for design, permitting and 
738 construction of wastewater mitigation infrastructure to improve water quality and reduce nutrient 
739 pollution in Salt pond; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the 
740 town of Chatham for design, permitting and construction of wastewater mitigation infrastructure 
741 and waterflow restoration infrastructure to improve water quality and reduce nutrient pollution in 
742 Frost Fish creek; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the 
743 University of Massachusetts at Boston for the Nantucket field station to expand capacity for 
744 student learning, climate research and partnerships to enhance the field station as a regional hub 
745 for coastal resilience and environmental innovation; provided further, that not less than $350,000 
746 shall be expended to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs for the installation 
747 of United States Coast Guard-approved life ring cabinets at various public saltwater access 
748 locations throughout the waterfront of the South Boston section of the city of Boston including, 
749 but not limited to, the Fort Point channel; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be 
750 expended for park and accessibility improvements at Reggie Wong memorial park in the 
751 Chinatown section of the city of Boston; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be 
752 expended to the Boston Chinatown Post 328, the American Legion Inc. for a Chinese American 
753 veterans memorial in the Chinatown section of the city of Boston on a portion of the Rose 
754 Fitzgerald Kennedy Greenway; provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be expended 
755 to erect a memorial dedicated to the Vietnamese diaspora in the Dorchester section of the city of 
756 Boston; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the Marine Biological 

35 of 166 757 Laboratory in the town of Falmouth for costs associated with the beach and dune restoration at 
758 Stoney beach located in Woods Hole in the town of Falmouth; provided further, that not less 
759 than $2,000,000 shall be expended to the city of Chicopee for improvements to the Jones Ferry 
760 flood control pumping station; provided further, that not less than $1,00,000 shall be expended to 
761 the town of Pembroke for water main replacement projects to ensure reliable access to clean 
762 water for residents; provided, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the town of 
763 Sandwich for improvements including replacing the undersized culvert under Jones road and 
764 restoring 34 associated acres; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to 
765 the town of Plymouth for the Downtown Resiliency Project for purposes including addressing 
766 stormwater runoff and urban heat islands; provided further, that not less than $1,250,000 shall be 
767 expended to the Merrimack Valley Planning Commission for projects, equipment and other costs 
768 associated with improving and maintaining the health of the Merrimack river and its watershed 
769 including, but not limited to, dam removal or modification, monitoring, acquiring tests and 
770 analytical equipment and supplies, modeling, combined sewer overflow reduction project 
771 planning, design, construction, nonpoint source pollution identification and elimination and 
772 infiltration and inflow reduction and elimination efforts; provided further, that not less than 
773 $2,000,000 shall be expended to the city of Springfield for costs associated with improvements 
774 to Riverside road; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the city of 
775 Springfield for costs associated with improvements to roadways in Blunt park; provided further, 
776 that not less than $900,000 shall be expended for repairs to the Hamilton Reservoir dam in the 
777 town of Holland, a department of conservation and recreation designated high hazard dam used 
778 for flood control and watershed management; provided further, that not less than $4,100,000 
779 shall be expended for a water main project in the city known as the town of Southbridge along 

36 of 166 780 Airport Access road and Pleasant street; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be 
781 expended to the city of Attleboro for the continued maintenance and restoration efforts of the 
782 Capron park zoo in the city of Attleboro; provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be 
783 expended to the division of capital asset management and maintenance for study, design, 
784 accessibility improvements and preservation of natural land, recreation areas and waterfront 
785 among 166 acres alongside Reservoir pond in the town of Canton for the use of patients and 
786 students at Pappas Rehabilitation Hospital for Children and for safe, accessible recreation and 
787 rehabilitation activities in a natural setting; provided further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall 
788 be expended to the city of Brockton for revitalization and restoration infrastructure projects at 
789 D.W. Field park, including, but not limited to, reconstruction of the parkway with permeable 
790 materials, installation of green drainage solutions to mitigate road runoff and stabilization of 
791 eroded embankments; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the city 
792 of Taunton for the treatment and management of non-native aquatic vegetation and for water 
793 quality improvement and ecological restoration of lake Sabbatia, including, but not limited to, 
794 invasive species mitigation, nutrient management and long-term lake management efforts; 
795 provided further, that not less than $2,500,000 shall be expended to the town of Raynham for the 
796 replacement of the Pine street culvert to improve stormwater flow, enhance climate resiliency, 
797 restore aquatic connectivity and protect public safety and access for residents; provided further, 
798 that not less than $1,465,000 shall be expended to the town of Marion for improvements to the 
799 water pollution control facility to achieve compliance with federally-mandated total phosphorus 
800 discharge limits, including, but not limited to, chemical precipitation systems, process upgrades, 
801 infrastructure improvements and related construction and engineering costs; provided further, 
802 that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for land conservation projects carried out by land 

37 of 166 803 trusts serving the town of Seekonk for the acquisition, preservation and stewardship of open 
804 space and natural resources; provided further, that not less than $110,000 shall be expended to 
805 the town of Carver for the installation of a second drinking water well at the town hall complex 
806 to provide redundancy and ensure a reliable public water supply; provided further, that not less 
807 than $50,000 shall be expended for land conservation projects carried out by land trusts serving 
808 the town of Middleborough for the acquisition, preservation and stewardship of open space and 
809 natural resources; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for land 
810 conservation projects carried out by land trusts serving the town of Marion for the acquisition, 
811 preservation and stewardship of open space and natural resources; provided further, that not less 
812 than $50,000 shall be expended for land conservation projects carried out by land trusts serving 
813 the town of Rehoboth for the acquisition, preservation and stewardship of open space and natural 
814 resources; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for land conservation 
815 projects carried out by land trusts serving the town of Raynham for the acquisition, preservation 
816 and stewardship of open space and natural resources; provided further, that not less than $50,000 
817 shall be expended for land conservation projects carried out by land trusts serving the town of 
818 Dighton for the acquisition, preservation and stewardship of open space and natural resources; 
819 provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended for land conservation projects 
820 carried out by land trusts serving the town of Berkley for the acquisition, preservation and 
821 stewardship of open space and natural resources; provided further, that not less than $75,000 
822 shall be expended to the town of Wareham for water quality improvement and ecological 
823 restoration of the publicly owned Agawam Mill pond, including, but not limited to, nutrient 
824 management and invasive species mitigation, which may be carried out in partnership with local 
825 nonprofit organizations; provided further, that not less than $80,000 shall be expended to the city 

38 of 166 826 of Brockton for installation of educational and wayfinding signage, repair of small pedestrian 
827 footbridges and removal and mitigation of invasive species at D.W. Field park; provided further, 
828 that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the town of Fairhaven for site restoration to 
829 secure and demolish the former Atlas Tack facility located in the town; provided further, that not 
830 less than $500,000 shall be expended to the town of Acushnet to support its open space and 
831 recreation plan, including, but not limited to, community farming, outdoor concerts, walking 
832 trails and playground facilities; provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended 
833 for Dartmouth Cultural Center, Inc. to preserve and repair the Old Southworth library in the town 
834 of Dartmouth to continue serving as a community hub of art and creativity; provided further, that 
835 not less than $500,000 shall be expended to the town of Mattapoisett to replace a culvert along 
836 Water street to improve water quality conditions; provided further, that not less than $200,000 
837 shall be expended for People Acting in Community Endeavors, Inc. to support equitable access 
838 to nutritious local food including, but not limited, to locally-sourced New Bedford seafood; 
839 provided further, that not less than $500,000 be expended to Blue Hill Observatory & Science 
840 Center, Inc. for development and repairs to outdoor infrastructure; provided further, that not less 
841 than $3,000,000 shall be expended for the restoration of the historic Congdon-Lucas House in 
842 the city of New Bedford in partnership with Buzzards Bay Coalition, Inc., Community Boating 
843 Center, Inc. and Youth Opportunities Unlimited, Inc. to develop a public recreational hub within 
844 Hazelwood park to provide access to local beaches, bike trails, kayaking and community sailing; 
845 provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended to the city of Brockton, the city 
846 known as the town of Randolph and the town of Whitman to implement a multi-year program for 
847 canopy expansion, including, but not limited to, the development and growth of municipal tree 
848 inventories, community-led street tree planting campaigns, the purchase and maintenance of 

39 of 166 849 watering bags and equipment of early sapling care, the retrofit of concrete sidewalks to create 
850 sustainable tree pits and long-term municipal arborist contracts; provided further, that not less 
851 than $230,000 shall be expended to the towns of East Bridgewater, Halifax and Whitman for the 
852 purchase of electric motor vehicles and the purchase and installation of public Level 2 electric 
853 vehicle charging stations at key municipal hubs; provided further, that not less than $150,000 
854 shall be expended to the town of Rockport for the planning, design and construction of repairs to 
855 Granite pier; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended  to the towns of East 
856 Bridgewater and Whitman for the engineering and removal of structural barriers, replacement of 
857 damaged or deficient culverts, native plant installation and bank stabilization along the Town 
858 river, Satucket river and Meadow brook; provided further, that not less than $1,150,000 shall be 
859 expended to the city of Holyoke for a new biosolids dewatering system to assist in wastewater 
860 operations; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the town of 
861 Montgomery for culvert replacement and improvements on Main road; provided further, that not 
862 less than $750,000 shall be expended to the city known as the town of Agawam for culvert 
863 replacement and improvements on Adams street; provided further, that not less than $750,000 
864 shall be expended to the city of Easthampton for the design and construction of the Lower Mill 
865 Pond bridge to protect water boundaries and reduce traffic congestion; provided further, that not 
866 less than $550,000 shall be expended to the city of Westfield for culvert replacement and 
867 improvements on Bates road; provided further, that not less than $800,000 shall be expended to 
868 the city known as the town of West Springfield for the reconstruction of the Prospect avenue 
869 bridge to expand access to the New England National Scenic Trail; provided further, that not less 
870 than $1,000,000 shall be expended to the Fall River fire department to support asbestos 
871 abatement and environmental remediation at fire stations in the city of Fall River; provided 

40 of 166 872 further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall be expended to the water department in the town of 
873 Somerset for upgrades and improvements to the town wastewater treatment plant and water 
874 pollution control facilities; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for 
875 necessary capital upgrades for the town dock in the town of Westport including, but not limited 
876 to, the harbormaster facility; provided further, that not less than $3,000,000 shall be expended to 
877 the town of Swansea for dredging efforts and beach nourishment along the Cole river; and 
878 provided further, not less than $5,000,000 shall be expended for environmental remediation in 
879 the city of Framingham to support economic development ……………………$179,810,000 
880  2000-7090 For capital grants or other financial assistance related to the planning, 
881 technical assistance, design, construction, installation or expansion, or a combination thereof, of 
882 clean thermal energy systems and related infrastructure on public property; provided, that funds 
883 may be used for the retrofitting of one or more buildings to support connections to clean thermal 
884 energy systems and related infrastructure with the consent of the owner of any such 
885 buildings……………………………………………………………………$15,000,000 
886  SECTION 2D. 
887  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS  
888  Massachusetts Department of Agricultural Resources 
889  2500-7022 For capital programs designed to address agricultural economic and 
890 environmental sustainability and resiliency including, but not limited to, the development and 
891 implementation of farm viability plans and other technical and engineering assistance, urban 
892 agriculture and hydroponics, and to facilitate improvements to agricultural infrastructure, energy 
893 conservation and efficiency and climate change adaptation and resiliency; provided, that funds 

41 of 166 894 may be expended for infrastructure and equipment upgrades to prevent or reduce food safety 
895 risk, combat invasive and disease-borne insects and for capital programs to support aquaculture, 
896 anaerobic digesters and agricultural composters; provided further, that funds may be expended 
897 for capital projects that foster the adoption of sustainable farming practices that enhance 
898 resilience, reduce greenhouse gas emissions and promote environmental stewardship; provided 
899 further, that funds may be expended on programs that support the commonwealth’s farmland 
900 protection and access goals; provided further, that funds may be expended to provide grants, 
901 technical assistance and other support to farms, public and nonpublic entities and tribal 
902 governments to support the agricultural economy and to enable recovery from natural disasters, 
903 market disruptions and other financial challenges; and provided further, that funds may be 
904 allocated by the commissioner through competitive grants pursuant to rules and regulations 
905 promulgated by the commissioner to implement this item…………..……….….$26,000,000 
906  2511-0124 For food security grant programs to support equitable access to nutritious, 
907 local food and to strengthen food supply and distribution systems; provided, that programs may 
908 consider the unique needs of rural and urban areas and gateway municipalities as defined in 
909 section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws to provide greater access to local food; provided 
910 further, that programs may provide grants that support food banks and other parts of the food 
911 distribution system by expanding services; provided further, that funds may be used to provide 
912 grants to public and nonpublic entities and tribal governments to carry out this item which may 
913 include, but shall not be limited to, farms, retailers, fisheries, food system businesses, food 
914 distributors, food processors, food banks, farm stands, food hubs, food retailers, elder services 
915 and community-supported agriculture farms; and provided further, that not less than $7,500,000 

42 of 166 916 shall be expended for the Massachusetts Food Trust Program established in section 65 of chapter 
917 23A of the General Laws………………..$132,500,000 
918  2511-0125  For a program to acquire land or interests in land for the purpose of 
919 preserving agricultural land, including agricultural preservation restrictions under sections 23 to 
920 26, inclusive, of chapter 20 of the General Laws; provided, that funds may be expended for 
921 associated acquisition and implementation costs including, but not limited to, grants, planning, 
922 due diligence, title examinations, appraisal services, site restoration and capital improvements on 
923 nonpublic lands subject to those agricultural preservation restrictions and on state-owned lands 
924 leased for agricultural purposes…………………………………………………..$42,000,000 
925  SECTION 2E. 
926  OFFICE OF THE TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL 
927  0640-1008  For the water pollution abatement trust established in section 2 of chapter 
928 29C of the General Laws for deposit in the Water Pollution Abatement Revolving Fund 
929 established in section 2L of chapter 29 of the General Laws for application by the trust to the 
930 purposes specified in section 5 of said chapter 29C, any portion of which may be used as a 
931 matching grant by the commonwealth to federal capitalization grants received under Title VI of 
932 the Clean Water Act or for deposit in the Drinking Water Revolving Fund established in section 
933 2QQ of said chapter 29 for application by the trust to the purposes specified in section 18 of said 
934 chapter 29C, any portion of which may be used as a matching grant by the commonwealth to 
935 federal capitalization grants received under the Safe Drinking Water Act; provided, that funds 
936 may be used to assist homeowners in complying with 310 CMR 15.00 for subsurface disposal of 
937 sanitary waste; provided further, that funds may be used to assist with per-and polyfluoroalkyl 

43 of 166 938 substances contamination remediation and the remediation of nitrogen-sensitive areas as 
939 designated by the department of environmental protection; and provided further, that not less 
940 than $50,000,000 shall be expended for projects identified by the special commission established 
941 in section 72 to address wastewater infrastructure needs and reduce nitrogen pollution in 
942 southeastern Massachusetts near Buzzards Bay…………………………………..$450,000,000 
943  SECTION 2F. 
944  EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE 
945  Office of the Secretary 
946  1100-2524 For grants to cities, towns, tribal governments, regional organizations 
947 whose membership is exclusively composed of municipal governments, municipal 
948 redevelopment authorities or agencies and other state agencies or quasi-governmental agencies to 
949 support capital investments that support climate mitigation, adaption, resiliency and recovery 
950 efforts in the commonwealth; provided, that purposes may include, but shall not be limited to, 
951 planning and studies, preparation of plans and specifications, site assembly and preparation, 
952 dispositions, acquisitions, repairs, renovations, improvements, construction, demolition, 
953 remediation, modernization and reconstruction of facilities, infrastructure, equipment and other 
954 capital assets……………………………………………………………………….$50,000,000 
955  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY 
956  Department of Fire Services 
957  8324-0102 For a grant program to support the development, testing and purchase of 
958 per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance-free firefighter turnout gear that meets or exceeds the 

44 of 166 959 standards established in section 245 of chapter 111 of the General Laws; provided, that funds 
960 may be used to support the development and testing of new materials and designs for turnout 
961 gear that reduce inherent firefighting dangers including, but not limited to, enhanced protection 
962 against primary and secondary exposure to particulates and byproducts of combustion and 
963 reduced maintenance that includes contamination resistance and greater ease of cleaning for any 
964 new technical fabrics or designs; provided further, that funds may be used for the disposal of 
965 turnout gear which contains per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances but is no longer in use; and 
966 provided further, that the department of fire services may reimburse cities and towns that have 
967 previously expended public funds on the purchase of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance-free 
968 firefighter gear that meets or exceeds the requirements of said section 245 of said chapter 111 
969 ………………………………………………………………………….…..$25,000,000 
970  SECTION 2G. 
971  EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES 
972  Office of the Secretary 
973  7004-4785 For the Massachusetts Housing Finance Agency established in section 3 of 
974 chapter 708 of the acts of 1966 to capitalize a permanent, revolving residential production 
975 momentum fund for the purpose of accelerating the development of mixed-income and 
976 workforce multifamily housing production projects by providing financial assistance in the form 
977 of innovative, low-cost and flexible capital funding, which may be in the form of debt, equity, or 
978 other instruments, depending on individual underwriting needs of the project; provided, that not 
979 less than 20 per cent of the units in a project that receives financial assistance under this item 
980 shall be restricted to households with incomes between 60 per cent and 120 per cent, inclusive, 

45 of 166 981 of the area median income; provided further, that notwithstanding paragraph (f) of section 5 of 
982 said chapter 708, the agency may in its discretion set the terms and prepayment options for any 
983 mortgage or other loan or instrument issued to any project receiving such financial assistance 
984 based on the individual underwriting needs of the project; provided further, that such financial 
985 assistance shall be awarded in a manner that promotes geographic equity; provided further, that 
986 funds expended from this item shall, to the maximum extent feasible, be prioritized for projects 
987 that comply with decarbonization and sustainability standards; provided further, that 
988 prioritization shall be determined through objective scoring criteria in the Qualified Allocation 
989 Plan developed by the executive office of housing and livable communities; provided further, 
990 that for new construction projects, the standards set forth in the commonwealth’s Opt-in 
991 Specialized Energy Code under 225 CMR 22.00 and 23.00 and the Enterprise Green 
992 Communities standards shall be the applicable standards for prioritization; provided further, that 
993 any project proposing less than full compliance with those standards shall provide detailed 
994 analysis demonstrating why full compliance would render the project infeasible notwithstanding 
995 utilization of all available federal and state incentives, including rebates and tax credits; provided 
996 further, that for retrofits of existing units, prioritization shall be given to projects that include 
997 energy efficiency and electrification decarbonization measures including, but not limited to, 
998 electric or ground source heat pumps, net-zero developments, Passive House Institute 
999 certification or an equivalent energy efficiency certification and all-electric buildings and 
1000 projects that incorporate green, sustainable and climate-resilient elements; and provided further, 
1001 that projects that include lower embodied carbon construction materials and methods shall be 
1002 further prioritized……………………………………………………………. $50,000,000 

46 of 166 1003  SECTION 3. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
1004 35PP, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following 
1005 section:- 
1006  Section 35PP. (a) There shall be a Salisbury Beach Preservation Trust Fund which shall 
1007 be administered by the department of conservation and recreation for the long-term preservation 
1008 and maintenance of the Salisbury beach and dune system. 
1009  (b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) surcharges authorized by subsection (e); (ii) 
1010 revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court and specifically 
1011 designated to be credited to the fund; (iii) funds from public or private sources, including gifts, 
1012 grants, donations, rebates and settlements received by the commonwealth that are specifically 
1013 designated to be credited to the fund; and (iv) interest earned on any money in the fund. 
1014  (c) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended without further appropriation for: (i) 
1015 the acquisition of sand for the restoration and stabilization of Salisbury beach and the public 
1016 areas of the protective dune system abutting Salisbury beach; (ii) the acquisition, installation and 
1017 maintenance of dune stabilization plants and sand fencing; and (iii) funding beach nourishment 
1018 and dune stabilization and restoration projects, in whole or in part, or providing local or state 
1019 matching funds for coastal resilience projects by other governmental or nongovernmental 
1020 entities. 
1021  (d) The unexpended balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall remain available 
1022 for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the 
1023 fund to be in deficit at any point. 

47 of 166 1024  (e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
1025 conservation and recreation shall impose a surcharge of $4 upon each fee charged and collected 
1026 from admission into, camping and parking in the Salisbury beach reservation. The additional 
1027 money collected from the surcharge shall be deposited into the fund. 
1028  (f) Annually, not later than March 1, the department of conservation and recreation shall 
1029 report on the activities of the fund for the preceding calendar year which shall include, but not 
1030 limited to: (i) a summary of projects undertaken, expenditures made and income received by the 
1031 fund; (ii) a list of detailed, itemized summaries of executed projects; and (iii) visitor traffic data. 
1032 The report shall be submitted to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and to the 
1033 senate and house committees on ways and means. 
1034  (g) The department of conservation and recreation shall, biennially, update the Salisbury 
1035 beach state reservation barrier beach management plan which shall include a long-term disaster 
1036 prevention and recovery plan and an operational plan for the day-to-day management and 
1037 maintenance of the beach. 
1038  SECTION 4. Section 35BBB of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
1039 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the figure “$1” and inserting in 
1040 place thereof the following figure:- “$2”. 
1041  SECTION 5. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
1042 section 35TTT the following 2 sections:- 
1043  Section 35UUU. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
1044 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund to be known as the Quabbin Host 
1045 Community Trust Fund. The fund shall be administered by the secretary of energy and 

48 of 166 1046 environmental affairs and shall be used to support the services, public safety and development of 
1047 municipalities within the Quabbin Reservoir watershed, as defined by the department of 
1048 conservation and recreation, including, but not limited to, lands authorized to be taken under 
1049 chapter 321 of the acts of 1927 or any successor statute granting the taking of land for a similar 
1050 purpose.  
1051  (b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money 
1052 authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds 
1053 from public or private sources, including gifts, grants, donations, rebates and settlements 
1054 received by the commonwealth that are specifically designated to be credited to the fund; and 
1055 (iii) interest earned on any money in the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended 
1056 without further appropriations and the unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year 
1057 shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the 
1058 fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit at any point.  
1059  (c) The secretary, in consultation with the several select boards of the municipalities 
1060 within the Quabbin Reservoir watershed, shall establish rules and regulations for the 
1061 administration of the fund. 
1062  (d) Annually, not later than October 1, the secretary shall file with the clerks of the senate 
1063 and house of representatives and the house and senate committees on ways and means a report of 
1064 the fund’s activities, including but not limited to expenditures made and income received by the 
1065 fund. 
1066  Section 35VVV. (a) There shall be a Manuel F. Correllus State Forest Trust Fund. The 
1067 fund shall be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs and shall be used 

49 of 166 1068 to advance recreational, educational and conservation interests within the forest complex 
1069 including, but not limited to, the construction and maintenance of facilities and infrastructure 
1070 improvements. 
1071  (b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money 
1072 authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds 
1073 from public or private sources, including gifts, grants, donations, rebates and settlements 
1074 received by the commonwealth that are specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (iii) all 
1075 fees generated by permits, licenses and easements and all other agreements not currently being 
1076 directed to the General Fund relating to the use of the forest complex land; and (iv) interest 
1077 earned on any money in the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended without 
1078 further appropriation and the unexpended balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall 
1079 remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund 
1080 shall cause the fund to be in deficit at any point. 
1081  (c) Annually, not later than October 1, the secretary shall file with the clerks of the senate 
1082 and house of representatives and the house and senate committees on ways and means a report of 
1083 the fund’s activities including, but not limited to, expenditures made and income received by the 
1084 fund. 
1085  SECTION 6. Section 48 of said chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
1086 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- The fund shall be for the 
1087 purpose of supporting, through grant programs, dairy farms registered pursuant to chapter 94. 

50 of 166 1088  SECTION 7. Section 6C of chapter 20 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
1089 amended by striking out, in line 3, the figure “18” and inserting in place thereof the following 
1090 figure:- 20. 
1091  SECTION 8. Said section 6C of said chapter 20, as so appearing, is hereby further 
1092 amended by inserting after the word “affairs”, in line 19, the following words:- ; 1 of whom shall 
1093 be the director of the division of marine fisheries or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the director 
1094 of the University of Massachusetts center for agriculture, food and the environment or a 
1095 designee. 
1096  SECTION 9. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
1097 section 2G the following section:-  
1098  Section 2H. (a) The commissioner of conservation and recreation shall consider land 
1099 under the care and control of the department for potential designation and long-term passive 
1100 management as a forest reserve and shall recommend designation of land as a forest reserve; 
1101 provided, however, that such designation shall: (i) contribute to carbon sequestration and storage 
1102 as part of the commonwealth’s climate mitigation strategy; (ii) allow forest habitats to mature 
1103 and develop over time without human intervention in ecological processes as part of a holistic, 
1104 statewide, biodiversity conservation strategy; (iii) maintain connections between natural 
1105 landscape blocks and species movement corridors; (iv) allow for passive outdoor recreation; and 
1106 (v) facilitate ecological research, comparative studies of forest dynamics and long-term 
1107 monitoring to evaluate reserves as compared to other land management approaches. 
1108  (b) The commissioner, with the approval of a simple majority of the stewardship council 
1109 members present at a duly called meeting of the council, may designate land under the care and 

51 of 166 1110 control of the department as a forest reserve. Forest reserves shall be managed consistent with 
1111 such designation, unless the commissioner, with the approval of not less than a two-thirds 
1112 majority of the council present at a duly called meeting of the council, and with the approval of 
1113 the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, de-designates such land.  
1114  (c) Designation or de-designation of land as a forest reserve shall constitute an 
1115 administrative designation and shall not constitute a change to the care, custody, control, use or 
1116 classification of the land or cause the disposal of land or an interest in land.  
1117  (d) The department shall passively manage forest reserves with minimal interference to 
1118 the natural ecology of the land. Forest reserves shall not be managed for production of timber or 
1119 natural resources. After consultation with a forest reserve science and technical advisory 
1120 committee to be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, the 
1121 department may actively manage or make restorations to: (i) support ecological functions; (ii) 
1122 control pests, pathogens and invasive species; (iii) restore water and wetland resources; (iv) 
1123 protect public safety; or (v) address other unforeseen circumstances. The department may 
1124 undertake such other management actions as may be required by law. 
1125  Regulated hunting and trapping, conversion or removal of plantations, maintenance or 
1126 repair of existing roads, trails and administrative access points, preservation of historic and 
1127 cultural resources, removal of immediate threats to public safety, selective understory invasive 
1128 plant control and monitoring and research activities shall be permitted within forest reserves.  
1129  SECTION 10. Said chapter 21 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 3G 
1130 the following section:- 

52 of 166 1131  Section 3H. (a) The commissioner of conservation and recreation may promulgate rules 
1132 and regulations for: (i) the management and use of all property under the control of the 
1133 department including all roads and highways wholly or in part within the boundaries of such 
1134 property, including rules and regulations relative to hunting and fishing, except in great ponds, 
1135 not inconsistent with the laws protecting fish, birds, mammals and quadrupeds; (ii) the 
1136 management and use of the Charles river, Mystic river and Neponset river; provided that no such 
1137 rule or regulation shall affect the water rights of any person, including, but not limited to, a mill 
1138 owner; and (iii) the care, maintenance, protection and policing of the Charles river basin as 
1139 defined in section 2 of chapter 524 of the acts of 1909 and amendments thereto; provided that no 
1140 such rule or regulation shall impair freight traffic. Such rules and regulations may provide for the 
1141 payment of fees and other charges for the parking of vehicles and for the enjoyment of other 
1142 special privileges within the territory under such control. 
1143  No such rule or regulation shall prohibit the use of passenger or station wagon type motor 
1144 vehicles with a gross weight of not more than 5,000 pounds and which are registered for 
1145 commercial use, on ways, parkways or boulevards where non-commercial passenger-type motor 
1146 vehicles are permitted to operate.  
1147  The commissioner may enter into and issue agreements, licenses and permits for 
1148 recreational and other uses, and grant concessions for the sale of refreshments and other articles 
1149 and the furnishing of services on department property which they deem compatible and 
1150 consistent with this section and Article XCVII of the amendments to the Constitution; provided, 
1151 however, that such agreements, licenses and permits shall be for periods not exceeding 10 years 
1152 and shall be in writing. 

53 of 166 1153  (b) A violation of such a rule or regulation shall be punished by a fine of not more than 
1154 $500 and each day a violation continues, including the unauthorized or unpermitted use and 
1155 occupation of department property, shall constitute a separate violation.  
1156  (c) The commissioner may authorize, in writing, non-criminal enforcement by 
1157 department staff of department rules and regulations relating to parking under this section.  
1158  A police officer employed by a city or town in whose boundaries department property is 
1159 located shall have all the same powers within any such department property and the power to 
1160 enforce the laws of the commonwealth and the rules and regulations of the department as 
1161 applicable to such property. 
1162  (d) Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, revenue from any 
1163 fines or penalties recovered for violation under this section shall be accounted for by the clerk of 
1164 the court of jurisdiction and forwarded to the department of conservation and recreation to be 
1165 deposited as revenue. 
1166  (e) The department may assess a civil administrative penalty of not more than $1,000 per 
1167 day for the continuing violation of any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this section, 
1168 including: (i) the use, occupation or alteration of department property without written 
1169 authorization as required by the department or for noncompliance with any such written 
1170 authorization; (ii) defacing department property; (iii) littering; (iv) disposing of household or 
1171 commercial garbage or refuse in a trash barrel on department property; and (v) requirements for 
1172 cleanup of pet waste and the leashing of dogs in any area not designated for off-leash dogs. Each 
1173 day a violation continues shall constitute a separate violation. The remedies provided in this 
1174 paragraph shall be available in addition to any other penalties or remedies provided by law. The 

54 of 166 1175 department may adopt and promulgate regulations to effectuate the purposes of this paragraph. A 
1176 penalty assessed pursuant to this paragraph shall be assessed only in addition to any other civil 
1177 penalty otherwise provided for by law. Notice of assessment of a penalty pursuant to this 
1178 paragraph shall be made by service in hand, or by certified mail, return receipt requested, and 
1179 shall state the amount of the administrative penalty, the date the penalty shall be due, a statement 
1180 of the violator’s right to an adjudicatory hearing pursuant to chapter 30A regarding the 
1181 assessment, a statement of the actions the person may take in order to avoid assessment of 
1182 additional penalties or to avoid waiving the right to a hearing relative to the penalty and the 
1183 manner of acceptable payment if an election to waive a hearing is made. A person or political 
1184 subdivision of the commonwealth shall be deemed to have waived all right to an adjudicatory 
1185 hearing unless, within 21 days of the date of the department’s notice, a written notice is received 
1186 by the department, by hand or by certified mail, return receipt requested, requesting such 
1187 adjudicatory hearing. In the event that such request is not received in accordance with this 
1188 section, the proposed administrative penalty shall become final and payment shall be due in 
1189 accordance with the notice. 
1190  SECTION 11. Paragraph (b) of section 67 of said chapter 21, as appearing in the 2024 
1191 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the third sentence and inserting in place 
1192 thereof the following sentence:- The regulations shall be in accordance with generally accepted 
1193 standards of irrigation practice. 
1194  SECTION 12. Paragraph (c). of said section 67 of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is 
1195 hereby amended by inserting after the word “lands”, in line 29, the following words:- or golf 
1196 courses. 

55 of 166 1197  SECTION 13. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
1198 section 2A the following section:- 
1199  Section 2B. (a) There shall be within the executive office of energy and environmental 
1200 affairs a drought management task force. The task force shall consist of: the secretary or a 
1201 designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the director of the Massachusetts emergency management 
1202 agency or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the commissioner of agricultural resources or 
1203 a designee; the commissioner of conservation and recreation or a designee; the commissioner of 
1204 environmental protection or a designee; the state fire marshal or a designee; the commissioner of 
1205 fish and game or a designee; the commissioner of public health or a designee; the commissioner 
1206 of public utilities or a designee; the executive director of the Massachusetts Water Resources 
1207 Authority or a designee; the executive director of Massachusetts Association of Health Boards, 
1208 Inc. the executive director of Massachusetts Rivers Alliance, Inc., ; the executive director of 
1209 Massachusetts Water Works Association Inc.; and the executive director of the Water Supply 
1210 Citizens advisory committee to the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority. The co-chairs 
1211 shall jointly coordinate the task force and may invite officials from federal agencies to provide 
1212 scientific and technical input. The task force shall meet not less than monthly when drought 
1213 conditions exist. The task force shall be staffed by the director of water policy and other staff of 
1214 the water resources commission. 
1215  (b) The task force shall: (i) assist in collecting and assessing technical information; (ii) 
1216 facilitate coordination and communication among task force members, agencies and the public; 
1217 and (iii) provide recommendations to the secretary, the secretary of public safety and security 
1218 and the governor on the existing drought level and any proposed responses to such drought level. 

56 of 166 1219 The task force shall also make recommendations for the end of a drought, the reduction of the 
1220 drought level or for the commencement or cessation of a drought declaration. 
1221  (c) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall, with assistance from 
1222 the task force and approval by the water resources commission, maintain and periodically update 
1223 a statewide drought management plan that protects public health, public safety and the 
1224 environment which shall include, but is not limited to: (i) the approach and methods for 
1225 collecting and assessing technical information; (ii) an assessment of drought levels and process 
1226 for determining a drought; (iii) information addressing drought preparedness and response 
1227 protocol to drought conditions; and (iv) methods of coordination and communication among task 
1228 force members, agencies and the public. The task force may create and maintain a map depicting 
1229 subregions consistent with the major basins. The task force may update the statewide drought 
1230 management plan at any time; provided, however, that the plan shall be reviewed not less than 
1231 every 5 years and updated not less than every 10 years; provided further, that the drought 
1232 management plan shall be approved by the water resources commission after a public review and 
1233 comment period. 
1234  (d) The secretary may declare a drought upon consideration of the recommendations of 
1235 the task force. The secretary may order water conservation measures, including limits on 
1236 nonessential outdoor water use, based on the severity of drought in drought regions or basins to 
1237 protect public health, safety or the environment. Such water conservation measures shall apply to 
1238 all water users within a drought region or basin unless otherwise determined by the secretary 
1239 with prior notice to the task force. 

57 of 166 1240  (e) Notwithstanding section 27C of chapter 29 or any other general or special law to the 
1241 contrary, cities and towns shall coordinate on and effectuate compliance with water conservation 
1242 measures issued by the secretary to the fullest extent permitted by law. 
1243  (f) The secretary shall issue guidance and recommended best practices for cities and 
1244 towns to implement and enforce measures ordered under subsection (d) and may provide grants 
1245 or technical assistance to support cities and towns with communication and enforcement for 
1246 water conservation measures. Cities and towns shall designate a point of contact for 
1247 communication of information related to water conservation and drought conditions. 
1248  SECTION 14. Section 4C of chapter 21A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
1249 inserting after the word “change”, in line 21, the following words “, ocean acidification”. 
1250  SECTION 15.  Section 25 of chapter 21A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
1251 amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 
1252  (a) There shall be a water infrastructure advisory committee to review, monitor and 
1253 evaluate measures to address: (i) the progress of closing the gap in funding for water, wastewater 
1254 and stormwater infrastructure; (ii) new sources of funding to be used for closing the gap in 
1255 funding for water, wastewater and stormwater infrastructure; (iii) costs associated with 
1256 remediation of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances in drinking water; (iv) costs associated with 
1257 the removal of lead service lines; (v) costs associated with the elimination of combined sewer 
1258 overflows; (vi) costs associated with the reduction of nutrients in effluent discharges, biosolids 
1259 management and stormwater management as required by the United States Environmental 
1260 Protection Agency  permits and stormwater standards established by the department of 
1261 environmental protection. The advisory committee shall meet not less than once every quarter or 

58 of 166 1262 more frequently at the call of the secretary of energy and environmental affairs or a designee or 
1263 upon the written request of not less than 2 members of the advisory committee. 
1264  SECTION 16. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
1265 following section:- 
1266  Section 32. (a) The secretary shall establish a municipal reforestation program to provide 
1267 municipalities with grants and technical assistance to assist in developing science-based tree 
1268 management plans and, consistent with such plans, planting and maintaining trees on public land 
1269 or private lands with the consent of the owner and subject to appropriate covenants that shall 
1270 assure the continued presence and effectiveness of such planted trees. 
1271  (b) Municipalities participating in the municipal reforestation program shall prioritize the 
1272 planting of trees in areas experiencing heat island effects or that are underserved with tree cover 
1273 and shall seek to preserve existing trees and urban forests and, whenever feasible, purchase 
1274 locally sourced native trees. A municipality participating in the municipal reforestation program 
1275 may enter into an agreement with another municipality, a regional group of municipalities, a 
1276 regional planning agency or the department of conservation and recreation to purchase trees in 
1277 bulk. 
1278  (c) The secretary may secure funding from public or private sources for the municipal 
1279 reforestation program and shall seek any federal funding available to support the program. The 
1280 program shall provide technical assistance to municipalities, nonprofit organizations and regional 
1281 planning agencies in identifying and applying for any federal funding that is available to support 
1282 urban forests or municipal tree planting programs. 

59 of 166 1283  (d) A municipality may enter into an agreement with another municipality, a regional 
1284 group of municipalities, a regional planning agency or a nonprofit organization to jointly apply 
1285 to the municipal reforestation program. 
1286  SECTION 17. Chapter 21H of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
1287 following 2 sections:- 
1288  Section 9. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
1289 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
1290  “Aerosol coating product”, a pressurized coating product containing pigments or resins 
1291 dispensed by means of a propellant and packaged and sold in a disposable aerosol container for 
1292 handheld application, or for use in specialized equipment for ground traffic or marking 
1293 applications. 
1294  “Architectural paint”, interior and exterior architectural coatings sold in containers of not 
1295 more than 5 gallons; provided, however, that “architectural paint” shall not include industrial or 
1296 original equipment. 
1297  “Collection site”, a location or event at which paint is accepted into a postconsumer paint 
1298 stewardship program pursuant to a program plan. 
1299  “Department”, the department of environmental protection. 
1300  “Environmentally sound management practices”, procedures for the collection, storage, 
1301 transportation, reuse, recycling, energy recovery, and disposal of paint, that comply with all 
1302 applicable federal, state and local laws, including adequate record keeping, tracking and 

60 of 166 1303 documenting of the final disposition of materials and appropriate environmental liability 
1304 coverage. 
1305  “Household waste”, all solid or liquid waste materials from households including single 
1306 and multiple dwellings, hotels, motels and other residential sources which shall include: (i) 
1307 garbage, rubbish and sludge but shall not include sewage; (ii) materials defined as hazardous 
1308 wastes in section 2 of chapter 21C; and (iii) materials defined as source, special nuclear or by-
1309 product material under the provisions of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954. 
1310  “Manufacturer”, a manufacturer of paint product who sells, offers for sale or distributes 
1311 the paint product in the commonwealth under the manufacturer’s own name or brand. 
1312  “Paint” or “paint product,” architectural paint, aerosol coating products or additional 
1313 products as covered in a program plan; provided, however, that “paint” or “paint product” shall 
1314 not include industrial or original equipment.  
1315  “Postconsumer paint”, paint not used and no longer of use to a purchaser. 
1316  “Program plan”, a postconsumer paint stewardship program established pursuant to 
1317 subsection (b). 
1318  “Recycling”, the separation and reuse or remanufacture of materials which might 
1319 otherwise be disposed of as solid waste. 
1320  “Representative organization”, a nonprofit organization established by a manufacturer to 
1321 implement a program plan. 
1322  “Retailer”, a company that offers paint or other allied products for retail sale in the 
1323 commonwealth. 

61 of 166 1324  “Very small quantity generator”, a person who: (i) generates not more than 100 kilograms 
1325 of regulated recyclable material in a calendar month; provided, that no acutely hazardous 
1326 regulated recyclable material is included; and (ii) accumulates not more than 1,000 kilograms of 
1327 regulated recyclable material at any one time. 
1328  (b)(1) A manufacturer or representative organization shall submit to the department a 
1329 program plan for the establishment of a postconsumer paint product stewardship program for 
1330 postconsumer paint. Additional paint products may be proposed in a subsequent program plan in 
1331 consultation with the department.  
1332  (2) A program plan submitted to the department under this section shall: (i) provide a list 
1333 of participating manufacturers and brands covered; (ii) provide information on the paint 
1334 products; (iii) describe how the plan will provide for convenient and cost-effective statewide 
1335 collection of postconsumer paint in the commonwealth; provided, that the manufacturer or 
1336 representative organization may coordinate with existing household waste collection 
1337 infrastructure as is mutually agreeable; provided further, that a paint retailer may be authorized 
1338 by the manufacturer or representative organization as a paint collection site if the paint retailer 
1339 volunteers to act as such, complies with all applicable laws and regulations and the retail location 
1340 is consistent with the maintenance of a cost-effective network of paint collection sites; (iv) 
1341 establish a goal for the quantity and geographic distribution of collection sites for postconsumer 
1342 paint using geographic modeling that would ensure: (A) not less than 90 per cent of residents 
1343 have a collection site within a 15-mile radius of their domicile; and (B) at least 1 collection site 
1344 will be available for every 50,000 of an urbanized area, as defined by the United States Census 
1345 Bureau, unless otherwise approved by the department;  (v) describe how paint products will be 
1346 managed using environmentally sound management practices with an emphasis on local reuse 

62 of 166 1347 options; (vi) describe education and outreach efforts to inform consumers about the program plan 
1348 including, but not limited to: (A) information about collection opportunities for postconsumer 
1349 paint products; (B) information about the fee for the operation of the program that shall be 
1350 included in the purchase price of all paint products sold in the commonwealth; and (C) efforts to 
1351 promote the source reduction, reuse and recycling of architectural paint; and (vii) describe any 
1352 added fee to paint products sold in the commonwealth as a result of a program plan and 
1353 administrative fees paid to the department deposited to the Paint Extended Producer 
1354 Responsibility Trust Fund. 
1355  (3) An independent auditor selected by the manufacturer or representative organization, 
1356 in consultation with the department, shall verify that the fee added to each container of a paint 
1357 product will not exceed the costs to operate and sustain a program plan, including costs of the 
1358 department. The cost of any work performed by such independent auditor shall be funded by a 
1359 program plan. 
1360  (4) Not later than 120 days after submission of a program plan under this section, the 
1361 department shall make a determination in writing whether to approve a program plan as 
1362 submitted or disapprove a program plan. The department shall make the proposed program plan 
1363 or amendment available for public review and comment for not less than 30 days. 
1364  (5) The department shall enforce an approved program plan and may promulgate 
1365 regulations to enforce this section, including establishing enforcement procedures. 
1366  (c)(1) A manufacturer or retailer shall not sell, or offer for sale, a paint product to any 
1367 person in the commonwealth unless the manufacturer or representative organization is 
1368 implementing an approved program plan as required by subsection (b). 

63 of 166 1369  (2) A manufacturer or retailer shall be in compliance with this paragraph if, on the date 
1370 the paint product was offered for sale, the manufacturer or retailer is listed on the department’s 
1371 website as implementing or participating in an approved program plan, or if the paint product 
1372 brand is listed on the department’s website as being included in the program plan. 
1373  (3) A paint collection site shall not charge any additional amount for the management of 
1374 paint products when it is solicited for collection. 
1375  (4) Each manufacturer and retailer shall include the per-container fee amount set forth in 
1376 an approved plan in the purchase price of any paint product sold in or into the commonwealth. 
1377 Retailers may incorporate the fee as part of the price amount displayed to consumers. Retailers 
1378 are not required to incorporate the fee as part of the price amount displayed to consumers, 
1379 provided that those retailers make information about the fee available to consumers prior to 
1380 purchase. 
1381  (d) A manufacturer or representative organization implementing or participating in a 
1382 program plan shall not be liable for any claim of a violation of antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair 
1383 trade practice or other anticompetitive conduct arising from action undertaken in accordance 
1384 with a program plan. 
1385  (e) A manufacturer or representative organization implementing a program plan shall 
1386 submit a report annually, not later than June 1, for the proceeding calendar year to the 
1387 department detailing results of the program plan for the previous year. 
1388  (f) Financial, production or sales data reported to the department by a manufacturer, 
1389 retailer or a representative organization shall not be subject to public disclosure, but the 

64 of 166 1390 department may release a summary form of such data that does not disclose financial, production 
1391 or sales data of the manufacturer, retailer or representative organization. 
1392  (g) A program plan shall be implemented not more than 6 months after the date that such 
1393 manufacturer or representative organization program plan is approved. The department may 
1394 extend the date of implementation. 
1395  (h)(1) Generators of household waste and very small quantity generators may transport or 
1396 send their paint products to a paint collection site in accordance with the program plan. 
1397  (2) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, paint collection sites may 
1398 collect and temporarily store postconsumer paint generated by persons specified in subsection (b) 
1399 in accordance with the requirements of the program plan. 
1400  (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting the collection of postconsumer 
1401 paint products by a stewardship program where such collection is authorized under any other 
1402 laws or regulations. 
1403  (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any requirements applicable to 
1404 facilities that treat, dispose or recycle postconsumer paint products under an otherwise applicable 
1405 law, rule or regulation. 
1406  (i)(1) Any program plan amendment shall be submitted to the department for approval 
1407 when the amendment proposes changes to the program fee or substantial changes to program 
1408 services. 
1409  (2) The department shall review any program plan amendment for compliance with this 
1410 section and shall approve, disapprove or conditionally approve the plans or plan amendments in 

65 of 166 1411 writing within 120 days of their receipt. If the department disapproves a plan amendment 
1412 submitted, the department shall explain how the plan amendment does not comply with this 
1413 section. The manufacturer or representative organization shall resubmit to the department a 
1414 revised program plan amendment or withdraw the amendment within 60 days of the date the 
1415 written notice of disapproval is issued and the department shall review the revised program plan 
1416 or plan amendment within 30 days of resubmittal.  
1417  (3) When an amendment to an approved plan is submitted under this subsection, the 
1418 department shall make the proposed amendment available for public review and comment for not 
1419 less than 30 days. 
1420  SECTION 18. Section 5 of chapter 21N of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
1421 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “lands”, in line 46, the first time 
1422 it appears, the following words:- “, including, but not limited to, salt marshes, seagrasses, 
1423 waterways and other coastal ecosystems. 
1424  SECTION 19. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21O the 
1425 following chapter:- 
1426  Chapter 21P 
1427  MASSACHUSETTS PLASTICS REDUCTION ACT 
1428  Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings 
1429 unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
1430  “Bag”, a container made of flexible material with an opening at the top that is used to 
1431 carry items. 

66 of 166 1432  “Carryout bag”, a bag provided to a customer to carry items purchased from or serviced 
1433 by a business, retailer, organization or other entity; provided, however, that “carryout bag” shall 
1434 not include a bag without handles: (i) provided by a pharmacy to a customer purchasing 
1435 prescription medication; (ii) used to protect items from damaging or contaminating other 
1436 purchased items placed in a recycled paper bag or a reusable bag; (iii) provided to contain an 
1437 unwrapped food item; (iv) used to protect articles of clothing on a hanger; (v) used to prevent 
1438 frozen food items from thawing; (vi) provided or made available to a customer purchasing raw 
1439 meat, uncooked seafood or other similar products; (vii) used to contain and secure small items; 
1440 or (viii) a similar non-handled bag as determined by the department to be essential and not 
1441 readily replaceable. 
1442  “Customer”, a person who purchases or otherwise receives goods, services or materials 
1443 from a business, organization, corporation or other entity. 
1444  “Department”, the department of environmental protection. 
1445  “Disposable”, designed to be discarded after a single or limited number of uses and not 
1446 designed or manufactured for long-term multiple reuse. 
1447  “Food service ware”, disposable products used for serving or transporting foods or 
1448 beverages for human consumption including, but not limited to, plates, bowls, trays, cups, 
1449 cartons, hinged or lidded containers, straws, stirrers, cup spill plugs, cup sleeves, condiments 
1450 containers, utensils, cocktail sticks or picks, toothpicks, film wrap and napkins; provided, 
1451 however, that “food service ware” shall not include detachable lids for beverage cups or food 
1452 containers, coolers or ice chests. 

67 of 166 1453  “Hotel”, a building or portion of a building regularly used for the lodging of guests, 
1454 including, but not limited to, an apartment hotel, a motel or a boarding house, whether or not 
1455 meals are served on the premises. 
1456  “Hospitality personal care product”, a product provided by a hotel and intended to be 
1457 applied to or used on the human body, or any part thereof, for cleansing, conditioning or 
1458 moisturizing, including, but not limited to, shampoo, conditioner, lotion and liquid soap. 
1459  “Plastic”, any synthetic or semi-synthetic material made partially or entirely from fossil 
1460 fuel-based petrochemical polymers that retains its shape during its lifecycle, including, but not 
1461 limited to, polystyrene, polyethylene, polypropylene and polycarbonate. 
1462  “Postconsumer recycled material”, material used in a recycled paper bag that would 
1463 otherwise be disposed of as solid waste and that does not comprise any material or byproduct 
1464 generated from, and commonly reused within, an original manufacturing and fabrication process. 
1465  “Recycle”, to separate, dismantle or process the materials, components or commodities in 
1466 materials for the purpose of preparation for use or reuse in new products or components; 
1467 provided, however, that “recycle” shall not include energy recovery or energy generation by 
1468 means of combustion, including, but not limited to, pyrolysis, gasification or other heat chemical 
1469 conversion processes, or landfill disposal.  
1470  “Recycled paper bag”, a paper bag that is 100 per cent recyclable and contains not less 
1471 than 50 per cent postconsumer recycled material. 
1472  “Reusable bag”, a bag that: (i) is made of machine-washable cloth, fabric, hemp or other 
1473 woven or non-woven fibers; (ii) has handles that are stitched with thread and not heat-fused; and 

68 of 166 1474 (iii) is designed and manufactured for multiple uses; provided, however, that a “reusable bag” 
1475 shall not include a bag made of plastic film of any thickness. 
1476   “Serviced” or “servicing”, the past or present act of cleaning, repairing, improving, 
1477 refinishing or altering an item owned by a customer by a person engaged in a retail business of 
1478 customarily providing such services, including, but not limited to, dry cleaning and tailoring 
1479 articles of clothing, jewelry repair and shoe and leather repair.  
1480  Section 2. (a) A retailer or charging entity shall not provide a customer a carryout bag 
1481 unless such carryout bag is a recycled paper bag or a reusable bag; provided, however, that a 
1482 customer shall be charged not less than 10 cents per recycled paper bag provided; provided 
1483 further, that a recycled paper bag purchased under this section shall not be subject to taxation 
1484 pursuant to chapter 64H or 64I. 
1485  (b) Five cents per recycled paper bag sold shall be remitted by the retailer or charging 
1486 entity to the department of revenue at the same time and in the same manner as sales taxes are 
1487 due to the commonwealth. The department of revenue shall deposit such amounts into the 
1488 Plastics Environmental Protection Fund established under section 2QQQQQQ of chapter 29. The 
1489 department of revenue may promulgate regulations to facilitate the collection of the fee set forth 
1490 in this paragraph. The retailer or charging entity shall retain the remainder of the amount charged 
1491 to customers. 
1492  (c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the sale or offering for sale of packages 
1493 containing several bags, products or goods with a protective or other bag received from a 
1494 manufacturer or distributor or bags offered for sale as a product or merchandise that are not 
1495 carryout bags. 

69 of 166 1496  (d) This section shall not apply to: (i) bags otherwise required to be used under state or 
1497 federal law; or (ii) a nonprofit organization, charity or religious institution in the provision or 
1498 distribution of food, clothing or other items at no cost or substantially reduced cost. 
1499  (e) A business with not more than 1 store location with an area of not more than 4,000 
1500 square feet of retail selling space and not more than 10 employees, and which provided not more 
1501 than 10,000 carryout bags in total during the previous calendar year, shall not be required to 
1502 collect or remit bag fees as otherwise set forth in this section. 
1503  Section 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a retailer or charging entity shall not 
1504 provide a customer with food service ware unless requested by the customer. 
1505  (b) A retailer or charging entity may make food service ware available to a customer for 
1506 self-service to allow for non-bundled, single-use food service ware to be obtained.  
1507  Section 4. (a) For the purposes of this section, “state agency” shall mean any department 
1508 of state government, independent state authority, quasi-public authority, board, district, 
1509 commission, instrumentality or agency of the commonwealth and the executive, legislative and 
1510 judicial branches. 
1511  (b) State agencies shall not expend state funds to procure single-use plastic bottles that 
1512 have a capacity of 21 fluid ounces or less; provided, however, that state agencies shall be exempt 
1513 from this requirement if such exemption is required to provide for disability or accessibility 
1514 related accommodations. 
1515  (c) Subsection (b) shall not apply: (i) when no alternative is available or practicable; (ii) 
1516 when necessary to protect public health, safety and welfare; (iii) when compliance with this 

70 of 166 1517 section would conflict with contract requirements or labor agreements in existence as of the 
1518 effective date of this section or agreements solicited before the effective date of this section; and 
1519 (iv) to prepare for or respond to an emergency. 
1520  Section 5. The department shall establish a statewide program to provide for the recycling 
1521 of bulk plastic materials, including, but not limited to, child passenger restraints as defined in 
1522 section 1 of chapter 90, and may: (i) implement local or regional bulk plastic recycling programs; 
1523 (ii) accept applications from municipalities for grants and to award grants to assist in the 
1524 development or establishment of local and regional bulk plastic recycling programs; and (iii) 
1525 partner or contract with private organizations to assist in the development or establishment of a 
1526 bulk plastic recycling program. 
1527  Section 6. A municipality shall not pass, adopt, promulgate or otherwise effectuate an 
1528 ordinance, by-law or other rule or regulation inconsistent with this chapter. 
1529  Section 7. Except as otherwise provided, the department shall promulgate regulations to 
1530 implement and enforce this chapter. The department may promulgate regulations to increase the 
1531 minimum postconsumer recycled material required for recycled paper bags. 
1532  Section 8. The department shall establish and assess civil administrative penalties 
1533 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 21A for violations of this chapter. 
1534  The superior court department of the trial court may assess civil penalties as set forth in 
1535 this section and enjoin violations of and grant such additional relief as it deems necessary or 
1536 appropriate to secure compliance with, the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation, rule or 
1537 other order or action adopted or issued pursuant to this section. The attorney general and district 

71 of 166 1538 attorneys may bring enforcement actions under this section in the superior court department of 
1539 the trial court or any other court of competent jurisdiction. 
1540  SECTION 20. Chapter 21P of the General Laws, inserted by section 12, is hereby 
1541 amended by inserting after section 2 the following section:- 
1542  Section 2A. A hotel shall not provide or otherwise make available a hospitality personal 
1543 care product in a plastic container with a volume of less than or equal to 9 ounces. Each day a 
1544 hotel is in violation of this section shall be considered a separate violation. 
1545  SECTION 21. Section 3 of chapter 21P of the General Laws, inserted by by section 12, is 
1546 hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- 
1547  (c) No food service ware provided pursuant to this section shall be made from black 
1548 plastic; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to prepared food packaged outside 
1549 the commonwealth.  
1550  SECTION 22. Section 22 of chapter 25 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 239 
1551 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the following 3 subsections:-  
1552  (f) Public and private water utilities shall file biennial reports, on or before January 1 and 
1553 July 1, with the executive office of energy and environmental affairs regarding customer service 
1554 data. The reports shall be public record and shall include, but shall not be limited to, the 
1555 following information, disaggregated by zip codes: 
1556  (1) The number of customers receiving service from a water utility provider;  
1557   (2) The number customer disconnection notices sent due to bill nonpayment;   

72 of 166 1558  (3) The number and dates of water shut offs that took place and average time between 
1559 service disconnection due to non-payment and service reconnection;  
1560  (4) The number of customer accounts that became eligible for disconnection due to bill 
1561 nonpayment but were not disconnected because of any legally mandated or voluntary suspension 
1562 of disconnections;  
1563  (5) The number of customers charged late fees, penalties, reconnection fees, interest, and 
1564 any other charge associated with late payment of a bill;  
1565  (6) The number of liens on real property placed, sold, or enforced due to nonpayment;  
1566  (7) The number of customers enrolled in deferred payment agreements at the end of each 
1567 month, and the average length of the repayment term under those agreements;  
1568  (8) The number of customers that entered into, successfully completed, or defaulted from 
1569 a deferred payment agreement;  
1570  (9) Customer assistance programs available to water consumers, including terms of 
1571 eligibility, and available budget for each program;  
1572  (10) The number of customers receiving assistance under each customer assistance 
1573 program at the end of each month, the total dollar amount of assistance provided, and the number 
1574 of customers who were denied assistance; and  
1575  (11) The methods and contents of general communications by local utilities and public 
1576 utilities to customers concerning their rights and available assistance programs if customers are 
1577 unable to pay their bills in full.  

73 of 166 1578  (g) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs may adopt regulations 
1579 necessary to implement this section.  
1580  (h) Annually, not later than March 15, the executive office of energy and environmental 
1581 affairs shall report to the senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint 
1582 committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture data concerning the results of such 
1583 equity audit reports.  
1584  SECTION 23. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
1585 section 2NNNNNN the following 4 sections:- 
1586  Section 2OOOOOO. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
1587 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Resilience 
1588 Revolving Fund. The fund shall be administered by the board of trustees of the Massachusetts 
1589 Clean Water Trust established by section 2 of chapter 29C. The fund shall be credited with 
1590 amounts credited or transferred to the fund by the general court or any other source, including, 
1591 but not limited to: fees or tax revenue specified to be credited to the fund; federal grants; loan 
1592 repayments; investment earnings on monies in the fund; and any other amounts required to be 
1593 credited to the trust by operation of law, resolution or agreement entered into by the board. The 
1594 state treasurer shall be the treasurer-custodian of the fund, and, subject to any applicable trust 
1595 agreement, the state treasurer is authorized to invest monies held in the fund in such investments 
1596 as may be legal investments for funds of the commonwealth. 
1597  Amounts credited to the fund may be used, without further appropriation, to provide for: 
1598 (i) loans to municipalities, tribal governments and public water and wastewater districts for 
1599 climate resilient infrastructure projects recommended by the advisory committee; and (ii) 

74 of 166 1600 technical support for eligible applicants needing assistance for projects to be ready to apply for 
1601 said loans and program management, to be provided by the executive office for energy and 
1602 environmental affairs; provided that the amount expended under (ii) shall not exceed the amount 
1603 approved annually by the board based on a recommendation by the advisory committee. 
1604  The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for 
1605 expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund 
1606 to be in deficit at any point. 
1607  (b) There shall be an advisory committee to the board consisting of the state treasurer, 
1608 who shall serve ex officio; the secretary of administration and finance who shall serve ex officio; 
1609 the secretary of energy and environmental affairs who shall serve ex officio, 1 member appointed 
1610 by the trust and 1 member appointed by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs. Each 
1611 member of the advisory committee may appoint a designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30. 
1612 The committee shall choose its chair. The advisory committee shall recommend eligible climate 
1613 resilient infrastructure projects and expenditures for technical support and program management 
1614 to the board for approval for loans in subsection (d). The executive office of energy and 
1615 environmental affairs shall promulgate regulations setting forth the criteria for a climate 
1616 resilience project and any key project requirements, including but not limited to the scope of the 
1617 project, any ongoing requirements and covenants and compliance with subsection (b) of section 
1618 283 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 regarding the use of project labor agreements. The 
1619 advisory committee shall consider only projects for which it has received a certificate issued by 
1620 the executive office of energy and environmental affairs that approves the project in accordance 
1621 with regulations and that identifies the specific project requirements, including but not limited to 
1622 the scope, timeline and costs of the project.  

75 of 166 1623  (c) The board may provide by resolution for the issuance from time to time of bonds for 
1624 any purpose of the fund, which bonds shall be issued as special obligations payable solely from 
1625 the revenues, funds and other assets or property held or to be received by the trust with respect to 
1626 said fund. 
1627  The bonds of each issue may be dated, may bear interest at such rate or rates, including 
1628 rates variable from time to time, and may mature or otherwise be payable or redeemable at such 
1629 times as the board may determine. The board shall determine the denominations of bonds, the 
1630 details of their execution and authentication and their places of payment within or without the 
1631 commonwealth. In case any trustee or officer whose signature appears on any bonds shall cease 
1632 to be such officer before their delivery, the signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient as 
1633 if the officer had remained in office until delivery. Bonds may be issued in certificated or 
1634 uncertificated form, payable to bearer or registered owners, and, if notes, may be made payable 
1635 to bearer or to order. The board may sell the bonds of the trust at public or private sale at par or 
1636 for such premium or discount price as it may determine. The board may by resolution delegate to 
1637 any trustee or officer of the trust the power to determine any of the matters set forth in this 
1638 section. 
1639  Bonds of the trust may be secured by a trust agreement between the trust and the bond 
1640 owners or a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a 
1641 trust company within or without the commonwealth. A trust agreement may pledge or assign, in 
1642 whole or in part, any loan agreements and local governmental obligations, and the revenues, 
1643 funds and other assets or property held or to be received by the trust with respect to the 
1644 Resilience Revolving Fund, including without limitation all monies and investments on deposit 
1645 from time to time in the fund or any account of such trust agreement and any contract or other 

76 of 166 1646 rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether 
1647 then held or thereafter acquired by the trust, and the proceeds thereof. A trust agreement may 
1648 contain, without limitation, provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security and 
1649 remedies of the bondholders, provisions defining defaults and establishing remedies, which may 
1650 include acceleration and may also contain restrictions on the remedies by individual 
1651 bondholders. A trust agreement may also contain covenants of the trust concerning the custody, 
1652 investment and application of monies, the enforcement of loan agreements and local 
1653 governmental obligations, the issue of additional or refunding bonds, the use of any surplus bond 
1654 proceeds, the establishment of reserves and the regulation of other matters customarily treated in 
1655 trust agreements. At the request of the board, the state treasurer shall and is hereby authorized to 
1656 join in any trust agreement or to otherwise agree with the trust, any lender or any trustee for 
1657 bondholders to hold the fund in compliance with any covenants and provisions relating to the 
1658 fund contained in any trust agreement. 
1659  Bonds may be issued by the trust in the form of lines of credit or other banking 
1660 arrangements under terms and conditions determined by the board. In addition to other lawful 
1661 security, bonds may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guarantees, by insurance, by 
1662 letters or lines of credit or by other credit enhancement issued to the trust or to a trustee or other 
1663 person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company or other financial institution, 
1664 within or without the commonwealth; the trust may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, any 
1665 loan agreements and local governmental obligations and the revenues, funds and other assets and 
1666 property held or to be received by the trust with respect to the Resilience Revolving Fund, and 
1667 any contract or other rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into 
1668 existence and whether then held or thereafter acquired by the trust, and the proceeds thereof, as 

77 of 166 1669 security for such guarantees or insurance or for the reimbursement to any issuer of a line or letter 
1670 of credit. 
1671  The board may by resolution provide for the issue by the trust of interim receipts or 
1672 temporary bonds, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds are executed and are 
1673 available for delivery. The board may also provide for replacement of mutilated, destroyed or 
1674 lost bonds. The trust may purchase and invite offers to tender for purchase any outstanding 
1675 bonds; provided, however, that no purchase by the trust shall be made at a price, exclusive of 
1676 accrued interest, if any, exceeding the bond’s principal amount or, if greater, its redemption price 
1677 when next redeemable at the option of the trust. The trust may resell any bonds it purchases in 
1678 such manner and for such price as it may determine. 
1679  The board may also issue refunding bonds of the trust for the purpose of paying any 
1680 bonds at or prior to maturity. Refunding bonds may be issued at any time at or prior to the 
1681 maturity or redemption or purchase of the refunded bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued in 
1682 sufficient amounts to pay or provide for payment of the principal of the bonds being refunded, 
1683 together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest or discount accrued or to accrue to 
1684 the date of payment, costs of issuance and other expenses and reserves reasonably necessary to 
1685 achieve the refunding. 
1686  Bonds of the trust shall be: (i) securities in which public officers and agencies, insurance 
1687 companies, financial institutions, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and 
1688 others may properly invest funds including capital within their control; and (ii) securities which 
1689 may be deposited with any public officer or any agency for any purpose for which the deposit of 
1690 bonds is authorized by law. 

78 of 166 1691  Bonds issued by the trust shall not be deemed to be a debt or a pledge of the faith and 
1692 credit of the commonwealth or of any of its political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely 
1693 from the revenues and monies of the Resilience Revolving Fund and other monies and rights 
1694 pledged to their payment. Bonds shall recite that neither the commonwealth nor any political 
1695 subdivision thereof shall be obligated to pay the same and neither the faith and credit nor the 
1696 taxing power of the commonwealth or any political subdivision is pledged to their payment. 
1697 Every bond shall recite it is a special obligation payable solely from the revenues, funds, assets 
1698 or other property of the Resilience Revolving Fund. 
1699  Bonds of the trust shall be deemed to be investment securities under chapter 106. Bonds, 
1700 their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all 
1701 times be exempt from taxation by and within the commonwealth. The trust shall not be required 
1702 to pay any taxes, assessments or excises upon its income, existence, operation, or assets, monies 
1703 or revenues. 
1704  It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company to act as a depository of the fund or 
1705 trustee under a trust agreement, provided it furnishes indemnification and reasonable security as 
1706 the board may require. Any assignment or pledge of revenues, funds and other assets and 
1707 property made by the trust shall be valid and binding and shall be deemed continuously perfected 
1708 for the purposes of chapter 106 and other laws when made. The revenues, funds and other assets 
1709 and property, rights therein and thereto and proceeds so pledged and then held or thereafter 
1710 acquired or received by the trust shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without 
1711 any physical delivery or segregation or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid 
1712 and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the 
1713 trust, whether or not such parties have notice thereof. The trust agreement by which a pledge is 

79 of 166 1714 created need not be filed or recorded to perfect the pledge except in the records of the board and 
1715 no filing need be made pursuant to said chapter 106. Any pledge or assignment made by the trust 
1716 is an exercise of its political and governmental powers, and loan agreements, local governmental 
1717 obligations, revenues, funds, assets, property and contract or other rights to receive the same and 
1718 the proceeds thereof which are subject to the lien of a pledge or assignment created under this 
1719 chapter shall not be applied to any purposes not permitted by the pledge or assignment. Any 
1720 holder of a bond and any trustee under a trust agreement, except to the extent its rights may be 
1721 restricted by the trust agreement, may bring suit upon the bonds and may pursue any other legal 
1722 action to protect and enforce its rights and compel performance of all duties required to be 
1723 performed by the trust and the board. 
1724  (d) In addition to the other powers set forth in Chapter 29C, the board shall have the 
1725 power to make loans and other forms of financial assistance to finance or refinance costs of 
1726 climate resilient infrastructure projects as authorized by subsection (a), and to acquire, hold and 
1727 sell local governmental obligations and other instruments evidencing the loans and other forms 
1728 of financial assistance at such prices and in such manner as the board shall deem advisable and to 
1729 secure bonds of the trust with loans, local governmental obligations and other instruments. 
1730  Any municipality, tribal government and public water and wastewater district may apply 
1731 to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs for a loan to assist in financing the 
1732 cost of a climate resilient infrastructure project. At the option of the trust, loans may be 
1733 unsecured or may be secured by local governmental obligations for delivery to the trust to 
1734 evidence the loan. Each loan shall be made pursuant to a loan agreement between the trust and 
1735 such entity acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee or other body 

80 of 166 1736 authorized by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer. The trust shall have such remedies 
1737 with respect to defaults on such loans as set forth in section 11 of chapter 29C. 
1738  Section 2PPPPPP. (a) For the purposes of this section, “Historic Connecticut River Water 
1739 Trail” shall mean, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the portion of the Connecticut 
1740 River beginning at the Holyoke Dam located at river mile 83.4, and ending at the northern border 
1741 of the municipality of Hatfield located at river mile 104.3. 
1742  (b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate, 
1743 non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Historic Connecticut River Water Trail 
1744 Marking Fund, which shall be administered by the executive office of energy and environmental 
1745 affairs to support maintenance of the Historic Connecticut River Water Trail.  
1746  (c) The fund shall be credited with: (i) money transferred to the fund by a municipality; 
1747 (ii) money transferred to the fund by the municipal gas and electric commission of the city of 
1748 Holyoke; (iii) money transferred to the fund by the general court and specifically designated to 
1749 be credited to the fund; (iv) funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, 
1750 gifts, grants and donations; and (v) interest earned on such money.  
1751  (d) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, by the 
1752 secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the director of the office of 
1753 law enforcement, the director of the office of outdoor recreation and the chief executive officers 
1754 of the municipalities of Easthampton, Hadley, Hatfield, Holyoke, Northampton and South 
1755 Hadley, to ensure the placement of river markers to ensure safe navigable passage and recreation 
1756 on the Historic Connecticut River Water Trail.  

81 of 166 1757  (e) The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the 
1758 General Fund and shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. To 
1759 accommodate timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenues and related expenditures, the 
1760 secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs may incur expenses, and the 
1761 comptroller shall certify for payment, amounts not to exceed the most recent revenue estimate as 
1762 certified by the Massachusetts environmental police, as reported in the state accounting system. 
1763  Section 2QQQQQQ. (a) There shall be a Plastics Environmental Protection Fund to be 
1764 expended, without prior appropriation, by the department of environmental protection. The fund 
1765 shall consist of: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court 
1766 and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; (iii) 
1767 funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations and 
1768 settlements received by the commonwealth that are designated to be credited to the fund; (iv) 
1769 federal funds paid to the commonwealth designated to be credited to the fund; and (v) monies 
1770 paid to the commonwealth pursuant to chapter 21P, including all funds collected by the 
1771 department of revenue pursuant to section 2 of said chapter 21P. The fund shall be expended to: 
1772 (i) improve the air, water, soil or other environmental conditions for low and moderate income 
1773 communities; (ii) provide reusable bags at no-cost to low and moderate income communities and 
1774 individuals receiving benefits administered by the department of transitional assistance at no 
1775 cost; (iii) issue grants to small businesses that are incorporated and have principal places of 
1776 business in the commonwealth to assist in the reduction of plastic use within each business, 
1777 including, but not limited to, small businesses in the food service and production industries; and 
1778 (iv) provide multilingual, culturally competent educational materials and programming on bag 
1779 reuse and recycling and other aspects of environmental protection. Any bond proceeds deposited 

82 of 166 1780 into the fund shall be kept separate from any and all other funds deposited into the fund. No 
1781 expenditure from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficiency at the close of a fiscal year. 
1782 Monies deposited into the fund that are unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to 
1783 the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal years.  
1784  (b) The department of environmental protection shall administer the fund. Annually, not 
1785 later than October 1, the department shall report on the activities of the fund from the previous 
1786 fiscal to the senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint committee on 
1787 environment and natural resources. The department may promulgate regulations or issue other 
1788 guidance to implement this section. The department shall consult with the department of 
1789 transitional assistance to equitably implement the provision of no-cost reusable bags as set forth 
1790 in subsection (a). The department shall consult with the Massachusetts Growth Capital 
1791 Corporation to equitably implement the provision of grants to small businesses to assist in the 
1792 reduction of plastic use. 
1793  Section 2RRRRRR. (a) There shall a Paint Extended Producer Responsibility Trust Fund 
1794 which shall be administered by the commissioner of environmental protection. The fund shall be 
1795 credited with: (i) fees authorized under section 9 of chapter 21H; (ii) any appropriation, grant, 
1796 gift or other contribution made to the fund; and (iii) any interest earned on money in the fund. 
1797  (b) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the 
1798 department of environmental protection to administer the postconsumer paint stewardship 
1799 program established in section 9 of chapter 21H. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the 
1800 close of a fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No 
1801 expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit at any point. 

83 of 166 1802  SECTION 24. Section 2OOOOOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as inserted by 
1803 section 10, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “including, but not limited to:” the 
1804 following words:- any amounts transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of section 
1805 168 of chapter 175; 
1806  SECTION 25. Section 62E of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
1807 adding the following paragraph:- 
1808  The secretary may, in consultation with the secretary of housing and livable communities, 
1809 establish priority housing projects consistent with commonwealth land use planning and housing 
1810 strategies, climate resilient design guidelines, environmental priorities and nature-based solutions 
1811 projects and public coastal resilience infrastructure projects in previously disturbed and 
1812 developed areas as defined by the executive office of environmental affairs, as categories of 
1813 projects that are not presumed likely to cause damage to the environment and do not require an 
1814 environmental impact report regardless of location; provided however, that such projects meet 
1815 standards as determined by the secretary. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the secretary may 
1816 determine that a particular project requires an environmental impact report based on review of a 
1817 notification form submitted under section 62A. 
1818  SECTION 26. Section 106 of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
1819 amended by striking out, in lines 11 and 12, the words “arborculture and licensed with the 
1820 department of food and agriculture” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 
1821 “arboriculture and licensed with the department of agricultural resources. 

84 of 166 1822  SECTION 27. Section 1 of chapter 61 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
1823 amended by striking out the definition of “forest products” and inserting in place thereof the 
1824 following definition:- 
1825  “Forest products”, wood, timber, Christmas trees, other tree forest growth, carbon 
1826 sequestration and storage and any other product produced by forest vegetation. 
1827  SECTION 28. Said section 1 of said chapter 61, as so appearing, is hereby further 
1828 amended by striking out, in line 18, the words “including intermediate” and inserting in place 
1829 thereof the following words:- which may include, but shall not be limited to, intermediate.  
1830  SECTION 29. Section 8 of said chapter 61, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
1831 striking out, in lines 94 and 111, the words “section 23B of chapter 39” and inserting in place 
1832 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A. 
1833  SECTION 30. Said chapter 61is hereby amended by inserting after section 8 the 
1834 following section:- 
1835  Section 8A. The department of conservation and recreation shall have a first refusal 
1836 option to meet a bona fide offer to purchase land proposed for sale pursuant to section 8 or an 
1837 option to purchase such land at full and fair market value in the case of conversion, which option 
1838 shall be subordinate to that of a town or city pursuant to section 8. Except as provided herein, the 
1839 department shall have all applicable rights and obligations of cities and towns under section 8 
1840 including, but not limited to, the right of entry upon the land, the provision of non-exercise 
1841 notices and the recording of notices of exercise at the appropriate registry of deeds. The 
1842 department, or its assignee, and the town or city may cooperate to satisfy the appraisal 
1843 requirements or other obligations required by section 8 or this section. 

85 of 166 1844  If the notice of intent to sell or convert required by section 8 does not contain all the 
1845 required material, then the department, within 30 days of receipt of the notice, shall notify the 
1846 landowner and town or city in writing that the notice is insufficient and does not comply.  
1847  A holder of a mortgage shall send written notice of a mortgage foreclosure sale to the 
1848 commissioner of the department in the same manner as to other parties as required by section 8. 
1849  A city or town shall provide to the commissioner any notice of public hearing, notice of 
1850 exercise or non-exercise, and notice of assignment in the same manner, and containing the same 
1851 materials, as is required to be given to the landowner pursuant to section 8.  
1852  The department may assign its option to the division of fisheries and wildlife of the 
1853 department of fisheries, wildlife and environmental law enforcement; provided, however, that a 
1854 notice of assignment shall be recorded pursuant to section 8. 
1855  The department or its assignee may exercise its option only after: (i) consultation with the 
1856 executive office of housing and livable communities and the executive office of economic 
1857 development; and (ii) holding a public hearing. Said hearing shall be held pursuant to sections 18 
1858 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A within the town or city where the land is located or in 1 such 
1859 town or city if the land crosses a municipal boundary and shall be held prior to submission of a 
1860 written notice of intent to exercise an option under this section. The department, or assignee, at 
1861 said hearing, shall disclose the reasons for exercise of the option pursuant to this section and 
1862 identify any assignment by the department. The department, or its assignee, may comply with the 
1863 public hearing requirement by participating in a scheduled public meeting of a town or city. 
1864  The department, or its assignee, may exercise an option under this section by providing 
1865 written notice of its intent to the town or city and landowner prior to the end of the same 120-day 

86 of 166 1866 period available to the town or city for exercise of its option pursuant to section 8. An option so 
1867 exercised shall be effective at such time as the town or city records a notice of non-exercise with 
1868 the registry of deeds or that the town’s or city’s option otherwise expires.  
1869  The department shall record its notice of assignment or notice of exercise within 30 days 
1870 of the earliest of: (i) receipt by the commissioner of a notice of non-exercise from the town or 
1871 city; (ii) expiration of a town or city option by failure to record a notice of exercise or notice of 
1872 assignment; or (iii) receipt by the commissioner of notice from the landowner of expiration for 
1873 any other reason. 
1874  Land acquired by the department or division pursuant to this section shall be permanently 
1875 dedicated for public purposes as specified in, and subject to, Article XCVII of the Amendments 
1876 to the Constitution of the Commonwealth.  
1877  SECTION 31. Section 14 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
1878 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 95 and 112, the words “section 23B 
1879 of chapter 39” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- sections 18 
1880 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A. 
1881  SECTION 32. Said chapter 61A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting 
1882 after section 14 the following section:- 
1883  Section 14A. The department of agricultural resources shall have a first refusal option to 
1884 meet a bona fide offer to purchase land proposed for sale pursuant to section 14 or an option to 
1885 purchase such land at full and fair market value in the case of conversion, which option shall be 
1886 subordinate to that of a town or city pursuant to section 14. Except as provided herein, the 
1887 department shall have all applicable rights and obligations of cities and towns under section 14 

87 of 166 1888 including, but not limited to, the right of entry upon the land, the provision of non-exercise 
1889 notices and the recording of notices of exercise at the appropriate registry of deeds. The 
1890 department, or its assignee, and the town or city may cooperate to satisfy the appraisal 
1891 requirements or other obligations required by section 14 or this section. 
1892  Any notice of intent to sell or convert required by section 14 and all required 
1893 accompanying materials shall be provided to the commissioner of agricultural resources in the 
1894 same manner as they are conveyed by the landowner to other parties. If the notice of intent to sell 
1895 or convert provided to the commissioner does not contain all the required material, then the 
1896 department, within 30 days of receipt of the notice, shall notify the landowner and town or city in 
1897 writing that the notice is insufficient and does not comply. 
1898  A holder of a mortgage shall send written notice of a mortgage foreclosure sale to the 
1899 commissioner in the same manner as to other parties as required by section 14. 
1900  Any city or town shall provide to the commissioner any notice of public hearing, notice 
1901 of exercise or non-exercise, and notice of assignment in the same manner, and containing the 
1902 same materials, as is required to be given to the landowner pursuant to section 14.  
1903  The department may assign its option to the department of conservation and recreation, 
1904 provided that a notice of assignment shall be recorded pursuant to section 14. 
1905  The department or its assignee shall exercise its option only after: (i) consultation with 
1906 the executive office of housing and livable communities and the executive office of economic 
1907 development; and (ii) holding a public hearing. Said hearing shall be held pursuant to sections 18 
1908 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A; within the town or city where the land is located or in 1 such 
1909 town or city if the land crosses a municipal boundary; and prior to submission of a written notice 

88 of 166 1910 of intent to exercise an option under this section. The department, or assignee, at said hearing, 
1911 shall disclose the reasons for exercise of the option pursuant to this section and identify any 
1912 assignment by the department. The department, or its assignee, may comply with the public 
1913 hearing requirement by participating in a scheduled public meeting of a town or city. 
1914  The department, or its assignee, may exercise an option under this section by providing 
1915 written notice of its intent to the town or city and landowner prior to the end of the same 120-day 
1916 period available to the town or city for exercise of its option pursuant to section 14. An option so 
1917 exercised shall be effective at such time as the town or city records a notice of non-exercise with 
1918 the registry of deeds or that the town’s or city’s option otherwise expires.  
1919  The department shall record its notice of assignment or notice of exercise within 30 days 
1920 of the earliest of: (i) receipt by the commissioner of a notice of non-exercise from the town or 
1921 city; (ii) expiration of a town or city option by failure to record a notice of exercise or notice of 
1922 assignment; or (iii) receipt by the commissioner of notice from the landowner of expiration for 
1923 any other reason. 
1924  Land acquired by the department of agricultural resources or the department of 
1925 conservation and recreation pursuant to this section shall be permanently dedicated for public 
1926 purposes as specified in, and subject to, Article XCVII of the Amendments to the Constitution of 
1927 the Commonwealth.  
1928  SECTION 33. Section 9 of chapter 61B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
1929 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 95 and 112, the words “section 23B 
1930 of chapter 39” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- sections 18 
1931 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A. 

89 of 166 1932  SECTION 34. Said chapter 61B is hereby amended by inserting after section 9 the 
1933 following section:- 
1934  Section 9A. The department of conservation and recreation shall have a first refusal 
1935 option to meet a bona fide offer to purchase land proposed for sale pursuant to section 9 or an 
1936 option to purchase such land at full and fair market value in the case of conversion, which option 
1937 shall be subordinate to that of a town or city pursuant to section 9. Except as provided herein, the 
1938 department shall have all applicable rights and obligations of cities and towns under section 9 
1939 including, but not limited to, the right of entry upon the land, the provision of non-exercise 
1940 notices and the recording of notices of exercise at the appropriate registry of deeds. The 
1941 department, or its assignee, and the town or city may cooperate to satisfy the appraisal 
1942 requirements or other obligations required by section 9 or this section. 
1943  If the notice of intent to sell or convert required by section 9 does not contain all the 
1944 required material, then the department, within 30 days of receipt of the notice, shall notify the 
1945 landowner and town or city in writing that the notice is insufficient and does not comply.  
1946  A holder of a mortgage shall send written notice of a mortgage foreclosure sale to the 
1947 commissioner in the same manner as to other parties as required by section 9. 
1948  A city or town shall provide to the commissioner any notice of public hearing, notice of 
1949 exercise or non-exercise, and notice of assignment in the same manner, and containing the same 
1950 materials, as is required to be given to the landowner pursuant to section 9.  
1951  The department may assign its option to the division of fisheries and wildlife of the 
1952 department of fish and game, provided that a notice of assignment shall be recorded as provided 
1953 in section 9. 

90 of 166 1954  The department, or its assignee, shall exercise its option only after: (i) consultation with 
1955 the executive office of housing and livable communities and the executive office of economic 
1956 development; and (ii) holding a public hearing. Said hearing shall be held pursuant to sections 18 
1957 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A; within the town or city where the land is located or in 1 such 
1958 town or city if the land crosses a municipal boundary; and prior to submission of a written notice 
1959 of intent to exercise an option under this section. The department, or assignee, at said hearing, 
1960 shall disclose the reasons for exercise of the option pursuant to this section and identify any 
1961 assignment by the department. The department, or its assignee, may comply with the public 
1962 hearing requirement by participating in a scheduled public meeting of a town or city. 
1963  The department, or its assignee, may exercise an option under this section by providing 
1964 written notice of its intent to the town or city and landowner prior to the end of the same 120-day 
1965 period available to the town or city for exercise of its option pursuant to section 9. An option so 
1966 exercised shall be effective at such time as the town or city records a notice of non-exercise with 
1967 the registry of deeds or that the town’s or city’s option otherwise expires.  
1968  The department shall record its notice of assignment or notice of exercise within 30 days 
1969 of the earliest of: (i) receipt by the commissioner of a notice of non-exercise from the town or 
1970 city; (ii) expiration of a town or city option by failure to record a notice of exercise or notice of 
1971 assignment; or (iii) receipt by the commissioner of notice from the landowner of expiration for 
1972 any other reason. 
1973  Land acquired by the department of conservation and recreation or the department of fish 
1974 and game pursuant to this section shall be permanently dedicated for public purposes as specified 
1975 in, and subject to, Article XCVII of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth. 

91 of 166 1976  SECTION 35. Chapter 87 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
1977 2, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
1978  Section 2. The tree warden of a city or town may appoint and remove deputy tree 
1979 wardens. The tree warden and the deputy tree wardens shall receive such compensation as the 
1980 city or town determines. The tree warden shall have the care and control of all public shade trees, 
1981 shrubs and growths in their respective city or town, except those in public parks or open places 
1982 under the jurisdiction of the park commissioners, unless otherwise designated in writing by the 
1983 park commissioners, and shall enforce all laws for the preservation of shade trees, shrubs and 
1984 growths. The tree warden shall expend all money appropriated for the setting out and 
1985 maintenance of such shade trees, shrubs and growths. No tree shall be planted in or on a public 
1986 way without the approval of the tree warden. The tree warden may propose regulations for the 
1987 care and preservation of public shade trees to be approved by the local governing body of a city 
1988 or town, which shall have the same effect as the city or town ordinances or by-laws and may 
1989 establish fines and forfeitures for violations thereof pursuant to rules and regulations 
1990 promulgated under section 15. 
1991  SECTION 36. Said chapter 87 is hereby further amended by striking out sections 5 and 6, 
1992 as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following 2 sections:- 
1993  Section 5. No person except tree wardens and deputy tree wardens shall, without a 
1994 hearing, trim, cut down or remove trees with trunks less than 4 inches in diameter 1 foot from the 
1995 ground or bushes standing in public ways; provided, however, that if ordered by the mayor, 
1996 members of the select board, road commissioners or highway surveyor shall trim or cut down 
1997 trees and bushes that, following an inspection based on accepted industry or government 

92 of 166 1998 arboricultural standards for the determination of hazardous or dangerous trees, are deemed to 
1999 obstruct, endanger, hinder or inconvenience persons traveling thereon or to obstruct buildings 
2000 being moved pursuant to section 18 of chapter 85. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the 
2001 appropriate state or municipal authority from trimming, cutting or removing any tree that 
2002 endangers persons traveling on a highway or otherwise poses an imminent threat to persons or 
2003 property. In all other instances, a person seeking to trim, cut or remove a tree from a public way 
2004 shall consult with the tree warden. Nothing in this section shall interfere with the suppression of 
2005 pests declared to be public nuisances pursuant to section 11 of chapter 132, including beetles that 
2006 spread the Dutch elm disease. 
2007  Section 6. A violation of sections 3 to 5, inclusive, shall be punished by a fine of not 
2008 more than the assessed value of any trees pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated under 
2009 section 15. Any money collected under this section shall be for use by the city or town. 
2010  SECTION 37. Section 9 of said chapter 87, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2011 striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- Whoever 
2012 affixes to a tree on a public way, places a notice, sign, advertisement or other thing, whether in 
2013 writing or otherwise, or cuts, paints or marks such tree, except for the purpose of protecting it or 
2014 the public and under a written permit from the officer having the charge of trees in the city or 
2015 town or from the tree warden in the city or town or from the department in the case of a state 
2016 highway shall be punished by a fine pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated under section 
2017 15. 
2018  SECTION 38. Section 12 of said chapter 87, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2019 striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:-  Whoever 

93 of 166 2020 wantonly injures, defaces or destroys a shrub, plant, tree or fixture of ornament or utility in a 
2021 public way or place or any public enclosure or whoever negligently or willfully suffers an animal 
2022 or vehicle driven by a person or belonging to such person to injure, deface or destroy a shrub, 
2023 plant, tree or fixture of ornament or utility shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500 and 
2024 shall be liable to the city or town or any person injured thereby for all damages relating to the 
2025 city, town or person’s interest in the shrub, plant, tree or fixture caused by such act. 
2026  SECTION 39. Section 13 of said chapter 87, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2027 adding the following sentence:-  In accordance with section 106 of chapter 41, the tree warden in 
2028 a city, or in a town having a population of more than 10,000 residents, shall be a qualified tree 
2029 warden; provided, however, that for the purposes of this section, “qualified tree warden” shall 
2030 mean a person with training and experience in the field of arboriculture, which shall include, but 
2031 not be limited to: (i) an accredited degree in a forestry or natural resource management field; (ii) 
2032 attained certification from the International Society of Arboriculture, the Massachusetts Certified 
2033 Arborist Program sponsored by the Massachusetts Arborists Association, Inc. or any other 
2034 equivalent professional certification; (iii) professional development courses offered by the 
2035 Massachusetts Tree Wardens’ and Foresters’ Association, Inc.; or (iv) equivalent training, as 
2036 determined by the department.  
2037  SECTION 40. Chapter 87 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2038 section 14 the following section:- 
2039  Section 15. The department of conservation and recreation shall promulgate regulations 
2040 and issue rules to implement this chapter. 

94 of 166 2041  SECTION 41. Section 2 of chapter 91 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
2042 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 22, the words “and council” and 
2043 inserting in place thereof the following words:- or a designee. 
2044  SECTION 42. Section 2A of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2045 striking out, each time they appear, in lines 11, 15, and 20, the words “and council” and inserting 
2046 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- or a designee. 
2047  SECTION 43. Section 4 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2048 striking out, in line 4, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following 
2049 words:- or a designee. 
2050  SECTION 44. Section 5 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2051 striking out, in line 1, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following 
2052 words:- or a designee. 
2053  SECTION 45. Section 6 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2054 striking out, in lines 9 and 10, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the 
2055 following words:- or a designee. 
2056  SECTION 46. Section 9A of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2057 striking out, in lines 17 and 18, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the 
2058 following words:- or a designee. 
2059  SECTION 47. Section 13 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2060 striking out, in lines 11 and 12, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the 
2061 following words:- or a designee. 

95 of 166 2062  SECTION 48. Section 14 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2063 striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof the following 
2064 words:- or a designee. 
2065  SECTION 49. Section 18 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2066 striking out, in lines 55 and 56, the words “newspaper or newspapers having a circulation in the 
2067 area affected by said license at the expense of the applicant” and inserting in place thereof the 
2068 following words:- manner specified by the department in regulations for the area affected by said 
2069 license at the expense of the applicant, which manner shall include, but not be limited to, in local 
2070 media where available. Until such regulations are promulgated and become effective, said notice 
2071 shall be published at the same time in a newspaper or newspapers having circulation in the area 
2072 affected by said license at the expense of the applicant. 
2073  SECTION 50. Section 18 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
2074 by striking out the tenth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
2075  No license shall be granted for private tidelands unless, upon or prior to applying for a 
2076 license pursuant to this section, the applicant shall submit to the clerk of the affected cities or 
2077 towns where the work is to be performed an application containing the proposed use, the 
2078 location, the dimensions and limits and the mode of work to be performed. 
2079  SECTION 51. Said Chapter 91 of the General Laws is hereby further amended by 
2080 inserting after section 18C the following 2 sections:- 
2081  Section 18D. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
2082 department may issue a general license or general permit authorizing dredging, fill and structures 
2083 associated with certain activities and projects, as specified by the department, in tidelands, great 

96 of 166 2084 ponds, rivers and streams, otherwise subject to individual licensing under sections 12, 12A, 13, 
2085 14, 18 and 19 including, but not limited to: (i) marsh restoration and other ecosystem creation or 
2086 restoration activities, such as vegetative plantings and streambed alteration that could include 
2087 wads, and pedestrian bridge crossings; (ii) nature-based solutions projects and nature-based 
2088 research and demonstration projects; (iii) culvert replacements including, but not limited to, 
2089 those associated with bridges; (iv) great pond drawdowns; (v) dredging and placement of benthic 
2090 barriers for invasive vegetation removal and harvesting; (vi) aquaculture not eligible for a permit 
2091 or license under section 10A; (vii) dredging associated with activities not subject to licensing or 
2092 permitting; (viii) temporary navigational and access impacts that last less than 1 year and are 
2093 associated with activities not subject to licensing or permitting; (ix) pipelines, cables, conduits, 
2094 sewers and similar structures installed under flowed tidelands or great ponds that are entirely 
2095 embedded in the soil and that are installed by horizontal directional drilling or micro tunneling 
2096 methods; (x) placement of cultch; (xi) public coastal resilience infrastructure projects in 
2097 previously disturbed and developed areas as defined by the executive office of environmental 
2098 affairs; (xii) routine dredging and sand placement for the purposes of improving the 
2099 sustainability and resilience of beaches and coastal dunes; and (xiii) any other activities and 
2100 projects that the department determines through regulations to be subject to a general license or 
2101 general permit.  
2102  (b) Projects beyond any established harbor line shall not be eligible for coverage under a 
2103 general license or general permit pursuant to this section unless said project is specifically 
2104 authorized by law, or, if not so authorized, is limited to dredging activities or a structure or fill 
2105 that is entirely embedded in the soil and does not in any part occupy or project into such 
2106 tidewater beyond the harbor line; provided however, that the department may, at any time, 

97 of 166 2107 require any structure or fill to be removed or relocated if channel changes or alteration demands 
2108 the same, as required by section 14; and provided further, that this subsection shall not affect the 
2109 eligibility of projects in areas without established harbor lines.  
2110  (c) The department may consider the cumulative impacts or benefits of activities in a 
2111 geographic area in determining whether a particular project is appropriate for coverage under a 
2112 general license or general permit.  
2113  (d) The licensee or permittee shall comply with all general license or general permit 
2114 standards issued as regulations by the department and any specific conditions prescribed by the 
2115 department pursuant to the general license or general permit.  
2116  (e) A proponent of a project eligible for coverage under a general license or general 
2117 permit under this section shall certify compliance with its terms and conditions to the department 
2118 and shall pay all applicable fees required by this chapter before beginning construction. The 
2119 department may perform annual audits to monitor compliance with the general license or general 
2120 permit requirements of this section. 
2121  (f)(1) Upon or prior to applying for coverage under a general license or general permit 
2122 pursuant to this section, the project proponent shall: (i) submit to the planning board of a city or 
2123 town where the work is to be performed and to the clerk of said city or town a statement of the 
2124 proposed use, the location, the dimensions and limits and the mode of work to be performed; (ii) 
2125 provide notice to the select board of the town or the mayor of the city and the conservation 
2126 commission of the town or city where the work is to be performed; and (iii) provide public notice 
2127 in a manner specified by the department by regulation. 

98 of 166 2128  (2) The project proponent shall specify by metes, bounds and otherwise the location, the 
2129 dimensions and limits and the mode of performing the work and shall submit a plan of the work 
2130 or structure in its application to the department for coverage under the general license or general 
2131 permit; provided, however, ecological restoration projects permitted under section 40 of chapter 
2132 131 that qualify for a general permit may submit the plan approved in the order of conditions.  
2133  (3) A department certification of a general license for a project shall be void unless, 
2134 within 60 days after certification, the department certification and the accompanying plan are 
2135 recorded in the registry of deeds for the county or district in which the work is to be performed. 
2136 Work or change in use shall not commence until the certification of the general license is 
2137 recorded and the department has received notification of said recordation. Such recording 
2138 requirement shall not apply to a certification of a general permit. 
2139  (4) The cost of assessments for tidewater displacement and occupation of commonwealth 
2140 tidelands shall be paid by the project proponent in connection with its application for coverage to 
2141 the department.  
2142  (g) Any change in use or structural alteration of a licensed or permitted structure or fill 
2143 shall require a new application to the department and, for projects seeking new coverage under a 
2144 general license or general permit, compliance with the requirements of subsection (f). Any 
2145 unauthorized substantial change in use or unauthorized substantial structural alteration shall 
2146 render coverage under the general license or general permit void. Coverage under the general 
2147 license or general permit granted by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be revocable by 
2148 the department for noncompliance with the conditions set forth therein. The department shall not 
2149 revoke coverage under any general license or general permit until it has given written notice of 

99 of 166 2150 the alleged noncompliance to the licensee or permittee and to those persons who have filed a 
2151 written request for such notice with the department and afforded the licensee or permittee a 
2152 reasonable opportunity to correct said noncompliance. 
2153  (h) Section 18 and section 20 shall not apply to projects subject to a general license or 
2154 general permit; provided, however, that the project proponent shall submit to the department 
2155 plans of any proposed work to be performed and a copy of any legislative grant in its application 
2156 for coverage to the department. 
2157  (i) No license or permit shall be required under this section for dredge or fill, as defined 
2158 by the department, as part of work to restore tidelands or salt marshes; provided, however, that 
2159 such project is permitted by the department or local issuing authority pursuant to section 40 of 
2160 chapter 131; and provided further, that such a project does not impair public access or navigation 
2161 and does not involve placement of a structure. 
2162  (j) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section. Such regulations 
2163 shall prescribe which activities are eligible for the general license or general permit, as well as 
2164 those projects that may allow for fill or structures to acclimatize to natural conditions, so long as 
2165 they do not significantly interfere with any rights held by the commonwealth in trust for the 
2166 public to use tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for lawful purposes and public rights of 
2167 access on private tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for any lawful use. 
2168  Section 18E. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
2169 department may issue a general license authorizing priority housing projects, as defined in 
2170 section 62 of chapter 30, consistent with commonwealth land use planning and housing strategies 

100 of 166 2171 and plans, climate resilient design guidelines and environmental priorities in tidelands otherwise 
2172 subject to individual licensing under sections 12, 12A, 13, 14, 18 and 19. 
2173  (b) Projects beyond any established harbor line shall not be eligible for coverage under a 
2174 general license pursuant to this section unless said project is specifically authorized by law, or, if 
2175 not so authorized, is limited to dredging activities or a structure or fill that is entirely embedded 
2176 in the soil and does not in any part occupy or project into such tidewater beyond the harbor line; 
2177 provided however, that the department may, at any time, require any structure or fill to be 
2178 removed or relocated if channel changes or alteration demands the same, as required by section 
2179 14; and provided further, that this subsection shall not affect the eligibility of projects in areas 
2180 without established harbor lines. 
2181  (c) The department may consider the cumulative impacts of activities in a geographic 
2182 area in determining whether a particular project is appropriate for coverage under a general 
2183 license. 
2184  (d) The licensee shall comply with all general license standards issued as regulations by 
2185 the department and any specific conditions prescribed by the department pursuant to the general 
2186 license. 
2187  (e) A proponent of a project eligible for coverage under a general license pursuant to this 
2188 section shall certify compliance with its terms and conditions to the department and shall pay all 
2189 applicable fees required by this chapter before beginning construction. The department may 
2190 perform annual audits to monitor compliance with the general license requirements of this 
2191 section. 

101 of 166 2192  (f)(1) Upon or prior to applying for coverage under a general license pursuant to this 
2193 section, the project proponent shall: (i) submit to the planning board of a city or town where the 
2194 work is to be performed and to the clerk of said city or town a statement of the proposed use, the 
2195 location, the dimensions and limits and the mode of work to be performed; (ii) provide notice to 
2196 the select board of the town or the mayor of the city and the conservation commission of the 
2197 town or city where the work is to be performed; and (iii) provide public notice in a manner 
2198 specified by the department by regulation. 
2199  (2) The project proponent shall specify by metes, bounds and otherwise the location, the 
2200 dimensions and limits and the mode of performing the work and shall submit a plan of the work 
2201 or structure in its application to the department for coverage under the general license.  
2202  (3) A department certification of a general license for a project shall be void unless, 
2203 within 60 days after certification, the department certification and the accompanying plan are 
2204 recorded in the registry of deeds for the county or district where the work is to be performed. 
2205 Work or change in use shall not commence until the certification of the general license is 
2206 recorded and the department has received notification of said recordation.  
2207  (4) The cost of assessments for tidewater displacement and occupation of commonwealth 
2208 tidelands shall be paid by the project proponent in connection its application for coverage to the 
2209 department.  
2210  (g) Any change in use or structural alteration of a licensed structure or fill shall require a 
2211 new application to the department and, for projects seeking new coverage under a general 
2212 license, compliance with the requirements of subsection (f). Any unauthorized substantial change 
2213 in use or unauthorized substantial structural alteration shall render coverage under the general 

102 of 166 2214 license void. Coverage under the general license granted by the department pursuant to this 
2215 chapter shall be revocable by the department for noncompliance with the conditions set forth 
2216 therein. The department shall not revoke coverage under any general license until it has given 
2217 written notice of the alleged noncompliance to the licensee and to those persons who have filed a 
2218 written request for such notice with the department and afforded the licensee a reasonable 
2219 opportunity to correct said noncompliance. 
2220  (h) Sections 18 and 20 shall not apply to projects subject to a general license; provided, 
2221 however, that the project proponent shall submit to the department plans of any proposed work to 
2222 be performed and a copy of any legislative grant in its application for coverage to the 
2223 department. 
2224  (i) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section. Such regulations 
2225 shall prescribe which activities are eligible for the general license, as well as those projects that 
2226 may allow for fill or structures to acclimatize to natural conditions, so long as they do not 
2227 significantly interfere with any rights held by the commonwealth in trust for the public to use 
2228 tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for lawful purposes and public rights of access on 
2229 private tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for any lawful use.  
2230  SECTION 52. Section 31 of said chapter 91, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is 
2231 hereby amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “and council” and inserting in place thereof 
2232 the following words:- or a designee. 
2233  SECTION 53. Section 35 of said chapter 91, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2234 inserting the following paragraphs:- 

103 of 166 2235  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commonwealth shall retain title to any 
2236 waters or land below the low water line of a great pond in perpetuity. Persons passing by foot 
2237 over areas between high water and low water lines of a great pond shall not be in violation of 
2238 section 120 of chapter 266 nor subject to arrest for trespass provided they remain within an area 
2239 that a reasonable person would believe to be below the high-water line, which shall include areas 
2240 of wet sand and areas below the seaweed line. In areas where natural processes, with or without 
2241 human intervention, have caused the landward or lateral movement of a barrier beach into an 
2242 area below the historic low water line of any great pond, the portion of the barrier beach 
2243 relocated into the former bottom of the great pond shall be and remain in the ownership of the 
2244 commonwealth in perpetuity; provided that this paragraph shall not convert ownership of any 
2245 portion of private property to public ownership in violation of Article X of Part the First of the 
2246 Constitution of the Commonwealth or the Fourteenth Amendment of the United States 
2247 Constitution. For the purposes of this paragraph, “barrier beach” shall mean a narrow low-lying 
2248 strip of land consisting of coastal beaches and coastal dunes extending roughly parallel to the 
2249 trend of the coast that is separated from the mainland by a narrow body of fresh, brackish or 
2250 saline water or a marsh system. A barrier beach may be joined to the mainland at one or both 
2251 ends. 
2252  SECTION 54. Section 33 of chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
2253 out the fourth paragraph. 
2254  SECTION 55. Section 34B of said chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2255 striking out subsections (c) and (d). 

104 of 166 2256  SECTION 56. Sections 37 and 38 of said chapter 92, as so appearing, are hereby 
2257 repealed. 
2258  SECTION 57. Section 42 of said chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2259 striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- The 
2260 commission may grant to towns, or to a water or sewer authority or district, locations for 
2261 common sewers and drains or water supply infrastructure in and across roadways and any 
2262 associated rights of way under its care and control. 
2263  SECTION 58. Said section 42 of said chapter 92, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2264 amended by inserting, in line 3, after the word “sewer”, the following words:- or water supply 
2265 infrastructure of a town. 
2266  SECTION 59. Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2267 section 329 the following section:- 
2268  Section 330. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
2269 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
2270  “Covered entity”, a person, corporation, business or other entity that manufactures, 
2271 produces or packages a covered product and shall include, but not be limited to, a wholesaler, 
2272 supplier or retailer that is responsible for labeling a covered product. 
2273  “Covered product”, a premoistened, nonwoven disposable wipe composed in part or 
2274 entirely of petrochemical-derived fibers that is reasonably likely to be flushed down a toilet or 
2275 otherwise caused to enter a plumbing, septic or sewer system; provided, however, that a 
2276 “covered product” shall include, but not be limited to, baby wipes, disinfecting wipes and facial 

105 of 166 2277 wipes; provided further, that a “covered product” shall not include wipes composed entirely of 
2278 wood pulp fibers and engineered to lose strength and degrade after disposal. 
2279  (b) A covered entity shall clearly label a covered product that the entity produces, 
2280 manufactures, packages, offers for sale or sells in the commonwealth with the phrase “Do Not 
2281 Flush”. 
2282  (c) Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in section 16 of chapter 21A, any person 
2283 who violates any provision of this section or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this 
2284 section, shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $2,500 per violation. Producing, manufacturing, 
2285 packaging, offering for sale or selling 1 or more units of the same covered product in violation of 
2286 this section shall constitute a single violation for each day such violation occurs. These penalties 
2287 shall be in addition to any other penalties or remedies that may be prescribed by law. 
2288  The attorney general and district attorney for the district in which the alleged violated 
2289 was committed shall enforce the provisions of this section. The office of consumer affairs and 
2290 business regulation may refer violations of this section to appropriate district attorney or the 
2291 attorney general for enforcement, including, but not limited to, for actions assessing monetary 
2292 penalties and enjoinment. The superior court department of the trial court shall have jurisdiction 
2293 to assess civil penalties as set forth in this section and to enjoin violations of, or grant such 
2294 additional relief as it deems necessary or appropriate to secure compliance with, the provisions 
2295 of this section, or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this section. 
2296  (d) The office of consumer affairs and business regulation may promulgate regulations to 
2297 implement and enforce this section. 

106 of 166 2298  SECTION 60. Section 31 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
2299 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fifth sentence, the following sentence:- 
2300 No regulation or amendment of a regulation which exceeds the minimum requirements for 
2301 subsurface disposal of sanitary sewage as provided by the state environmental code shall apply to 
2302 a priority housing project as defined by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in  
2303 consultation with the secretary of housing and livable communities. 
2304  SECTION 61. Section 150A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2305 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence in the twenty-first 
2306 paragraph the following 3 sentences:- 
2307  Personnel or authorized agents of the department may at all reasonable times enter any 
2308 premises, public or private, for the purpose of investigating, sampling or inspecting any records, 
2309 condition, equipment, practice or property relating to activities subject to this section, and may at 
2310 any time enter such premises for the purpose of protecting the public health or safety, or to 
2311 prevent damage to the environment. For the purposes of any entry described in the preceding 
2312 sentence, no warrant shall be required; provided, however, that upon demand by the owner or 
2313 person in control of such premises, a warrant authorizing such entry and inspection shall be 
2314 sought after such demand. Any court, judge, or justice authorized to issue warrants in criminal 
2315 cases may issue such warrants. 
2316  SECTION 62. Sections 13A and 13B of chapter 128 of the General Laws are hereby 
2317 repealed. 

107 of 166 2318  SECTION 63. Chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official 
2319 Edition, is hereby amended by striking out sections 51 through 63, inclusive, and inserting in 
2320 place thereof the following 11 sections:- 
2321  Section 51. The following word as used in sections 51 to section 61, inclusive, unless the 
2322 context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the following meanings: 
2323  “Commercial feed”, all materials or combination of materials which are distributed or 
2324 intended for distribution for use as feed or for mixing in feed, unless such materials are 
2325 specifically exempted by the department.  
2326  “Customer-formula feed”, commercial feed which consists of a mixture of commercial 
2327 feeds, or feed ingredients, each batch of which is manufactured according to the specific 
2328 instructions of the final purchaser. 
2329  “Distribute”, to offer for sale, sell, exchange, barter, supply, furnish, or otherwise provide 
2330 commercial feed. 
2331  “Drug”, any article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or 
2332 prevention of disease in animals other than humans; and articles other than commercial feed 
2333 intended to affect the structure or any function of the animal body. 
2334  “Feed”, any substance that is intended for use as food for animals other than humans; 
2335 provided however, that “feed” shall include commercial feed and feed ingredients. 
2336  “Forage”, dry hay, grass, legumes, haylage, baleage, corn and silage. 

108 of 166 2337  “Label”, a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container 
2338 in which a commercial feed is distributed, or on the invoice or delivery slip with which a 
2339 commercial feed is distributed. 
2340  “Manufacture”, to grind, mix or blend, or further process commercial feed for 
2341 distribution. 
2342  “Official sample”, a sample of commercial feed taken by the department in accordance 
2343 with the provisions of section 60 of this chapter. 
2344  “Person”, an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, cooperative, 
2345 business trust, business association, or entity. 
2346  Section 52. (a) No person shall manufacture or distribute commercial feed in the 
2347 commonwealth without first obtaining from the department a registration for such feed.  
2348  (b) An application for registration of commercial feed pursuant to subsection (a) shall 
2349 include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (i) the name and address of any applicants; (ii) 
2350 the name and address of the premises of the applicant’s commercial feed operation; (iii) a written 
2351 description of the commercial feed; (iv) a written consent allowing the department to conduct 
2352 both scheduled and random inspections including, but not limited to: (A) for-cause inspections in 
2353 response to complaints made to the department; and (B) inspections of and around the premises 
2354 on which the commercial feed is being manufactured or distributed; (v) a nonrefundable 
2355 application fee in an amount that shall be established by the department by regulation; and (vi) 
2356 any other information as the department may require by regulation. 

109 of 166 2357  (c) Upon approval by the department, a copy of the registration shall be furnished to the 
2358 applicant and the applicant shall be required to submit a registration fee in an amount to be 
2359 determined by the department by regulation. All registrations shall expire on December 31 of 
2360 each year. Failure to submit all required application materials and information as outlined in 
2361 subsection (b) shall result in non-issuance of the registration until such time as all application 
2362 requirements have been met to the department’s satisfaction.  
2363  (d) Persons who have registered a commercial feed pursuant to section 53 shall notify the 
2364 department of any changes in the guarantee of either chemical or ingredient composition of such 
2365 feed not less than 30 days prior to the registrant’s intended manufacture or distribution of such 
2366 feed in the commonwealth. New registration of the product shall not be required if the 
2367 department determines that such change would not result in lowering the feed value of the 
2368 product for the purpose for which it was designed.  
2369  (e) The department may refuse the registration of any application not in compliance with 
2370 sections 51 to 61, inclusive, or regulations issued thereunder, and may cancel any registration 
2371 subsequently found to violate any provision thereof; provided, however, that no application shall 
2372 be refused and no registration shall be cancelled without first providing the applicant or 
2373 registrant the opportunity to amend the application or otherwise obtain an adjudicatory hearing 
2374 pursuant to chapter 30A and the regulations promulgated thereunder concerning the refusal of an 
2375 application or the cancellation of a registration. 
2376  (f) This section and sections 53 to 61, inclusive, shall not apply to a farmer who grows 
2377 feed in the commonwealth that consists of forage and who distributes such feed to another 
2378 farmer in the commonwealth; provided, however, that such feed (i) does not contain any drug; 

110 of 166 2379 (ii) is not manufactured; and (iii) is not customer-formula feed. For purposes of this subsection, 
2380 the addition of preservatives when harvesting, cutting, bailing, wrapping or fermenting such feed 
2381 shall not be considered manufacturing. 
2382  Section 53. (a) A commercial feed manufactured or distributed in the commonwealth 
2383 shall be labeled with the information required by subsection (b). 
2384  (b) Commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, shall be accompanied by a label 
2385 bearing, at a minimum, the following information: (i) the quantity statement; 
2386  (ii) the product name and, if any, the brand name under which the commercial feed is 
2387 distributed; (iii) the guaranteed analysis stated in terms required by regulation to advise the user 
2388 of the composition of the commercial feed or to support claims made in the labeling; (iv) the 
2389 ingredient statement in terms required by regulation including, but not limited to, the common or 
2390 usual name of each ingredient used in the manufacture of the commercial feed; provided 
2391 however, that the department, by regulation, may permit the use of a collective term for a group 
2392 of ingredients that perform a similar function; provided further, that the department may exempt 
2393 such commercial feeds, or any group thereof, from this requirement of an ingredient statement if 
2394 the department finds that such statement is not necessary to protect the interest of consumers; (v) 
2395 the name and principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible for 
2396 distributing the commercial feed; (vi) the use directions or precautionary statements as the 
2397 department, by regulation, determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the 
2398 commercial feed including, but not limited to, adequate directions for use of all commercial 
2399 feeds containing drugs; (vii) the date of manufacture, processing, packaging, or repackaging or a 

111 of 166 2400 code that permits the determination of a date of manufacture; and (viii) any other information 
2401 required by the department. 
2402  (c) A customer-formula feed shall be accompanied by a label, invoice, delivery slip, or 
2403 other shipping document, bearing, at a minimum, the following information: (i) the name and 
2404 address of the manufacturer; (ii) the name and address of the purchaser; (iii) the date of delivery; 
2405 (iv) the product name and the quantity statement of each commercial feed and each other 
2406 ingredient used in the mixture; (v) the use directions and precautionary statements as determined 
2407 by the department, by regulation, for the safe and effective use of the customer-feed formula 
2408 including, but not limited to, requisite directions for use for all customer-formula feeds 
2409 containing drugs; (vi) a statement on the label that reads as follows: “This feed was 
2410 manufactured according to specific instructions provided by (name of person who provided the 
2411 instructions) and cannot be sold to any other person.”; (vii) the date of manufacture, processing, 
2412 packaging, or repackaging or a code that permits the determination of a date of manufacture; and 
2413 (viii) any other information required by the department. 
2414  Section 54. (a) Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a commercial feed 
2415 manufactured or distributed in the commonwealth shall be deemed to be misbranded if:  (i) the 
2416 labeling is false, deceptive, or misleading in any way;  (ii) it is sold or distributed under the name 
2417 of another commercial feed; (iii) the labeling does not comply with the requirements set forth in 
2418 section 53; (iv) it purports to contain or is represented as containing a commercial feed 
2419 ingredient or feed ingredient that does not conform to the definition, if any, prescribed by the 
2420 department. In the absence of a prescribed definition by the department, the department may rely 
2421 upon and apply the commonly accepted definitions issued by the Association of American Feed 

112 of 166 2422 Control Officials; or  (v) it is otherwise determined by the department to be misbranded pursuant 
2423 to sections 51 through 61, inclusive. 
2424  Section 55. Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a commercial feed manufactured 
2425 or distributed in the commonwealth shall be deemed to be adulterated if: (i) it bears or contains 
2426 any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it harmful to human or animal health; 
2427 provided, however, that if the substance is not an added substance, such commercial feed shall 
2428 not be considered adulterated under this subsection if the quantity of such substance in such 
2429 commercial feed does not ordinarily render it harmful to human or animal health; (ii) it bears or 
2430 contains any added poisonous, deleterious or non- nutritive substance that is unsafe within the 
2431 meaning of section 406 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; (iii) it is, or it bears or 
2432 contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 409 of the federal 
2433 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. section 346; (iv) it is a raw agricultural commodity 
2434 and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of section 
2435 408(a) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. section 348(a); (v) it is, or it 
2436 bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of section 721 of the 
2437 federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. section379e; (vi) it is, or it bears or contains 
2438 any new animal drug which is unsafe within the meaning of section 512 of the federal Food, 
2439 Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. section 360b; (vii) it consists in whole or in part of any 
2440 filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for feed; (viii) it has been 
2441 prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become 
2442 contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered harmful to health; (ix) it is, in 
2443 whole or in part, the product of a diseased animal or of an animal which has died other than by 
2444 slaughter which is unsafe within the meaning of section 402(a)(1) or (2) of the federal Food, 

113 of 166 2445 Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. section 348(a)(1)-(2); (x) its composition or quality falls 
2446 below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling; (xi) it 
2447 contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for its manufacture, 
2448 processing, or packaging do not conform to the standards promulgated by the department 
2449 concerning good manufacturing practice to assure that the drug meets the requirements of 
2450 sections 51 to 61, inclusive, as to safety and has the identity, strength and meets the quality and 
2451 purity characteristics that it purports or is represented to possess; (xii) it is manufactured or 
2452 distributed or used as commercial feed in a manner that does not conform with, or contains any 
2453 substance that is prohibited by the department under sections 51 through 61, inclusive; or (xiii) it 
2454 is otherwise determined by the department to be adulterated pursuant to sections 51 through 61, 
2455 inclusive. 
2456  Section 56. It shall be unlawful to perform or cause others to perform the following acts 
2457 in the commonwealth: (i) adulterate or misbrand any commercial feed; (ii) manufacture or 
2458 distribute any commercial feed that is adulterated or misbranded; (iii) use any feed that is 
2459 adulterated for any cattle, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, or any other animals if such animals are 
2460 raised to produce human food; (iv) remove or dispose of a commercial feed in violation of 
2461 section 60 or associated regulations; (v) fail or refuse to register in accordance with section 52 or 
2462 the regulations that may be promulgated thereunder by the department; (vi) fail to maintain any 
2463 records required by sections 51 to 61, inclusive, or regulations promulgated thereunder; (vii) 
2464 impede, obstruct or hinder any department employee or agent in the discharge of the authority or 
2465 duties conferred or imposed by sections 51 to 61, inclusive, or regulations promulgated 
2466 thereunder; (viii) sell, offer, or expose for sale any commercial feed or mixture thereof by any 
2467 person in violation of any regulation promulgated under sections 51 to 61, inclusive; (ix) fail to 

114 of 166 2468 comply with any other provision of sections 51 to 61, inclusive, or regulations promulgated 
2469 thereunder and not otherwise specified in this section; or (x) perform such other acts as may be 
2470 determined by the department by regulation to violate sections 51 to 61, inclusive. 
2471  Section 57. (a) The department is authorized to promulgate such regulations for 
2472 commercial feeds as are specifically authorized in sections 51 to 61, inclusive.  
2473  (b) The promulgation of regulations pursuant to sections 51 to 61, inclusive, shall 
2474 conform to the applicable provisions of chapter 30A and associated regulations promulgated 
2475 thereunder.  
2476  (c) The department may cooperate and enter into agreements with governmental agencies 
2477 of the commonwealth, other states and the federal government to effectuate the purpose and 
2478 provisions of sections 51 to 61, inclusive.  
2479  (d) The department may, by regulation, adopt and enforce federal standards concerning 
2480 commercial feed as it deems necessary to effectuate the purpose and provisions of sections 51 to 
2481 61, inclusive.  
2482  Section 58. (a) For the purposes of enforcement of sections 51 to 61, inclusive, and any 
2483 regulations promulgated thereunder, and in order to determine whether said sections 51 to 61, 
2484 inclusive, have been complied with, including, but not limited to, whether any operations may be 
2485 subject to said sections 51 to 61, inclusive, officers or employees duly designated by the 
2486 department, upon presenting appropriate credentials, are authorized to: (i) enter, during normal 
2487 business hours, any building, structure, land, vehicle or other premises, public or private, within 
2488 the commonwealth, in or on which commercial feeds are manufactured, processed, packed, 
2489 distributed, transported, stored, disposed of, used or held for distribution, or to enter any vehicle 

115 of 166 2490 being used to transport or hold such feeds; and (ii) inspect at reasonable times, within reasonable 
2491 limits and in a reasonable manner, including, but not limited to, scheduled visits, random visits 
2492 or for-cause visits made in response to a complaint of an alleged violation received by the 
2493 department, such premises, property or vehicle and all pertinent equipment, finished and 
2494 unfinished materials, containers and labeling therein; provided, that an inspection may include, 
2495 but shall not be limited to, obtaining samples and verifying records and production and control 
2496 procedures related to the manufacture, distribution, storage, handling, use or disposal of 
2497 commercial feed as may be necessary to determine compliance with sections 51 to 61, inclusive. 
2498  (b) The department may promulgate regulations to effectuate this section, including, but 
2499 not limited to, regulations that define notice requirements prior to inspection, official sampling 
2500 and analysis procedures, recordkeeping requirements and any other requirements as may be 
2501 determined by the department as necessary. 
2502  (c) If the owner or owner’s agent of any building, structure, land, vehicle or other 
2503 premises or property described in subsection (a) refuses to admit the department to enter or 
2504 inspect such building, structure, land, vehicle or other premises or property in accordance with 
2505 subsection (a), the department may obtain from the court in the district or county in which such 
2506 building, structure, land, vehicle or other premises or property is located an administrative 
2507 warrant to enter and inspect such building, structure, land, vehicle or other premises or property 
2508 and to obtain samples of such feeds, feed ingredients or raw agricultural commodities according 
2509 to section 58, prior to entry, inspection and sampling. The district and superior courts may issue 
2510 such warrants upon a proper showing of the need for such entry, inspection and sampling. 

116 of 166 2511  Section 59. (a) The department may obtain official samples of all commercial feeds 
2512 manufactured or distributed in the commonwealth during inspections authorized by section 58 
2513 and any regulations promulgated thereunder by the department and may be analyzed by the 
2514 department to determine compliance with sections 51 to 61, inclusive, and regulations 
2515 promulgated thereunder. 
2516  (b) The department shall forward the results of all analyses of official samples to the 
2517 person named on the label and to the purchaser. When the inspection and analysis of an official 
2518 sample indicates a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded, and upon request within 
2519 a time period following the receipt of the analysis to be established by the department by 
2520 regulation, the department may furnish to the manufacturer a portion of the sample concerned. 
2521 The department shall, in determining whether a commercial feed is deficient in any component, 
2522 be guided by the official sample as defined in section 51 and obtained and analyzed in 
2523 accordance with this section. 
2524  Section 60. (a) The department shall have authority to enforce sections 51 to 61, 
2525 inclusive. 
2526  (b) The department may take all reasonable actions to ensure that no commercial feed 
2527 violating sections 51 to 61, inclusive, and regulations promulgated thereunder, enters commerce 
2528 in the commonwealth, including, but not limited to, orders for stop sale, quarantine, detainment, 
2529 withdrawal from distribution, condemnation, confiscation, destruction or any other actions as 
2530 may be determined by the department by regulation to be necessary to effectuate this section. 
2531  (c) Notwithstanding sections 51 to 61, inclusive, whoever violates said sections 51 to 61, 
2532 inclusive, or hinder the carrying out of any part thereof or, after receipt of a written request from 

117 of 166 2533 the department, unreasonably refuses or neglects to comply with any order or regulation lawfully 
2534 made under this section, may be subject to a civil administrative penalty issued by the 
2535 department. The notice of assessment of civil administrative penalty shall include, but not be 
2536 limited to, the amount of the penalty, the date the penalty shall be due, a statement of the alleged 
2537 violator’s right to an adjudicatory hearing pursuant to this section and chapter 30A regarding the 
2538 assessment and the manner of acceptable payment if an election to waive a hearing is made. A 
2539 person shall be deemed to have waived all rights to an adjudicatory hearing unless, within 21 
2540 days of the date of the department’s notice, the person files a written notice, by hand or certified 
2541 mail, return receipt requested, requesting such adjudicatory hearing. In the event that such 
2542 request is not received in accordance with this section, the proposed civil administrative penalty 
2543 shall become final and payment shall be due in accordance with the notice. 
2544  (d) Without alleging or proving the lack of other adequate remedies at law, and 
2545 notwithstanding the existence of any other remedies at law, the attorney general may apply for a 
2546 temporary or permanent injunction to restrain any violation of sections 51 to 61, inclusive, or 
2547 regulations promulgated thereunder. 
2548  (e) The remedies provided in this section are available in addition to, and without 
2549 limiting, any other penalties provided by law or equity, in this chapter or elsewhere. The district 
2550 and superior courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction to enforce this chapter and restrain 
2551 violations thereof. Enforcement actions brought under this section and appeals thereof shall 
2552 conform to the applicable provisions of chapter 30A and informal hearing regulations 
2553 promulgated thereunder. 

118 of 166 2554  Section 61. The department shall publish, at least annually, in such forms as the 
2555 department may deem proper, information concerning the sales of commercial feeds together 
2556 with such data on their production, composition and use as the department may consider 
2557 advisable and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feeds sold 
2558 within the commonwealth as compared with the analyses guaranteed in the registration and on 
2559 the label; provided, that any information concerning production and use of commercial feed shall 
2560 not disclose the operations of any person or entity. 
2561  SECTION 64. Said chapter 128 of the General Laws is hereby further amended by 
2562 adding the following section:- 
2563  Section 125. The supreme judicial court or any justice thereof, and the superior court or 
2564 any justice thereof, shall have jurisdiction in equity to enforce this chapter and regulations 
2565 promulgated thereunder. Proceedings to enforce the same may be instituted and prosecuted by 
2566 the attorney general.  
2567  The remedies provided under this chapter shall be available in addition to, and without 
2568 limiting, any other penalties provided by law or equity, in this chapter or elsewhere.  
2569  The commissioner may promulgate regulations to implement this section. In addition to 
2570 any authority provided in this chapter, the commissioner may issue orders necessary to enforce 
2571 this chapter and to restrain violations thereof. Such orders shall be effective pending resolution 
2572 of any appeal, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.  
2573  SECTION 65. Chapter 131 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2574 section 6 the following section:-  

119 of 166 2575  Section 6A. (a) The director of fisheries and wildlife shall consider land under the care 
2576 and control of the division for potential designation and long-term passive management as a 
2577 forest reserve and shall recommend designation of land as a forest reserve where such 
2578 designation will: (i) contribute to carbon sequestration and storage as part of the 
2579 commonwealth’s climate mitigation strategy; (ii) provide an opportunity for unique older forest 
2580 habitats to mature and develop over time without intended intervention in ecological processes as 
2581 part of a holistic, statewide, biodiversity conservation strategy; (iii) enhance climate resilience 
2582 through the maintenance of connected natural landscape blocks and species movement corridors 
2583 that provide a variety of important ecosystem processes, functions and services; (iv) provide 
2584 unique opportunities for compatible passive outdoor recreation and other public enjoyment to 
2585 serve a diverse public with wide-ranging recreational values; and (v) facilitate ecological 
2586 research, comparative studies of forest dynamics and long-term monitoring to evaluate reserves 
2587 as compared to other land management approaches.  
2588  (b) The director may, with approval of a majority of the fisheries and wildlife board 
2589 present at a duly called meeting of the board, designate land under the care and control of the 
2590 division as a forest reserve. Forest reserves shall be managed consistent with such designation 
2591 unless the director, with the approval of not less than 2/3 of the fisheries and wildlife board 
2592 present at a duly called meeting of the board and the approval of the secretary of energy and 
2593 environmental affairs, rescinds the designation. 
2594  (c) Designation of land as a forest reserve, or the rescission thereof, shall constitute an 
2595 administrative designation and shall not change the entity with care, custody and control of the 
2596 land, constitute a change in the use of the land, otherwise dispose of land or an interest in land or 

120 of 166 2597 otherwise change the existing status of the land as a wildlife management area or other land 
2598 management unit.  
2599  (d) The department shall passively manage forest reserves to allow natural processes to 
2600 determine changes in the structure and composition of the forest ecosystem to the greatest degree 
2601 possible. Forest reserves shall not be managed for production of timber or forest products or 
2602 intentionally manipulated, and active management shall be avoided, even when disturbances 
2603 occur, to the extent feasible. After consultation with a forest reserve science and technical 
2604 advisory committee, which shall be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental 
2605 affairs, the division may undertake active management or assisted restoration actions to: (i) 
2606 sustain ecosystem function, vital ecosystem services and habitat values; (ii) control problematic 
2607 pests, pathogens and invasive species; (iii) restore water and wetland resources; (iv) protect 
2608 public safety; or (v) address other unforeseen circumstances. The division may undertake such 
2609 other management actions as may be required by law.   
2610  Compatible passive recreational activities, regulated hunting and trapping, conversion or 
2611 removal of plantations, maintenance or repair of existing forest roads, trails and administrative 
2612 access points, preservation of historic and cultural resources, removal of immediate threats to 
2613 public safety, selective understory invasive plant control and monitoring and research activities 
2614 shall be permitted within forest reserves.  
2615  SECTION 66. The first paragraph of section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is 
2616 hereby amended by striking out the second, third, fourth and fifth sentences and inserting in 
2617 place thereof the following 4 sentences:- Said notice shall be filed by delivery in hand to the 
2618 conservation commission or its authorized representative or by certified mail, return receipt 

121 of 166 2619 requested, to said commission, or, if none, to the select board in a town or the mayor of a city in 
2620 which the proposed activity is to be located, or by electronic delivery to the conservation 
2621 commission, or, if none, to the select board or mayor, as specified in regulations promulgated by 
2622 the department of environmental protection. Upon such filing, the receipt of such notice shall be 
2623 acknowledged in writing and shall include the time and date so received. A person delivering 
2624 said notice by hand shall be given a receipt in writing acknowledging the time and date of such 
2625 filing. Copies of such notice shall be sent concurrently by electronic delivery to the department 
2626 of environmental protection. 
2627  SECTION 67. Said section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2628 amended by striking out, in line 74, the figure “1,000” and inserting in place thereof the 
2629 following figure:- 100. 
2630  SECTION 68. Said section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2631 amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 2 
2632 paragraphs:- 
2633  Within 21 days of the receipt by a conservation commission of a written request made by 
2634 a person by a method of delivery as specified in regulations promulgated by the department, the 
2635 commission shall make a written determination as to whether this section is applicable to any 
2636 land or work thereon; provided, however, that for a priority housing project as defined by the 
2637 secretary of energy and environmental affairs in consultation with the secretary of housing and 
2638 livable communities, this section shall be applicable to any land or work thereon only if the 
2639 conditions contained herein are met, notwithstanding any local rule, regulation, ordinance or by-
2640 law which would otherwise render the priority housing project subject to this section. When the 

122 of 166 2641 person making the written request is not the owner of the land, notice of any such determination 
2642 shall also be sent to the owner. As specified by the department in regulations, certain activities 
2643 may be approved by determinations with conditions, and without the filing of a notice of 
2644 intention, if the conditions ensure that the activities will have negligible or minor wetlands 
2645 impacts or beneficial restoration effects. Temporary impacts may also be approved with a 
2646 determination with conditions; provided, however, that the wetlands are fully restored as 
2647 specified by the department in regulations. Violation of a condition of a determination of 
2648 applicability shall be a violation of this section.  
2649  The department may designate by regulation types of proposed work that have 
2650 insignificant wetlands impacts and may be approved by the conservation agent or conservation 
2651 commission chair or by the department in writing, without a notice of intention or determination 
2652 and without a public hearing. Such approval may include, but shall not be limited to, any 
2653 conditions necessary to further the interests of this section. A copy of the approval shall be sent 
2654 to the department at the same time it is sent to the applicant, and the department shall have 7 
2655 days from receipt to revoke the approval. 
2656  SECTION 69. Said section 40 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2657 amended by striking out the seventeenth, eighteenth and nineteenth paragraphs and inserting in 
2658 place thereof the following 3 paragraphs:- 
2659  The conservation commission, select board or mayor receiving notice under this section 
2660 shall hold a public hearing on the proposed activity within 21 days of the receipt of said notice. 
2661 Notice of the time and place of said hearing shall be given by the hearing authority at the 
2662 expense of the applicant not less than 5 days prior to such hearing, or another period of time 

123 of 166 2663 specified in department regulations, by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the 
2664 city or town where the activity is proposed or notice on the city or town website or other means, 
2665 as specified in regulations promulgated by the department, and by mailing a notice to the 
2666 applicant and the board of health and the planning board of said city or town. The conservation 
2667 commission and its agents, officers and employees and the commissioner of environmental 
2668 protection and their agents and employees may enter upon privately owned land for the purpose 
2669 of performing their duties under this section. No conditions shall be imposed, nor shall any 
2670 determination be rendered by a conservation commission, in reference to this section, unless the 
2671 conservation commission meets with a quorum present. The department may provide by 
2672 regulation that certain activities that require a notice of intention may not require a public 
2673 hearing but shall require public notice.  
2674  If, after said hearing, or after deliberation by the conservation commission, select board 
2675 or mayor on the notice of intent where no hearing is required, the conservation commission, 
2676 select board or mayor may, as the case may be, determine that the area on which the proposed 
2677 work is to be done is significant to public or private water supply, the groundwater supply, flood 
2678 control, storm damage prevention, pollution prevention, the protection of land containing 
2679 shellfish, to the protection of wildlife habitat, to the protection of fisheries, to resilience for 
2680 changing climate conditions or to the protection of the riverfront area consistent with the 
2681 following purposes:  protecting the private or public water supply; protecting the groundwater 
2682 supply, providing flood control, preventing storm damage, preventing pollution, protecting land 
2683 containing shellfish, protecting wildlife habitat, protecting fisheries or supporting resilience for 
2684 changing climate conditions, the conservation commission, select board or mayor shall, by 
2685 written order within 21 days of such hearing, or within 21 days from publication of the notice if 

124 of 166 2686 no hearing is required, impose such conditions as will contribute to the protection of the interests 
2687 described herein, and all work shall be done in accordance therewith; provided, however, that for 
2688 a priority housing project as defined by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs in 
2689 consultation with the secretary of housing and livable communities, such conservation 
2690 commission, select board or mayor shall not impose such conditions based solely on any local 
2691 rule, regulation, ordinance or by-law identified as more restrictive than this section pursuant to 
2692 section 8C of chapter 40, unless such condition also adheres to the provisions of this. If the 
2693 conservation commission, select board or mayor, as the case may be, make a determination that 
2694 the proposed activity does not require the imposition of such conditions, the applicant shall be 
2695 notified of such determination within 21 days after said hearing, or within 21 days from 
2696 publication of the notice if no hearing is required. Such order or notification shall be signed by 
2697 the mayor or a majority of the conservation commission or select board, as the case may be, and 
2698 a copy thereof shall be sent forthwith to the applicant and the department. The department may 
2699 designate, by regulation, types of proposed work, including, but not limited to, certain nature-
2700 based solutions projects, nature-based research and demonstration projects, ecological 
2701 restoration, wetlands resilience projects, for public coastal resilience infrastructure in previously 
2702 disturbed or developed areas as defined by the executive office of environmental affairs or 
2703 priority housing projects, as defined in section 62 of chapter 30, consistent with commonwealth 
2704 land use planning and housing strategies and plans, climate resilient design guidelines and 
2705 environmental priorities that may be approved with a general order of conditions; provided, that 
2706 the proposed project does not result in impacts to areas subject to jurisdiction that are greater 
2707 than those specified by the department in regulations. For linear shaped projects where work is 
2708 proposed in not less than 3 adjacent municipalities, the applicant shall submit a notice of intent, 

125 of 166 2709 request for determination or other request specified by the department, in regulations, directly to 
2710 the department for review and decision. Prior to issuing a decision, the department shall provide 
2711 the conservation commissions in these municipalities with an opportunity to comment on the 
2712 notice or request. 
2713  If a conservation commission has failed to hold a hearing within the 21 day period as 
2714 required, if a commission, after holding such a hearing has failed within 21 days therefrom to 
2715 issue an order, if no hearing is required and a commission has failed within the 21-day period to 
2716 issue an order, if a commission, upon a written request by any person to determine whether this 
2717 section is applicable to any work, fails within 21 days to make said determination or where the 
2718 conservation commission does issue an order, the applicant, any person aggrieved by said 
2719 commission’s order or failure to act, any owner of land abutting the land upon which the 
2720 proposed work is to be done or any 10 residents of the city or town in which said land is located 
2721 may, by certified mail or electronic filing, as specified in regulations, and within 10 days from 
2722 said commission’s order or failure to act, request the department of environmental protection to 
2723 determine whether the area on which the proposed work is to be done is significant to public or 
2724 private water supply, the groundwater supply, flood control, storm damage prevention, pollution 
2725 prevention, the protection of land containing shellfish, the protection of wildlife habitat, the 
2726 protection of fisheries, resilience for changing climate conditions, or the protection of the 
2727 riverfront area consistent with the following purposes: protecting the private or public water 
2728 supply, protecting the groundwater supply, providing flood control, preventing storm damage, 
2729 preventing pollution, protecting land containing shellfish, protecting wildlife habitat, protecting 
2730 fisheries and supporting resilience for changing climate conditions. The commissioner of 
2731 environmental protection or a designee also may request such a determination within said 10-day 

126 of 166 2732 period. The party making any such request shall at the same time send a copy thereof by certified 
2733 mail to the conservation commission, select board or mayor, which conducted the hearing 
2734 hereunder. If such party is not the applicant, a copy of such request shall also be sent at the same 
2735 time by certified mail to the applicant. Upon receipt of such request, the department shall make 
2736 the determination requested and shall, by written order issued within 70 days of receipt of such 
2737 request and signed by the commissioner or their designee, impose such conditions as will 
2738 contribute to the protection of the interests described herein; provided, however, that said 
2739 department shall notify the applicant within 30 days of the receipt of such request if the 
2740 application or request is not in proper form or is lacking information or documentation necessary 
2741 to make the determination. Such order shall supersede the prior order of the conservation 
2742 commission, select board or mayor, and all work shall be done in accordance therewith, but in no 
2743 event shall any work commence until 10 days have elapsed following the issuance of said order. 
2744 In the case of riverfront areas, no order issued by a conservation commission, select board, 
2745 mayor or the department shall permit any work unless the applicant has, in addition to meeting 
2746 the otherwise applicable requirements of this section, proved by a preponderance of the evidence 
2747 that: (i) such work, including proposed mitigation measures, has no significant adverse impact on 
2748 the riverfront area for protecting the private or public water supply, protecting the groundwater 
2749 supply, providing flood control, preventing storm damage, preventing pollution, protecting land 
2750 containing shellfish, protecting wildlife habitat, protecting fisheries or supporting resilience for 
2751 changing climate conditions; and (ii) there is no practicable and substantially equivalent 
2752 economic alternative to the proposed project with less adverse effects on such purposes. An 
2753 alternative is practicable and substantially economically equivalent if it is available and capable 
2754 of being done after taking into consideration (i) costs, and whether such costs are reasonable or 

127 of 166 2755 prohibitive to the owner; (ii) existing technology; (iii) the proposed use; and (iv) logistics in light 
2756 of overall project purposes. For activities associated with access for 1 dwelling unit, the area 
2757 under consideration for practicable alternatives will be limited to the lot; provided, that said lot 
2758 shall be on file with the registry of deeds as of August 1, 1996. For other activities, including, but 
2759 not limited to, the creation of a real estate subdivision, the area under consideration shall be the 
2760 subdivided lots, any parcel out of which the lots were created and any other parcels that are 
2761 adjacent to such parcel or adjacent through other parcels formerly or presently owned by the 
2762 same owner at any time on or after August 1, 1996 or any land which can reasonably be 
2763 obtained; provided, that an ownership interest can reasonably be obtained after taking into 
2764 consideration (i) cost, and whether such cost is reasonable or prohibitive to the owner; (ii) 
2765 existing technology; (iii) the proposed use; and (iv) logistics in light of overall project purposes. 
2766 At any time prior to a final order of determination by the department, any party requesting a 
2767 determination may, in writing, withdraw the request, and such withdrawal shall be effective upon 
2768 receipt of the withdrawal request by the department. Notwithstanding the withdrawal, the 
2769 commissioner or their designee may continue the determination if they notify all parties within 
2770 10 days of receipt of the withdrawal. A copy of such order shall be sent to the applicant, to the 
2771 conservation commission, select board or mayor which conducted the hearing hereunder. As 
2772 used in this section, the term “wildlife habitat” shall mean those areas subject to this section, 
2773 which, due to their plant community composition and structure, hydrologic regime or other 
2774 characteristics provide important food, shelter, migratory or overwintering areas or breeding 
2775 areas for wildlife. The department may provide, by regulation, that superseding orders of 
2776 conditions and superseding determinations of applicability for certain types of proposed work, 
2777 including, but not limited to, certain nature-based solutions projects, ecological restoration, or 

128 of 166 2778 wetlands resilience projects, or for work in the buffer zone as defined by the department by 
2779 regulation or for certain priority housing projects, as defined in section 62 of chapter 30, 
2780 consistent with commonwealth land use planning and housing strategies and plans, climate 
2781 resilient design guidelines and environmental priorities, may not be the subject of a request for 
2782 an adjudicatory hearing in accordance with chapter 30A, and that any person aggrieved such a 
2783 superseding order of conditions or superseding determination of applicability may obtain judicial 
2784 review by filing an application for review in the superior court within 21 days after receipt a 
2785 superseding order of conditions or superseding determination of applicability from the 
2786 department. 
2787  SECTION 70. Section 34 of chapter 132 of the General Laws is hereby repealed. 
2788  SECTION 71. Section 7 of chapter 132A of the General Laws is hereby repealed. 
2789  SECTION 72. Section 7A of said chapter 132A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2790 striking out, in lines 1 and 2, the words “environmental management, division of forest and 
2791 parks,” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- conservation and recreation. 
2792  SECTION 73. Said section 7A of said chapter 132A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2793 amended by striking out the second, third, fourth and fifth paragraphs and inserting in place 
2794 thereof the following paragraph:- The chief park ranger and park rangers appointed and 
2795 employed by the department of conservation and recreation may assist the bureau of fire control 
2796 in both suppression and detection of fires. 
2797  SECTION 74. Section 2 of chapter 132B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
2798 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Animal” the following 
2799 definition:- 

129 of 166 2800  “Anticoagulant rodenticide”, any pesticide product that has a mode of action that 
2801 interferes with blood clotting including, but not limited to, any pesticide product containing any 
2802 of the following active ingredients: brodifacoum, bromadiolone, chlorophacinone, difenacoum, 
2803 difethialone, diphacinonon or warfarin. 
2804  SECTION 75. Said chapter 132B is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5A 
2805 the following section:- 
2806  Section 5B. The department, with the approval of the board, shall by regulation establish 
2807 a process and standards for cities and towns for the limited use of anticoagulant rodenticides by 
2808 licensed applicators in public health emergencies including, but not limited to, provisions for the 
2809 emergency use of anticoagulant rodenticides to protect drinking water supply, to control vectors 
2810 for mosquito-borne illness and for emergent infectious disease control. The regulations shall 
2811 allow for 1-time, indoor use in a single location to address a public health emergency as 
2812 determined by the commissioner of public health in the commissioner’s sole discretion. The 
2813 allowable 1-time emergency use shall: (i) be limited to span not more than 14 consecutive days; 
2814 (ii) be accompanied by integrated pest management actions that include nonchemical methods 
2815 and exclusionary measures to control rodents; (iii) require additional labeling of anticoagulant 
2816 rodenticides used including, but not limited to, the name of the rodenticide clearly labeled on any 
2817 bait box; (iv) require written rationale for the need for anticoagulant rodenticides over other 
2818 nontoxic short-term alternatives; and (v) require applicators to report to the department after the 
2819 14-day emergency use period and include a plan for ongoing rodent control at the location. 
2820  A city or town that accepts this section, consistent with section 4 of chapter 4, may 
2821 regulate the use of anticoagulant rodenticides by a licensed applicator by implementing the 

130 of 166 2822 department’s regulations for the limited use of anticoagulant rodenticides by licensed applicators 
2823 in public health emergencies. 
2824  The department shall report annually and include on its website information regarding the 
2825 emergency use of anticoagulant rodenticides including, but not limited to, locations where the 
2826 anticoagulant rodenticide was used, the types and amounts used, the contents of ongoing rodent 
2827 control plans and relevant accompanying documents. 
2828  SECTION 76. Section 93 of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
2829 amended by striking out, in line 6, the figure “15” and inserting in place thereof the following 
2830 figure:- 17. 
2831  SECTION 77. Said section 93 of said chapter 143, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2832 amended by striking out, in line 10, the figure “12” and inserting in place thereof the following 
2833 figure:- 14. 
2834  SECTION 78. Said section 93 of said chapter 143, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2835 amended by striking out, in line 21, the words “advanced building technology” and inserting in 
2836 place thereof the following words:- climate risk, 1 of whom shall be an expert in climate resilient 
2837 design, 1 of whom shall be an expert in the development of housing.  
2838  SECTION 79. Section 95 of said chapter 143, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
2839 adding the following subsection:- 
2840  (d) Ensure building regulations and requirements address climate impacts for the 
2841 purposes of reducing exposure and damages to structures and protecting the health, safety and 
2842 security of the occupants or users of buildings. 

131 of 166 2843  SECTION 80. Paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of section 168 of chapter 175 of the 
2844 General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “commonwealth”, 
2845 in line 146, the following words:- ; provided, however, that annually, not later than December 1, 
2846 at the discretion of the secretary of administration and finance, the comptroller shall transfer to 
2847 the Resilience Revolving Fund established by section 2OOOOOO of chapter 29, an amount not 
2848 more than the difference between the amount of such fees collected in the prior fiscal year and 
2849 the amount of such fees collected in fiscal year 2027. 
2850  SECTION 81. Chapter 183 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
2851 following section:- 
2852  Section 70. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “residential real property” shall, 
2853 unless the context clearly requires otherwise, mean real property improved by a 1 to 4, inclusive. 
2854 family dwelling used or occupied, or intended to be used or occupied, wholly or partly, as the 
2855 home or residence of at least 1 person, condominium units or cooperative apartments; provided, 
2856 however, that any such real property shall not include unimproved real property upon which such 
2857 dwellings are to be constructed. 
2858  (b) The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall, in consultation with the 
2859 secretary of housing and livable communities, issue standard notification forms and such other 
2860 materials as necessary to inform prospective purchasers and tenants about the flood risks of 
2861 residential real property. Such forms and materials may include, but are not limited to: (i) 
2862 information on whether the residential real property is located in a floodplain; (ii) documentation 
2863 of historical flooding and past damages on the property, such as claims filed and grants or 

132 of 166 2864 disaster assistance received for flood damage or flood mitigation; and (iii) details about any flood 
2865 insurance or elevation certificates for the property.  
2866  (c) A person selling residential real property shall, prior to the signing of a purchase and 
2867 sale agreement, provide to the prospective purchaser a completed copy of the applicable 
2868 notification form and other materials prepared pursuant to subsection (b). Any person leasing 
2869 residential real property with an option to purchase such property shall, prior to the signing of the 
2870 lease with an option to purchase, provide to the lessee-prospective purchaser a completed copy 
2871 of the applicable notification form and other materials prepared pursuant to said subsection (b).  
2872  (d)(1) All persons leasing or renting residential real property shall, prior to entering into 
2873 an agreement to lease or rent such property, notify prospective tenants about the hazards of flood 
2874 risk as provided herein.  
2875  (2) A residential lease shall contain the following notice to tenants: “Flood insurance is 
2876 generally available to renters through the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s (FEMA’s) 
2877 National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) to cover your personal property and contents in the 
2878 event of a flood. A standard renter’s insurance policy does not typically cover flood damage. 
2879 You are encouraged to examine your policy to determine whether you are covered.” 
2880  (3) Prior to entering into a tenancy agreement, the owner of residential real property or 
2881 such other person to whom rent is to be regularly paid, shall provide a prospective tenant with: 
2882 (i) a completed copy of the applicable form and materials prepared pursuant to subsection (b); 
2883 and (ii) 2 copies of a statement certifying that the prospective tenant received the materials 
2884 required under this section, a copy of which is to be retained by both the tenant and the owner; 
2885 provided, that such certification may be included as a provision in a written tenancy agreement. 

133 of 166 2886  (e) An owner who fails to comply with the provisions of this section, including, but not 
2887 limited to, providing knowingly false or incomplete disclosures, shall be liable for damages 
2888 caused by the failure to comply. A violation of this section by a person engaged in trade or 
2889 commerce shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice as defined in section 2 of chapter 93A. 
2890  SECTION 82. Section 32 of chapter 184 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
2891 amended by striking out, in lines 23 and 24, 33 and 34 and 80, the words “metropolitan district 
2892 commission”, each time they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the 
2893 following words:- department of conservation and recreation. 
2894  SECTION 83. Said section 32 of said chapter 184, as so appearing, is hereby further 
2895 amended by adding the following paragraph:-  
2896  The secretary of environmental affairs, commissioner of conservation and recreation, 
2897 commissioner of food and agriculture and the secretary of housing and livable communities may, 
2898 at such times as they are not available to certify approval, authorize in writing a designee to 
2899 approve restrictions on their behalf, and a restriction approved and certified by such designee 
2900 shall have the benefit of this section. 
2901  SECTION 84. Subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 372 of the acts of 1984 is hereby 
2902 amended by striking out the words “eleven members. One member of the board of directors shall 
2903 be the secretary of the executive office of environmental affairs, serving ex officio” and inserting 
2904 in place thereof the following words:- “: the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, who 
2905 shall serve ex officio, 1 member who is a resident of a Quabbin Reservoir watershed community 
2906 as defined by the department of conservation and recreation who represents land and water 
2907 resources protection and host community interests who shall be appointed by the governor. 

134 of 166 2908  SECTION 85. Section 7 of chapter 330 of the acts of 1983 is hereby repealed.  
2909  SECTION 86. The fourth paragraph of section 44 of chapter 85 of the acts of 1994 is 
2910 hereby amended by inserting after the word “Boston”, as appearing in section 69 of chapter 209 
2911 of the acts of 2018, the following words:- , Herter Center at 1175 Soldier’s Field road in Herter 
2912 park within the Charles River Reservation in the city of Boston, transfer station at 1674-1680 
2913 Blue Hill avenue in the Neponset River State Reservation in the city of Boston, Morton-
2914 Spaulding House at Mill street in Moore state park in the town of Paxton, the gatehouse on 
2915 Highland street in Bradley Palmer state park in the town of Hamilton, Farnham Log Cabin at 437 
2916 North road in Great Brook Farm state park in the town of Carlisle, North Farm House at 107 Old 
2917 North road in Great Brook Farm state park in the town of Carlisle, Sugar House Krug Sugarbush 
2918 at 236 South Street in the town of Chesterfield.   
2919  SECTION 87. The first paragraph of section 177 of chapter 25 of the acts of 2009 is 
2920 hereby amended by inserting after the word “Boston”, the fourth time it appears, the following 
2921 words:- , Charles River Dam road in the cities of Boston and Cambridge, a segment of state 
2922 highway route 16 and Revere Beach parkway, including Wellington circle, from its intersection 
2923 with Interstate 93 and state highway route 38 in the city of Medford to its intersection with state 
2924 highway route 145 and state highway route 1A in the city of Revere, the Fellsway from 
2925 Wellington circle to its intersection with Interstate 93 in the cities of Medford and Somerville, 
2926 Mystic avenue in the city of Somerville, Medford Veteran’s memorial highway in the cities of 
2927 Medford and Somerville and the Lynnway in the city of Lynn. 

135 of 166 2928  SECTION 88. Item 6720-1350 of section 2A of chapter 286 of the acts of 2014 is hereby 
2929 amended by inserting after the word “Bedford”, in line 22, the following words:- ; provided 
2930 further, that such funds shall be available through June 30, 2032. 
2931  SECTION 89. Item 2000-0103 of section 2A of chapter 102 of the acts of 2021 is hereby 
2932 amended by inserting after the word “aqueducts” the following words: “and funding shall be 
2933 made available until December 31, 2028. 
2934  SECTION 90.  (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 
2935 following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
2936  “Bilge oil treatment unit” or “treatment unit”, a system used to separate oil and other 
2937 pollutants from oily bilge water. 
2938  “Department”, the department of environmental protection. 
2939  “Oily bilge water”, water from a vessel’s engine room that collects in the lowest part of 
2940 the hull and is contaminated with oil and other pollutants. 
2941  (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a bilge oil treatment unit 
2942 designed for the purposes of collection, separation or treatment and disposal of oily bilge water 
2943 collected from commercial vessels shall be exempt from the requirements of a licensed 
2944 hazardous waste treatment facility pursuant to 310 C.M.R. 30 if: (i) the treatment unit is sited 
2945 within 1,320 feet of the mean high water mark of the harbor bordered by the city of New 
2946 Bedford  and the town of Fairhaven; and (ii) the owner or operator of the treatment unit, as 
2947 determined by the department, presents the following information to the department for 
2948 approval: (A) a description of the characteristics and quantity of the oily bilge water to be treated 

136 of 166 2949 or otherwise managed at the treatment unit; (B) a description and conceptual plan of the 
2950 activities, treatment units, facilities and processes to be used at the treatment unit, including flow 
2951 diagrams; (C) relevant design and operation parameters of the treatment unit, including: (1) 
2952 design criteria, assumptions and calculations; (2) expected treatment, destruction, immobilization 
2953 or containment efficiencies and documentation of how that degree of effectiveness was 
2954 determined; and (3) demonstration that the treatment unit will achieve the identified goals of 
2955 reducing the frequency and volume of bilge oil spills; (D) design features for control of spills and 
2956 accidental discharge or system malfunction including, but not limited to, containment structures, 
2957 leak detection devices, runoff controls, pressure valves, bypass systems or safety cutoffs; and (E) 
2958 a description of the methods for management or disposal of any treatment residual generated as a 
2959 result of the treatment at the treatment unit. 
2960  (c) Information on the proposed plans prepared in accordance with industry-standard 
2961 engineering and construction standards for the construction of the treatment unit shall be 
2962 provided to the department by the owner or operator and shall include, but not be limited to: (i) 
2963 plans, material specifications and procedures related to the construction of the treatment unit; and 
2964 (ii) a schedule for the design and construction of the treatment unit. 
2965  (d) The owner or operator of a treatment unit shall provide the department with an 
2966 operation, maintenance and monitoring plan to ensure the effective operations of the treatment 
2967 unit under both ordinary and emergency conditions. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, 
2968 as appropriate: (i) the name and telephone number of the person conducting operation, 
2969 maintenance or monitoring activities; (ii) general operating procedures, including startup, testing, 
2970 maintenance, shutdown and emergency or contingency procedures; and (iii) specification of the 

137 of 166 2971 type, frequency and duration of monitoring and testing or inspections to ensure and confirm that 
2972 the treatment unit is performing as designed. 
2973  SECTION 91. (a) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall 
2974 establish a pilot program for research activities and demonstration projects for nature-based 
2975 solutions, as defined in section 1 of chapter 21N of the General Laws. The program shall: (i) 
2976 define categories of nature-based solutions and develop standards for their use; (ii) coordinate, 
2977 streamline and expedite the permitting and review process for activities and projects; and (iii) 
2978 prioritize activities and projects that advance scientific knowledge, provide conservation benefits 
2979 and minimize impacts to existing wetlands. The secretary of energy and environmental affairs 
2980 and commissioners or directors of permitting agencies may modify specific performance 
2981 standards for nature-based solutions. 
2982  (b) The pilot program shall commence upon the effective date of this act and operate for 
2983 5 years. Not later than 1 year after the effective date of this act, and annually thereafter, the 
2984 secretary shall file a report with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the joint 
2985 committee on environment and natural resources that: (i) details the categories of nature-based 
2986 solutions; (ii) analyzes the approval time for all permits required for each approved research 
2987 activity or demonstration project; (iii) specifies any specific performance standards modified for 
2988 each approved research activity or project; and (iv) provides data about the effectiveness of each 
2989 approved research activity or project. 
2990  SECTION 92. The department of environmental protection shall conduct a culturally 
2991 competent and linguistically diverse outreach and education program regarding non-flushable 
2992 wipes consistent with section 330 of chapter 94 of the General Laws. In conducting the outreach 

138 of 166 2993 and education program, the department shall consult with the Massachusetts Water Resources 
2994 Authority, the Greater Lawrence Sanitary District, Upper Blackstone Clean Water, the city of 
2995 Springfield water and sewer commission, the city of Pittsfield wastewater treatment plant 
2996 division, the city of New Bedford department of public infrastructure wastewater division, the 
2997 city of Fall River sewer commission, the city of Brockton department of public works sewer 
2998 division, the town of Franklin water and sewer division, the city of Attleboro wastewater 
2999 department and the Barnstable county Alternative Septic System Tracking program. 
3000  SECTION 93. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 40N of the General Laws or any other general 
3001 or special law to the contrary the powers of the Springfield water and sewer commission shall be 
3002 exercised by a 7 member board of directors consisting of: 4 members to be appointed by the 
3003 mayor of the city of Springfield and serve coterminous with the mayor; and 3 members 
3004 appointed by the advisory board under subsection (g). Not more than 4 members may reside in 
3005 the same municipality. Advisory board appointees shall serve 6-year terms, with initial phased 
3006 terms ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2028 and June 30, 2030, as designated at appointment. 
3007  (b) Members shall serve until successors are appointed and qualified and are eligible for 
3008 reappointment. Vacancy appointments shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. Before 
3009 serving, each member shall take an oath before the governor and such oath shall be filed with the 
3010 state secretary. Members may be removed by the appointing authority for misfeasance, 
3011 malfeasance, or willful neglect upon majority vote of the board of directors. The board shall elect 
3012 a chair annually. Four members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum and an 
3013 affirmative vote of 4 members shall be necessary and shall suffice for any action taken by the 
3014 board of directors. Any action of the board may take effect immediately and shall not be required 
3015 to be published or posted unless otherwise provided by law. No vacancy in the membership of 

139 of 166 3016 the board of directors shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise the powers of the board of 
3017 directors. The board shall be subject to section 11A½ of chapter 30 of the General Laws and any 
3018 other laws applicable to public bodies and public records and the commission shall be a public 
3019 agency for the purposes of chapter 12A of the General Laws and funds shall be held consistent 
3020 with said chapter 12A. 
3021  (c) Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, any member of the 
3022 board of directors who is also an officer or employee of the commonwealth or of a city or town 
3023 or other public body shall not  be precluded from voting for or acting on behalf of the 
3024 commission, the commonwealth or such city or town or other public body on any matter 
3025 involving the commission, the commonwealth or that city or town or other public body and any 
3026 member, officer, employee or agent of the commission shall not be precluded from acting for the 
3027 commission on any particular matter solely because of any interest therein which is shared 
3028 generally with a substantial segment of the public. The commission shall be a state agency for 
3029 purposes of chapter 268A of the General Laws and shall be a governmental body for the 
3030 purposes of chapter 268B of the General Laws. 
3031  (d) There shall be an advisory board to the commission which shall consist of (i) a voting 
3032 representative of each of the following cities and towns: the town of Ludlow, the city of 
3033 Springfield, the town of Wilbraham, the city known as the town of East Longmeadow, 
3034 Longmeadow, the city known as the town of Agawam and the city known as the town of West 
3035 Springfield; and (ii) 2 persons who shall represent the interests of persons and communities in 
3036 the Little River watershed area to be designated by agreement among the chair of the select 
3037 boards  in the towns of Russel, Granville and Blanford. The advisory board member representing 
3038 a municipality shall be its chief executive officer; provided, however, that the chief executive 

140 of 166 3039 officer may file with the commission in writing a permanent designee to serve in their stead until 
3040 the expiration or earlier vacancy of the officer’s term. 
3041  For purposes of this section, “chief executive officer” shall mean the person designated as 
3042 the chief executive officer under a local charter or law having the force of a charter, or otherwise 
3043 the mayor in a city and the chair of the board of selectmen or president of the town council in a 
3044 town, as applicable. 
3045  (e) The advisory board shall have 100 total votes, 90 of which shall be divided on a 
3046 fractional basis in the manner hereafter provided among the municipalities listed in clause (i) of 
3047 the first sentence of subsection (a) and 10 of which shall be exercised by the representative 
3048 designated in clause (ii) of said first sentence of said subsection (a). The fractional vote of the 
3049 representative of each municipality shall be determined annually by the commission on a 
3050 weighted basis by dividing a reasonable estimate of the charges for the commission's services to 
3051 users in that municipality by a reasonable estimate of the charges for the commission's services 
3052 to all users in all such municipalities. Each year, the determination of votes shall be certified to 
3053 the advisory board by the commission; provided, however, that within 5 days of the effective 
3054 date of this act the executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall prepare an interim 
3055 voting value based on the most recent available annual records of the costs of water and sewer 
3056 services, which interim voting value shall be conclusive upon the advisory board until July 1, 
3057 2026. Said advisory board may act at a regular periodic meeting called in accordance with its by-
3058 laws or at a special meeting called by the commission or by representatives of not less than 4 
3059 members of the advisory board. Except as provided in subsection (h), a quorum of the advisory 
3060 board shall consist of representatives who hold a total voting strength of  not less than 67 of the 
3061 votes of the advisory board and the advisory board may act, except as otherwise provided in 

141 of 166 3062 subsection (h), by the affirmative casting of a majority of the votes represented in the quorum. 
3063 The advisory board shall be deemed a governmental body and subject to section 11A½ of 
3064 chapter 30A of the General Laws and section 10 of chapter 66 of the General Laws. 
3065  (f) The advisory board shall adopt by-laws and elect officers annually including a chair, a 
3066 vice chair and a secretary and such other officers as said advisory board may determine. Officers 
3067 shall serve until successors are chosen and may be removed with or without cause. Vacancies 
3068 shall be filled by the advisory board for unexpired terms. Members shall serve without pay but 
3069 may be reimbursed for approved expenses. 
3070  (g) The purposes of the advisory board shall be: (i) to appoint 3 members of the board of 
3071 directors of the commission; (ii) to consider matters committed to the approval of the advisory 
3072 board; (iii) to make recommendations to the commission on annual current expense expenditure 
3073 budgets submitted to the advisory board; (iv) to make recommendations to the commission on its 
3074 charges; (v) to hold hearings, which may be held jointly with the commission at the discretion of 
3075 the advisory board and said commission, on matters relating to said commission; (vi) to review 
3076 the annual report of the commission and to prepare comments thereon to the commission and the 
3077 governor, and to make such examinations of the reports on the commission's records and affairs 
3078 as the advisory board deems appropriate; and (vii) to make recommendations to the governor and 
3079 the general court respecting the commission and its programs.  
3080  The advisory board shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out and 
3081 effectuate the foregoing purposes. 
3082  (h) The advisory board shall appoint three members to the commission’s board of 
3083 directors, who may also serve on the advisory board. Appointments require a special quorum of a 

142 of 166 3084 majority of voting members and approval by a majority of those present, with one vote per 
3085 member. No appointee may serve more than two consecutive terms, excluding partial terms 
3086 under 6 years due to vacancy or initial appointment. 
3087  (i) The advisory board shall hold a public hearing within 30 days of receiving a proposed 
3088 budget or within 15 days of a budget amendment to gather public input and report findings to the 
3089 commission. 
3090  (j) The advisory board shall appoint an ombudsman who, with any staff and consultants 
3091 authorized by the advisory board, shall act on behalf of the advisory board as follows: (i) 
3092 preparing analyses for the advisory board of the commission’s current expense budgets, capital 
3093 expenditure budgets and capital programs, and their effect on the commission’s charges; (ii) 
3094 representing the advisory board to the commission in matters relating to its programs, operations, 
3095 finances and charges; (iii) reporting regularly to the advisory board on the activities of the 
3096 ombudsman and advisory board staff, on the affairs of the commission, and on the effect of the 
3097 commission’s programs and operations on consumer water and sewer costs; and (iv) performing 
3098 such other duties consistent with the advisory board’s powers as the advisory board may assign. 
3099  (k) The advisory board may incur not more than $100,000 annually in expenses under 
3100 subsection (c). Costs shall be paid by the commission beginning July 1, 2026 from state-
3101 appropriated funds and thereafter included in the commission budget. The cap may be increased 
3102 upon commission approval of justification. 
3103  (l) The commission shall amend its bylaws and organizational documents not later than 
3104 December 31, 2026, to conform to this section. 

143 of 166 3105  SECTION 94. Not later than December 31, 2027, the department of environmental 
3106 protection shall publish on its website and submit to the senate and house committees on ways 
3107 and means and the joint committee on environment and natural resources a report stating its 
3108 progress on implementing the composting and other components of the department’s Organics 
3109 Action Plan of November 2023. The report shall clearly indicate any recommended legislative 
3110 changes or resources necessary to increase the rate at which food and organic waste is composted 
3111 and reduce the contamination of waste and recycling streams by compostable materials. 
3112  SECTION 95. There shall be a special commission on commonwealth port development 
3113 to recommend an integrated statewide strategic vision for Massachusetts ports, including the 
3114 designated port areas of Gloucester Inner Harbor, Salem Harbor, the city of Lynn, the city of Fall 
3115 River, Mystic river, Chelsea creek, the East Boston section of the city of Boston, the South 
3116 Boston section of the city of Boston, Weymouth Fore river, New Bedford-Fairhaven and Mount 
3117 Hope Bay. The commission shall identify industry-specific opportunities and needs, assess 
3118 existing infrastructure with capacity and resources and develop recommendations to achieve 
3119 stated priorities and goals. 
3120  The commission shall prepare a report proposing an integrated statewide vision for the 
3121 commonwealth’s ports and recommendations to implement that vision. The report shall include 
3122 an assessment for relevant industry sectors, which shall include, but not be limited to: (i) 
3123 commercial and recreational fishing; (ii) energy; (iii) shipping, bulk cargo and goods; (iv) 
3124 transportation and tourism; and (v) ocean technology and emerging markets. For each industry 
3125 sector, the report shall assess existing conditions, industry needs and opportunities for growth, 
3126 taking into account infrastructure, costs, limiting geographic constraints and workforce 
3127 development needs. The commission shall also consider, for each industry sector, the existing 

144 of 166 3128 conditions and potential for development in each designated port area to achieve the vision for 
3129 growth. The commission shall evaluate opportunities, constraints and best practices related to 
3130 low-income community access to the waterfront, housing and mixed use zoning in and around 
3131 designated port areas, workforce housing for marine industry workers, artist housing and work 
3132 space, consideration of land use compatibility, community needs, coastal resilience requirements 
3133 and the integration of mixed use development with active port operations. 
3134  The commission shall consist of: the secretary of economic development or a designee, 
3135 who shall serve as co-chair; the secretary of energy and environmental affairs or a designee, who 
3136 shall serve as co-chair; the chief executive officer of the Massachusetts Port Authority or a 
3137 designee; and 18 members who shall be appointed by the governor, 10 of whom shall be 
3138 representatives of the 10 designated port areas,; provided, that not more than 1 representative 
3139 shall be from the same city or town; 5 of whom shall be representatives of each water-dependent 
3140 industry sector; and 3 of whom shall be representatives of community groups representing the 
3141 north shore, Boston harbor and south coast regions.  
3142  The commission shall consult with the division of marine fisheries, the office of coastal 
3143 zone management, the department of environmental protection, the Massachusetts clean energy 
3144 center, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the Massachusetts development finance 
3145 agency, the seaport economic council, the commercial fisheries commission, the executive office 
3146 of housing and livable communities, any municipality that is host to a designated port area but 
3147 does not otherwise have a representative on the commission and other entities representing 
3148 stakeholder perspectives as determined by the commission. 

145 of 166 3149  Not later than 18 months after the effective date of this act, the commission shall file its 
3150 report with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the joint committee 
3151 on economic development and emerging technologies and the chairs of the house and senate 
3152 committees on ways and means. 
3153  SECTION 96. There shall be a special commission on flood risk mitigation and resilience 
3154 in the Connecticut river valley. The commission shall consist of the secretary of energy and 
3155 environmental affairs or a designee, who shall be chair; the director of the Massachusetts 
3156 emergency management agency or a designee; the executive director of the Franklin regional 
3157 council of governments or a designee; the executive director of the Pioneer Valley planning 
3158 commission or a designee; 1 member appointed by the senate president, who shall be a member 
3159 of the senate from a district within the Connecticut river watershed; 1 member appointed by the 
3160 senate minority leader, who shall be a resident of the Connecticut river watershed; 1 member 
3161 appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall be a member of the house of 
3162 representatives from a district within the Connecticut river watershed; 1 member appointed by 
3163 the minority leader of the house of representative, who shall be a resident of the Connecticut 
3164 river watershed; and 15 members appointed by the governor, 6 of whom shall be representatives 
3165 of municipalities within the Connecticut river watershed, 2 of whom shall be representatives of 
3166 regional water and sewer utilities, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a watershed 
3167 organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the agriculture sector, 1 of whom shall be a 
3168 representative from an environmental justice organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative 
3169 from a land trust, 1 of whom shall be a representative from a labor organization and 2 of whom 
3170 shall be representatives of regional higher education institutions.  

146 of 166 3171  The commission shall prepare a plan that identifies and prioritizes regional resilience 
3172 projects that reduce flood risk in the Connecticut river valley through 2050, which shall include, 
3173 but not be limited to: (i) a summary of applicable municipal vulnerability preparedness plans; (ii) 
3174 identification of structural and non-structural regional resilience projects that would reduce flood 
3175 risk to critical infrastructure, vulnerable populations, the economy and natural resources; (iii) an 
3176 implementation plan including project costs, timelines and responsible entities; (iv) 
3177 recommendations for local planning and policy actions to align with regional and state goals; and 
3178 (v) a strategy for engaging disadvantaged and priority populations.  
3179  The commission shall consult with the department of conservation and recreation, the 
3180 department of agricultural resources, the department of environmental protection and the 
3181 department of transportation.  
3182  Not later than 18 months after the effective date of this act, the commission shall file its 
3183 plan with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the joint committee 
3184 on environment and natural resources and the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways 
3185 and means. 
3186  SECTION 97. (a) There shall be a special legislative commission to study and 
3187 recommend specific revenue sources to fund essential wastewater infrastructure improvements in 
3188 response to nitrogen pollution in southeastern Massachusetts near the Buzzards Bay watershed 
3189 area specifically in the towns of Acushnet, Carver, Dartmouth, Fairhaven, Lakeville, Gosnold, 
3190 Marion, Mattapoisett, Middleborough, Plymouth, Rochester, Wareham and Westport and the city 
3191 of New Bedford. 

147 of 166 3192  (b) The special legislative commission shall consist of 25 members, including: the chairs 
3193 of the joint committee on environment and natural resources, who shall serve as co-chairs; the 
3194 secretary of energy and environmental affairs or a designee; the secretary of administration and 
3195 finance or a designee; the executive director of the Southeastern Regional Planning and 
3196 Economic Development District or a designee; the president of the Buzzards Bay Coalition, Inc. 
3197 or a designee; the executive director of the One Southcoast Chamber, Inc. or a designee; 1 
3198 member appointed by the senate president who shall be a resident of the southeastern region; 1 
3199 member appointed by the minority leader of the senate who shall be a resident of the 
3200 southeastern region; 1 member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives who 
3201 shall be a resident of the southeastern region; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the 
3202 house of representative who shall be a resident of the southeastern region; and 1 member per 
3203 each community specified in subsection (a), to appointed by the select board or mayor of such 
3204 community.  
3205  All appointments shall be made not more than 30 days following the effective date of this 
3206 act. The co-chairs shall convene the first meeting of the special commission not more than 45 
3207 days after all appointments have been made. 
3208  (c) The commission shall examine the level of investment and financial need required to 
3209 reduce nutrient pollution to the south coast’s coastal waters, including the costs to: (i) expand 
3210 sewer infrastructure to connect more septic systems to sewerage; (ii) expand capacity and 
3211 upgrade the level of treatment at existing wastewater treatment facilities; (iii) construct 
3212 additional wastewater treatment facilities to address expanded service areas; (iv) reduce 
3213 combined sewer overflow discharges; and (v) upgrade septic systems to nitrogen reducing 
3214 systems. The commission shall consider and examine the potential funding sources to finance 

148 of 166 3215 wastewater infrastructure improvements and best practices for municipal financial policies and 
3216 procedures. 
3217  The commission shall develop a plan of funding and financing recommendations to 
3218 address wastewater infrastructure needs and to reduce nitrogen pollution in the southeastern 
3219 region near the Buzzards Bay watershed area. The plan shall include, but not be limited to: (i) a 
3220 list of potential projects in the affected areas that address wastewater infrastructure needs and 
3221 reduce nitrogen pollution, including estimate project costs, timelines and responsible entities; 
3222 and (ii) funding and financing recommendations to support projects that address wastewater 
3223 infrastructure needs and reduce nitrogen pollution, including fair and equitable means of 
3224 financing wastewater infrastructure improvement projects to address nitrogen pollution. The 
3225 commission may consult and work with outside experts to conduct necessary reviews, provide 
3226 guidance on potential action plans and provide economic analysis of financing sources identified 
3227 through the special commission’s work. The experts shall be specialists in the fields of tax 
3228 administration and financing, nutrient pollution, water quality, wastewater infrastructure and any 
3229 other fields that may be deemed useful to carry out and implement the commission’s tasks. 
3230  (d) The commission shall hold not less than 3 public hearings in the southeastern region 
3231 to assist in the collection and evaluation of data and testimony. Experts may attend the public 
3232 hearings to provide testimony and any other relevant information regarding the fulfilment of the 
3233 commission’s objectives. 
3234  (e) The commission shall prepare a written report detailing identified funding sources, 
3235 financing options, projects in the region that reduce nitrogen pollution and its recommendations, 
3236 if any, together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect. 

149 of 166 3237 The commission shall submit its report to the governor, the secretary of energy and 
3238 environmental affairs, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the 
3239 senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint committee on environment and 
3240 natural resources not later than June 15, 2027. 
3241  SECTION 98. (a) There shall be a special commission to study water conservation and 
3242 reuse. The commission shall examine how implementing water reuse requirements in the 
3243 commonwealth would affect construction costs, consumer savings, water conservation and 
3244 public health. 
3245  (b) The commission shall consist of: the commissioner of conservation and recreation, or 
3246 a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the commissioner of environmental protection, or a 
3247 designee, who shall serve as co-chair; 4 members who shall be appointed by the governor; 2 
3248 members who shall be representatives from the department of public health appointed by the 
3249 commissioner of public health; 2 members appointed by Home Builders and Remodelers 
3250 Association of Massachusetts, Inc.; 2 members appointed by Associated General Contractors of 
3251 Massachusetts, Inc.; 2 members appointed by the Boston chapter of the American Society of 
3252 Plumbing Engineers; 2 members appointed by Boston Society of Civil Engineers Section of the 
3253 American Society of Civil Engineers; 2 representatives of labor associated with the 
3254 Massachusetts plumbing industry; 2 members appointed by Plumbing-Heating-Cooling 
3255 Contractors of Massachusetts, Inc.; 2 members appointed by Greater Boston Plumbing 
3256 Contractors Association, Inc.; 1 member of  the board of state examiners of plumbers and gas 
3257 fitters; 1 member appointed who shall be a member of the International Association of Plumbing 
3258 and Mechanical Officials; and the executive director of the Massachusetts Rivers Alliance, Inc., 
3259 or a designee.  

150 of 166 3260  (c) The commission shall research the potential benefits of expanding water reuse and 
3261 conservation efforts in both residential and nonresidential construction applications including, 
3262 but not limited to, greywater, rainwater and stormwater collection and reuse opportunities. The 
3263 commission shall issue a report, including any plans and recommendations for consideration, to 
3264 the clerks of the senate and house of representatives not later than July 1, 2027. 
3265  SECTION 99. (a) The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall coordinate 
3266 implementation of an ocean acidification monitoring system to study the threat posed by ocean 
3267 and coastal acidification by: (i) engaging with and, to the extent practicable, coordinating public 
3268 and private monitoring efforts of ocean acidification; (ii) harmonizing data collection; (iii) 
3269 providing, where available, monitoring hardware and technical assistance; (iv) recommending 
3270 mitigative interventions for coastal stressors or adaptive technologies for aquaculture, 
3271 prioritizing nature-based solutions to manage stormwater and reduce nutrient pollution; (v) 
3272 aggregating ocean acidification data from available public and private sources with other 
3273 available ocean monitoring data, including, but not limited to, salinity, temperature and nutrient 
3274 composition; and (vi) working with local ocean monitoring groups to analyze monitoring needs; 
3275 provided, however, that the analysis of monitoring needs shall identify appropriate monitoring 
3276 technologies and specific coastal waters where ocean acidification monitoring equipment would 
3277 need to be placed to enable modeling for long term pH changes in coastal waters and permit 
3278 short-term monitoring of aragonite saturation in variable and sensitive coastal waters to protect 
3279 critical habitat and shellfish; and provided further, that data derived from the monitoring system 
3280 shall be made publicly available in a dashboard and in a standardized format for research. 
3281  (b) Annually, the secretary shall issue a report on ocean acidification based on data 
3282 derived from the ocean acidification monitoring system established pursuant to this section, 

151 of 166 3283 commencing 1 year after the implementation of the ocean acidification monitoring system. The 
3284 secretary shall issue an updated ocean acidification report as an appendix of each ocean 
3285 management plan. 
3286  (c) In carrying out this section, the secretary shall avoid duplicating regional efforts and 
3287 shall incorporate best available science with data from the ocean acidification monitoring system 
3288 established in this section and data from local and private monitoring efforts, where available, 
3289 and shall employ methods which shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) modeling ocean 
3290 and coastal acidification trends in coastal waters and project acidification trends; (ii) studying the 
3291 effects of acidification on marine species that are ecologically or economically important or 
3292 understudied, including an examination of the impact of multimodal stress and shall include a 
3293 study of acidification effects on the American lobster, Eastern oyster, sea scallops, quahogs and 
3294 fin fish; (iii) clarifying any causal relationship between nutrient pollution, eutrophication and 
3295 coastal acidification in coastal waters; (iv) determining how different coastal stressors contribute 
3296 to coastal acidification; (v) estimating the economic impacts of modeled and projected 
3297 acidification on the commonwealth’s economy; (vi) determining if current total maximum daily 
3298 loads under the Massachusetts estuaries project are sufficient to keep acidity in the 
3299 commonwealth’s embayments within the ranges required by 314 CMR 4.05 through 2050 and 
3300 proposing changes to 314 CMR §§ 4 and 5 and total maximum daily loads if needed, taking into 
3301 account ocean and coastal acidification as particularized stressors; (vii) performing cost-benefit 
3302 analyses of intervention strategies to determine where pollution reductions will most efficiently 
3303 resilience acidification; and (viii) developing best adaptive practices for the shell fishing industry 
3304 to use to adapt to acidification. 

152 of 166 3305  SECTION 100. The department of environmental protection shall study and make 
3306 recommendations on the feasibility and benefits of banning foam and solid polystyrene in the 
3307 commonwealth. The study shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the: (i) 
3308 environmental and other benefits of banning foam and solid polystyrene products; (ii) health 
3309 impacts of foam and solid polystyrene use; (iii) reasonable and affordable alternatives to foam 
3310 and solid polystyrene; and (iv) cost impacts of banning foam and solid polystyrene products on 
3311 retailers, consumers and municipalities. 
3312  Not later than June 30, 2027, the department shall file a report on its findings, including 
3313 any recommendations, with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives and the joint 
3314 committee on environment and natural resources. 
3315  SECTION 101. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the 
3316 General Laws, section 35 of chapter 92 of the General Laws or any other general or special law 
3317 to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may, in 
3318 consultation with the commissioner of conservation and recreation, transfer Ravine road between 
3319 Fellsway East to the town line of the town of Stoneham to the town of Stoneham; provided, that 
3320 the exact boundaries of the parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of 
3321 capital asset management and maintenance.   
3322  (b) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws, 
3323 section 35 of chapter 92 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, 
3324 the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may, in consultation with the 
3325 commissioner of conservation and recreation, transfer Ravine road between West Wyoming 
3326 avenue to the town line of the town of Melrose to the town of Melrose; provided, that the exact 

153 of 166 3327 boundaries of the parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset 
3328 management and maintenance.  
3329  (c) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws, 
3330 section 35 of chapter 92 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, 
3331 the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may, in consultation with the 
3332 commissioner of conservation and recreation, transfer Everett street in the Allston-Brighton 
3333 section of the city of Boston to the city of Boston; provided, that the exact boundaries of the 
3334 parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and 
3335 maintenance.  
3336  (d) The consideration for the conveyances authorized by this section shall be nominal.  
3337  (e) The grantee of any real property disposed of pursuant to this section shall be 
3338 responsible for all costs relating to the conveyance, including, but not limited to, appraisals, 
3339 surveys, plans, recordings and any other expenses, as shall be deemed necessary by the 
3340 commissioner. 
3341  SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than 
3342 June 30 in fiscal years 2027 and 2028, the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority shall 
3343 annually make a payment of $50,000 to each of the towns of Athol, Barre, Belchertown, 
3344 Hardwick, Ludlow, New Salem, Orange, Pelham, Petersham, Phillipston, Shutesbury, Ware and 
3345 Wendell to support the role of these communities in hosting the Quabbin reservoir.  
3346  SECTION 103. Notwithstanding section 30 of chapter 29 of the General Laws or section 
3347 65 of chapter 30 of the General Laws, a portion of the funds authorized in this act may be used 
3348 for the costs associated with the purchase of title insurance and services for title examinations, 

154 of 166 3349 reports and certifications; provided, however, that any executive department or state agency 
3350 expending such funds shall maximize efforts and utilize all available means to minimize use of 
3351 capital funds for such purpose. 
3352  SECTION 104. Each agency acquiring land or an interest in land under this act may 
3353 expend an amount not to exceed 5 per cent of the amount appropriated to that agency for the 
3354 purpose of reimbursing nonprofit land conservation organizations or land trusts for reasonable 
3355 expenses directly associated with the acquisition of land or interests in land subsequently 
3356 conveyed to the commonwealth. Reimbursements shall be made at the discretion of the agency. 
3357 The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall determine, by regulation, what shall 
3358 constitute reasonable expenses. If the commonwealth does not take title to the property through 
3359 no fault of the nonprofit organization or the commonwealth, the commonwealth may reimburse 
3360 the nonprofit organization for reasonable expenses associated with due diligence. An 
3361 organization receiving a reimbursement under this section shall convey the land or interest in 
3362 land to the agency for an amount not to exceed the actual purchase price paid by the organization 
3363 for the land or interest in land in addition to any reimbursement received under this section. 
3364  SECTION 105. For the purposes of sections 16, 35 and 52, “priority housing projects” 
3365 shall mean housing projects that are: (i) housing-centered; (ii) dense; (iii) on infill sites; (iv) 
3366 energy efficient; (v) designed to be adequately served by utilities; (vi) designed to promote 
3367 resilience to flooding and other climate hazards; and (vii) designed to encourage access by 
3368 multiple modes of transportation. The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall, in 
3369 consultation with the secretary of housing and livable communities and the commissioner of 
3370 environmental protection, issue policy guidelines for priority housing projects within 6 months 
3371 of the effective date of this act and promulgate regulations consistent with the policy guidelines.  

155 of 166 3372  For the purposes of section 62E of chapter 30 of the General Laws, section 18D of 
3373 chapter 91 of the General Laws and section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, nature-based 
3374 solutions projects shall include, but not be limited to, projects whose primary purpose is to 
3375 restore, enhance or create wetland resource areas while increasing resilience or improving 
3376 ecological function using natural methods and materials. The secretary of energy and 
3377 environmental affairs shall, in consultation with the commissioner of environmental protection, 
3378 the commissioner of fish and game and the director of coastal zone management, issue 
3379 guidelines for identification of nature-based solutions projects within 6 months of the effective 
3380 date of this act. 
3381  For the purposes of section 62E of chapter 30 of the General Laws, section 18D of 
3382 chapter 91 of the General Laws and section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, the secretary 
3383 of energy and environmental affairs shall promulgate regulations or issue guidance to identify 
3384 projects for public coastal resilience infrastructure in previously disturbed or developed areas. 
3385  SECTION 106. (a) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall, in 
3386 consultation with the executive office for administration and finance, issue a report and make 
3387 recommendations on financial solutions and strategies to facilitate and accelerate the deployment 
3388 of climate and clean energy innovations in the public, private and nonprofit sectors. 
3389  (b) The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) an evaluation of a climate bank to 
3390 provide loans and other forms of financial support to address climate resiliency, mitigate 
3391 greenhouse gas emissions and support clean energy; (ii) financial strategies to reduce adverse 
3392 economic effects from transitioning to clean energy; and (iii) job creation possibilities through 
3393 climate and clean energy innovations. 

156 of 166 3394  (c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the executive office of energy and environmental 
3395 affairs shall submit a report of its findings and any recommendations for legislation to the clerks 
3396 of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on financial services and the 
3397 senate and house committees on ways and means. 
3398  SECTION 107. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
3399 secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation with the commissioner of 
3400 environmental protection and the commissioner of fish and game, shall establish standards and 
3401 guidelines for the resilient design of culverts, including culverts associated with bridges, in order 
3402 to expedite the permitting of new municipal or replacement of existing municipal culverts. Such 
3403 standards and guidelines shall consider projected future levels of and impacts from precipitation, 
3404 stormwater or flood events and impacts to fisheries and wildlife and their habitats and shall 
3405 integrate the Massachusetts stream crossing standards and any other relevant standards, including 
3406 then-current tidal crossing standards or resilience design standards. The standards and guidelines 
3407 shall be based on scientific information including, but not limited to, projected precipitation, 
3408 hydrology and fisheries and wildlife and their habitats. The secretary shall establish such 
3409 standards and guidelines within 6 months of the effective date of this act and shall review them 5 
3410 years thereafter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the 
3411 department of environmental protection to establish standards and guidelines for stream 
3412 crossings, provided that such standards shall not conflict with the standards established by the 
3413 secretary pursuant to this section. 
3414  (b) No project shall be eligible for a general permit, general license, or inclusion in a 
3415 special category pursuant to subsections (d) to (f), inclusive, unless it meets each of the 
3416 following criteria: (i) The project involves a municipal project to repair, reconstruct or replace an 

157 of 166 3417 existing municipal culvert or culverts, including culverts associated with bridges with spans of 
3418 less than 20 feet; (ii) The project complies with the standards and guidelines issued pursuant to 
3419 subsection (a) to the maximum extent practicable; (iii) except as needed to comply with clause 
3420 (ii), the project provides substantially the same principal transportation capacity and is in a 
3421 similar alignment to the structure to be repaired, reconstructed or replaced, including as to the 
3422 immediate approaches necessary to connect a structure to an existing adjacent road, and the 
3423 project does not include components of a reconstruction project other than the crossing and 
3424 immediate approaches that are otherwise subject to permitting or licensing; provided, however, 
3425 that the addition of sidewalks, bike lanes or shoulders that are collectively less than a single lane 
3426 in width shall not be deemed to substantially change the principal transportation capacity of an 
3427 existing structure; (iv) if a project is located or will take place in priority habitat designated by 
3428 the natural heritage and endangered species program of the division of fisheries and wildlife, the 
3429 proponent has provided to that program for review all materials required by the program and the 
3430 program has completed its review and has determined that the proponent has demonstrated that 
3431 the project will not result in take with or without conditions; and (v) the project complies with 
3432 any other conditions established by regulation issued pursuant to this section. 
3433  (c) The secretary and commissioner of environmental protection shall issue any 
3434 regulations or take other actions necessary or appropriate to implement the use of the standards 
3435 and guidelines established under subsection (a) to expedite implementation of projects meeting 
3436 the criteria described in subsection (b) which require a certificate, permit, license, or other 
3437 approval pursuant to: (i) section 61 and sections 62A to 62L, inclusive, of chapter 30 of the 
3438 General Laws; (ii) chapter 91 of the General Laws; (iii) section 40 of chapter 131 of the General 
3439 Laws; and (iv) section 401 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Public Law 92-500, 33 

158 of 166 3440 U.S.C., sections 1251 et seq., as amended. Such regulations shall require that for projects 
3441 meeting the criteria described in of subsection (b), the department of environmental protection 
3442 shall issue, deny or waive individual certifications pursuant to section 401 of the Federal Water 
3443 Pollution Control Act within 60 days of a complete application.  
3444  (d)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
3445 environmental protection, for projects meeting the criteria described in subsection (b) and for the 
3446 purposes of ensuring more expeditious processing of approvals for such projects, shall issue 
3447 regulations that create a general permit for the authorization of such projects, or a subset thereof, 
3448 under section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws. The permittee shall comply with all general 
3449 permit performance standards established by such regulations and any additional conditions 
3450 specified by the approving authority that are necessary to protect the resource areas because of 
3451 unique circumstances that are not addressed by the general permit performance standards.  
3452  (2) The procedures described in section 40 of said chapter 131 shall apply to general 
3453 permits issued pursuant to this paragraph, except as provided herein: 
3454  (A) Written notice of intention under the general permit shall be submitted to the 
3455 conservation commission or its authorized representative and the department of environmental 
3456 protection by electronic delivery in a manner prescribed by the department. A person submitting 
3457 a notice of intention shall publish notification of the proposed project in a print newspaper of 
3458 local or general circulation, or a newspaper’s website, including on-line only newspaper 
3459 publications, or a statewide or city- or town-wide website that may be maintained as a repository 
3460 for such notices at the time of submittal of the notice of intention. Said notification shall describe 
3461 the project location, details of the project, resource area impacts and any other relevant 

159 of 166 3462 information needed to adequately describe the proposed project and shall specify that comments 
3463 be sent within 14 days of publication to the conservation commission and the appropriate 
3464 regional office of the department of environmental protection based on the location where the 
3465 activities are proposed. No public hearing is required. 
3466  (B) If, after reviewing the notice of intention, the conservation commission determines 
3467 the project meets the criteria described in subsection (b), including any standards developed by 
3468 the department of environmental protection, then the conservation commission shall issue an 
3469 order of conditions containing any conditions pursuant to regulations established under clause (i) 
3470 of subsection (d) within 42 days of a complete notice of intention under this general permit. 
3471 Notices of intention not meeting the criteria of this paragraph shall be denied.  
3472  (3) In the event that a conservation commission fails to issue an order of conditions or 
3473 denial within the required time period, the project proponent may, within 10 days after such 
3474 failure to act, request a superseding order of conditions from the department of environmental 
3475 protection. The department of environmental protection shall make a decision and issue a written 
3476 order or denial within 42 days from receipt of a complete request for a superseding order.  
3477  (4) Paragraph 20 of section 40 of chapter 131 of the General Laws shall not apply to the 
3478 general permit except that within 10 days of receipt by the department of environmental 
3479 protection of an order of conditions issued pursuant to this general permit, the department may 
3480 appeal such order of conditions pursuant to said paragraph 20 of said section 40 of said chapter 
3481 131. 
3482  (e)(i) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
3483 environmental protection, for projects meeting the criteria described in subsection (b) and for the 

160 of 166 3484 purposes of ensuring more expeditious processing of approvals for such projects, shall issue 
3485 regulations to create a general license for the authorization of such projects, or a subset thereof, 
3486 which are otherwise subject to individual licensing under sections 12, 12A, 13, 14, 18 and 19 of 
3487 chapter 91 of the General Laws. Licensees shall comply with any general license performance 
3488 standards established by such regulations and any additional conditions specified by the 
3489 department. A proponent of a project eligible for a general license under this section shall certify 
3490 compliance with its terms and conditions to the department on such timelines as the department 
3491 requires and shall pay all applicable fees required by the department. The department shall 
3492 review such certification and, if consistent with the general license, confirm compliance in 
3493 writing within 60 days of receipt of a complete application. No construction subject to said 
3494 chapter 91 shall commence prior to issuance of such certification by the department. The 
3495 regulations shall protect and preserve any rights held by the commonwealth in trust for the public 
3496 to use tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for lawful purposes and public rights of access 
3497 on private tidelands, great ponds and other waterways for any lawful use. The provisions of 
3498 subsection (f), subsection (g) and subsection (h) of section 18D of the General Laws shall apply 
3499 to general licenses issued pursuant to this paragraph. 
3500  (f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary may by 
3501 regulation provide that projects meeting the criteria described in subsection (b), or a subset of 
3502 such projects, are a special category of project which shall not require an environmental impact 
3503 report under section 62B of chapter 30 of the General Laws regardless of location. 
3504  (g) The department of environmental protection shall consolidate adjudicatory 
3505 proceedings regarding the same proposed project that are requested for permits, licenses or 

161 of 166 3506 certifications under subsections (d), (e) or (f) unless consolidation would not contribute to 
3507 expeditious resolution of the appeals.  
3508  (h) The department of environmental protection and executive office of energy and 
3509 environmental affairs shall propose regulations not later than 6 months after the effective date of 
3510 this act. The department and executive office shall provide support and guidance to cities and 
3511 towns to assist them in applying concurrently for and otherwise streamlining the review and 
3512 approval of projects eligible for general permits, general licenses or other approvals pursuant to 
3513 this section. 
3514  (i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to change the application of section 24 of 
3515 chapter 79 of the acts of 2014. 
3516  SECTION 108. All discretionary or competitive grant programs made available in this 
3517 act for which eligible recipients include municipalities or other regional public entities comprised 
3518 of municipalities shall include a preference modifier for applicants or prospective recipients that 
3519 have zoning or land use policies that encourage the production of housing sufficient to meet 
3520 commonwealth housing goals as determined by the executive office of housing and livable 
3521 communities; provided, however, that such polices may include, but need not be limited to, as-
3522 of-right zoning capacity for multifamily housing that provides opportunity to build housing in 
3523 appropriate areas, the elimination of parking minimums for residential use, the elimination of 
3524 restrictive lot size requirements and wastewater and wetlands standards that do not exceed state 
3525 health or environmental standards. A regional or other partnership of not less than 2 
3526 municipalities shall only be eligible for such preference modifier if the applicable requirements 
3527 in all included municipalities are met. The executive office for administration and finance, in 

162 of 166 3528 consultation with the executive office of energy and environmental affairs and the executive 
3529 office of housing and livable communities shall issue guidelines to implement this section. 
3530  SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
3531 commissioner of environmental protection shall, not later than January 1, 2028, review and 
3532 update as necessary regulations relating to the subsurface disposal of sanitary sewage pursuant to 
3533 chapter 21A section 13 of the General Laws and to wetland resource areas pursuant to chapter 
3534 131 of section 40 of the General Laws. The commissioner shall, in reviewing and amending as 
3535 necessary such regulations, give consideration to local conditions including, but not limited to, 
3536 soil type, depth to groundwater, proximity to wetland resource areas and density of existing 
3537 development.  The commissioner may establish regional or site-specific standards where local 
3538 conditions so require. 
3539  SECTION 110.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
3540 department of conservation and recreation shall make available housing in the historic farmhouse 
3541 located within the Manuel F. Correllus state forest on Fire road 56, off of Sanderson avenue, in 
3542 the town of Edgartown to the superintendent of the Manuel F. Correllus State Forest on Martha’s 
3543 Vineyard, subject to such terms and conditions as the department deems appropriate and 
3544 contingent upon the superintendent remaining employed by the department. If the superintendent 
3545 elects not to live in the house, the department shall make the house available to other employees 
3546 of the department who care for the state forest, on the same terms. 
3547  SECTION 111. Section 107 is hereby repealed. 
3548  SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a city or 
3549 town, on behalf of which legislation has been duly filed with the general court before the 

163 of 166 3550 effective date of this act, shall be considered to have adopted section 5B of chapter 132B of the 
3551 General Laws; provided, however, that such city or town shall submit a letter to the department 
3552 of agricultural resources indicating the city or town seeks such adoption not later than 180 days 
3553 after the regulations implementing said section 5B are promulgated. 
3554  SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
3555 unexpended and unencumbered balances of the bond-funded authorizations in the following 
3556 accounts shall cease to be available for expenditure 180 days after the effective date of this act: 
3557 2500-7024, 2850-9951, 2840-8963, 2850-6967, 2820-1420, 2840-7993, 2800-2012, 2800-2013, 
3558 2800-2014, 2800-2019, 2820-2011, 2820-2012, 2840-2013, 2840-2014, 2840-2018, 2840-2019, 
3559 2840-2023, 2890-2023, 2890-2040, 2800-7013, 2800-7018, 2800-7016, 2800-7011, 2800-7012, 
3560 2800-7015, 2800-7017, 2800-7019, 2800-7022, 2800-7097, 2800-7098, 2840-7014, 2840-7017, 
3561 2890-7010, 2890-7011, 2810-7872, 2810-8802, 2800-7035, 2800-7031, 2800-7108, 2840-7026, 
3562 2840-7027, 6720-1336, 2840-7024, 2890-7035, 2800-7020, 9300-3909, 9300-7909, 9300-7010, 
3563 2000-6966, 2000-6967, 2000-6969, 2000-2010, 2000-2011, 2000-2012, 2000-2014, 2000-2015, 
3564 2000-2016, 2000-2018, 2000-2019, 2000-2020, 2000-2021, 2000-2022, 2000-2023, 2000-2024, 
3565 2000-2025, 2000-2026, 2000-2017, 2000-2035, 2000-2028, 2000-2029, 2000-7013, 2000-7014, 
3566 2000-7015, 2000-7016, 2000-7018, 2000-7023, 2000-7024, 2000-7025, 2000-7052, 2000-7054, 
3567 2000-7057, 2000-7056, 2000-7051, 2000-7029, 2000-7053, 2000-7070, 2000-7028, 2000-7031, 
3568 2000-7055, 2000-7059, 2000-7062, 2000-7063, 2000-7135, 2000-7081, 2240-8820, 2250-8820, 
3569 2250-8822, 2200-7991, 2200-2011, 2200-2012, 2200-2013, 2200-2014, 2200-2015, 2200-2016, 
3570 2200-2017, 2200-2018, 2200-2019, 2200-7011, 2200-7013, 2200-7017, 2200-7018, 2200-7020, 
3571 2200-7025, 2300-2010, 2300-2011, 2300-2012, 2300-2014, 2300-2016, 2300-2017, 2300-7018, 
3572 2300-7010, 2300-7011, 2300-7015, 2300-7016, 2300-7020, 2300-7021 and 2300-7025. 

164 of 166 3573  SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the 
3574 expenditures necessary in carrying out sections 2 to 2D, inclusive, the state treasurer shall, upon 
3575 receipt of a request by the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to 
3576 be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, 
3577 $3,370,605,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth, as aforesaid, shall be designated on 
3578 their face “An Act to Build Resilience for Massachusetts Communities” and shall be issued for a 
3579 maximum term of years, not exceeding 20 years, as the governor may recommend to the general 
3580 court pursuant to section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided, 
3581 however, that all such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2052. All interest and 
3582 payments on account of principal on such obligations shall be payable from the General Fund. 
3583 Bonds and interest thereon issued under the authority of this section shall, notwithstanding any 
3584 other provision of this act, be general obligations of the commonwealth. 
3585  SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the 
3586 expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2E, the state treasurer shall, upon receipt of a 
3587 request by the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to be specified 
3588 by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, $450,000,000. All bonds 
3589 issued by the commonwealth, as aforesaid, shall be designated on their face “An Act to Build 
3590 Resilience for Massachusetts Communities” and shall be issued for a maximum term of years, 
3591 not exceeding 20 years, as the governor may recommend to the general court pursuant to section 
3592 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided, however, that all such bonds 
3593 shall be payable not later than June 30, 2052. All interest and payments on account of principal 
3594 on such obligations shall be payable from the General Fund. Bonds and interest thereon issued 

165 of 166 3595 under the authority of this section shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, be 
3596 general obligations of the commonwealth. 
3597  SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the 
3598 expenditures necessary in carrying out sections 2F to 2G, inclusive, the state treasurer shall, upon 
3599 receipt of a request by the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to 
3600 be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, 
3601 $125,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth, as aforesaid, shall be designated on their 
3602 face “An Act to Build Resilience for Massachusetts Communities” and shall be issued for a 
3603 maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general 
3604 court pursuant to section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution; provided, 
3605 however, that all such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2062. All interest and 
3606 payments on account of principal on such obligations shall be payable from the General Fund. 
3607 Bonds and interest thereon issued under the authority of this section shall, notwithstanding any 
3608 other provision of this act, be general obligations of the commonwealth.   
3609  SECTION 117. Sections 10, 27 through 34, inclusive, 33, 54 through 56, inclusive and63, 
3610 70 through 73, inclusive, shall take effect 90 days from the effective date of this act. 
3611  SECTION 118. Sections 24 and 80 shall take effect on July 1, 2026. 
3612  SECTION 119. The program plan required under section 9 of chapter 21H of the General 
3613 Laws shall submitted to the department of environmental protection not later than 12 months of 
3614 the effective date of this act. 
3615  SECTION 120. Sections 19 and 22shall take effect on July 1, 2027.  

166 of 166 3616  SECTION 121. Sections13, 14 43, 72 and 73 shall take effect on January 1, 2028. 
3617  SECTION 122. Section 60 shall take effect January 1, 2028. 
3618  SECTION 123. Section 111 shall take effect 10 years from the effective date of this act.